title,selftext,subreddit
"Yes, You Are Bi! and Other Helpful Tidbits!","Welcome to /r/bisexual! Here are some posts you may find helpful: 

[Need reassurance? Read this!](https://www.reddit.com/r/bisexual/comments/6yzcsv/yes_you_are_bi/)


[What's the difference between Bi and Pan?](https://www.reddit.com/r/bisexual/comments/8x172k/whats_the_difference_between_bi_and_pan/?st=JJDOR988&amp;sh=562fc9bf)


[What's the deal with LEMON BARS??](https://old.reddit.com/r/bisexual/comments/8qsmyl/anyone_else_wonder_whats_up_with_the_lemon_bars/)",bisexual
Selfie Sunday!,"Hi folks, 

Some of you folks this week may have found some joy and laughter this week, other folks probably not so much. In fact they had to face the horror of being erased, and that's not okay. I've posted some donation links as well as some info as to what you could do and where to donate. You could even support trans people directly by straight up giving them money. If you know of anything else, please post it and I'll update this accordingly. 

 I understand that you figure donating won't do much and doing it won't possibly change anything it is overall impossible. My life experience has shown me that possible is another word for probable and doing small things like donating, will make the probability of a future where everybody feels included actually happen. 


Mr.Rogers said to look for the helpers and that's what's really needed right now. We'll probably need a lot more helpers in the future as such, consider how you could be a helper and where help would likely be needed. 

My planning face from a few weeks ago! https://imgur.com/a/ffPRmye

Organizations you can donate to:
https://www.huffingtonpost.ca/entry/how-to-help-trans-gender-conconforming-communities_us_5bcdd8b8e4b0d38b587a824d

https://www.translifeline.org/

Midterms are soon!
https://vote.gov/ ",bisexual
2018 “Bi” my standards...,,bisexual
My mantra,,bisexual
Damn I’m feeling very gay today 😊,"I like boys so much 


I love my boyfriend so much 😊


He’s such a cutie 


He’s bi and I’m bi 


we’re both bi bois 



🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈

🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈


💖💜💙

💖💜💙




",bisexual
hi I’m bi and sexual,,bisexual
My paltry dating history summed up,,bisexual
Who wore it better?,,bisexual
I’m proud of this meme,,bisexual
Friendly neighborhood reminder that labels are just that.,"If you come here as gay, lesbian, or straight thinking you may be bi and are stressed about it, you don't have to be. Labels mean little to nothing, it's about the person. Be with who you want to be with, as long as all involved are happy, you owe no one an explanation of who you're attracted to.",bisexual
Being bisexual is stressful,"I don't mean because of any bigotry, although that in itself is definitely a problem. And this is like my 3rd post about this here so at this point I'm just venting. But I feel like whenever I have times where I find girls more attractive to girls I get a voice saying ""You might as well be straight."" But I've labelled myself as bisexual since I was 14 and I've had times where I think ""Maybe I'm just straight"" like 2 seconds later I think ""There's seriously no way that's the case."" I've had crushes on guys and I've definitely had sexual thoughts about guys on more occasions I can count. But what if I'm just tricking myself? I hear stories of people who said they were bisexual and lied because they thought they'd look cool and what if I'm just doing that? I've never had sex with anyone (19 btw, I get the feeling that's really bad) and I have a fear that if I do I'll find out ""Oh I'm just straight"". I wish I could just be confident about what I am instead of constantly second-guessing myself. But on the bright side with how many different kinds of people exist in the world, I'm sure I'm not alone in this feeling.",bisexual
That moment when my economics textbook accidentally describes the bi struggle perfectly,,bisexual
My bisexuality became the center of attention at a party and it made me uncomfortable,"I’m the type of guy who keeps his sexual orientation to himself.  I don’t go running around telling everybody that I’m bisexual and waving flags to show how proud I am of it.  I just don’t think that it’s really anybody’s business what my sexual orientation is.  I do tell some people, but most people have no idea and just assume that I’m straight since I’ve always dated girls.  I tagged this as coming out because it was kind of like coming out of the closet even though a few people already know.

My girlfriend and I had a Halloween party on Saturday night.  She was the only person at the party who already knew that I’m bisexual.  We had some friends over.  We were all drinking wine and this deliciously strong drink called a black cat.  At this point everybody was wasted.  We’d probably been drinking for about 4 hours.  

I don’t remember the context, but I was talking to our friend Mary and she asked me if I was bisexual because something that I said alluded to me being bisexual.  I was comfortable enough with her to tell her that I was bisexual.  It was just a small offhand remark that nobody would’ve really noticed, but my girlfriend noticed, and she was so excited for me that she shouted “did you just come out of the closet!?”  Now, everybody at the party knew.  

My bisexuality became the center of attention at the party for a bit.  Everybody was giving me props and everything for coming out of the closet, but I didn’t want it to be such a big deal.  I was extremely uncomfortable.  I told my girlfriend later on that I didn’t like what she did, and she does feel bad about it.  She was just so excited because she’s always been trying to push me to be one of those loud and proud bisexuals because she thinks that I’m not being true to myself unless I let everybody know that I’m bisexual.  I disagree with her, but that doesn’t matter.  She thought that I was finally becoming that kind of person and was just really excited for me.  I’m not mad at her.  I just didn’t like how things went that night.",bisexual
Immediately thought of this sub. Which side street? No one knows,,bisexual
"When your parents stop calling you gay and start calling you half straight, half gay",,bisexual
Why do people say To me your bi,"When I say I’m gay 


Or  when I say I’m feeling gay 


Yes I’m bisexual 


But I can be gay too 🌈🌈🌈🌈🌈🏳️‍🌈🌈🏳️‍🌈🌈🏳️‍🌈


Also I lean towards guys more ",bisexual
Bi woman potentially dating trans for first time and need help,"I'm asking this question here because (through extensive lurking) I've found that there are people on this sub that might be in a position to answer my question - but if I'm in the wrong place, please remove/let me know and I'll direct my question to a more suitable sub.

&amp;#x200B;

I've come out quite late in life as bi woman and have very little exposure to the lgbt+ culture and have been dating other woman through dating apps.

&amp;#x200B;

I've recently connected with a woman who has just told me she is trans.  This is the first time I have been in this situation or met anyone that has identified to me that they are trans.  After brief self reflection, this doesn't bother me.

&amp;#x200B;

My big question here is - how do I respectfully ask her what her current situation is?  I guess specifically in terms of pre/post op., hormones, how this would affect a relationship etc.  She says she has kids, so I'm assuming that was from before she transitioned.  

&amp;#x200B;

I don't want to accidentally use offensive terms or ask anything that would be considered rude.  Also, is there anything that I should know that might be different from dating a cis woman so that I don't look like an idiot?

&amp;#x200B;

I will likely be talking about this things with her directly but want to make sure I'm not saying it in the wrong way.  I appreciate any feedback.",bisexual
A happy moment,"I’m a bisexual who is closeted in most situations, but I’m out in a certain community. Recently, I had the happiest moment in that community when a friend came out to me as bi as well, and I just wanted to share the good vibes. Bisexuality is wonderful! ",bisexual
It’s like they’re asking us to advertise bisexuality,,bisexual
Its my cake day and I forgot to get lemon bars,"This is so sad, Alexa, play despacito 😔",bisexual
Can everyone add their gender/age next to them.,"Make a custom flare pls. It makes it a lot easier with advice. Thx 


Edit: pls put if ur out or not aswell. (If ur comfortable with that)",bisexual
( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°) a w'hole'some meme to start off the day,,bisexual
Came Out to 3 People!,"I've been lurking about in this subreddit for a few weeks now, and it's given me the confidence to come out! (Only to 3 people though). Thanks to all!",bisexual
"I came out to my best friend, the only person who knows now.","It went amazingly! She was so supportive and happy. She asked if I was seeing this girl I recently became friends with, which I am. She was excited for me and so so fucking cool about it. I feel so much better that someone close to me knows, and that I can actually talk about it and the girl I’m seeing. Now i have to pluck up the courage to tell my family. ",bisexual
I'm genuinely scared...,"Well, far-right candidate Bolsonaro just won the brazilian presidential elections. Many of you probably heard about how he proudly says he's homophobic, or other racist and misogynist things he said. I'm not afraid of him, but his hate speech has infected tons of brazilians, and I'm afraid of those people.

I never came out officially, and it's easy for me to hide since I look and act like what would be the ""normal straight guy"". But even then, I feel like we're not safe anymore. These people now have an elected leader who attacks minorities, so they feel free to do and say whatever they want.

I'm mostly afraid for my friends. Most of them cried a lot already and are afraid of leaving their houses, since there are a lot of groups celebrating his victory on the streets.

Wish us luck, we will need it.",bisexual
Some ginger cunt on my school bus wants me to prove I'm bi. How do i shut him up?,,bisexual
How to tell my drifter father that I'm Bi?,"Obligatory ""excuse the format, I'm on mobile.""

So far, I've come out to my mother, my stepfather, and my ex-stepmother, who I still have a good relationship with. They've all been very accepting (minus my stepfather thinking it's a phase, but that's something I expected when I came out), but I still have yet to tell my biological father about my sexuality.

My dad and I have a...complicated relationship. It's not that we hate each other, we just don't talk as often as we'd like to. And since he tends to bounce around the state, I never know where he's living or what he's doing. The only time I ever hear about him is on Facebook, but ever since I've friended him when I was in high school, it's been filled with conspiracy theories and pro-Trump rhetoric.

Recently, I've started talking to this girl, and I could see myself getting serious with her. I want to tell him before that happens, because family matters to me, and I don't want to keep this ""secret"" from him anymore. I don't want the next time I see him to be when I have him meet my (possible) girlfriend. But at the same time, I don't know how he'll react, and I don't know if he can keep my sexuality to himself until I feel more comfortable telling the rest of my family. Where do I even start with tell him? Should I even bother telling him?",bisexual
Im 22M just came out to my best friend yesterday that im bi,"It was such a good feeling, we've been friends for about 10 years, been through good times and bad times but he's always had my back, but i was extremely worried to come out and tell him, i didnt want to lose my best friend if he thought i was some kind of weirdo, we're both from communities that are very conservative so i was worried for the worst. Anyways i finally worked up the courage to tell him and it was so liberating, i dont have any feelings for him other that friendship but it feels good to be able to be truthful and more myself around my best friend, he was extremely supportive and assured me that nothing like that would ever come between us being best friends. idk i feel like im rambling sorry im just very happy hahaha🤣 ",bisexual
"What song do you hear and think ""this is really bi.""?","Tell me some of your favourite songs that you associate with bisexuality, even if it's not really about it maybe it just has a special meaning to you?   
I like to find new music, so I'd be interested to know.",bisexual
Coming Out to Wife?,"This one is kind of complicated.  I've been with my wife for 13 years.  She recently asked for a divorce (not the first time.)  Since then, I started therapy (first time) and it's been great.  I've been able to tell my psychologist that I'm pan and it's been such a relief.  Now the twists.  My wife doesn't know about my sexuality or at least I haven't told her about it.  I come across as a typical straight, cis male.  My wife also just agreed to go to couples therapy.  My internal struggle is, do I let her go and feel free to live as who I truly am or do I tell her about my sexuality and risk pushing her away further just as there may be hope?",bisexual
Reversing Bierasure,"Next time someone pretends we're not part of LGBT spaces remind them we are LGBT. 

LonelyAss. GreatAss. Badass. TwistedAss.",bisexual
Thinking about coming out to my parents (19y.o.),"Im thinking about coming out to my parents, they're not homophobic but they dont want me to be anything but straight because we live in a place where that sort of thing is frowned upon, and they dont want any sort of backlash. Im 19 btw. What were your experiences with this? Any sort of helpful tips?",bisexual
TIL,"my parents being phobic (actually my dad just couldn't give a crap) and refusing to introduce me to diversity backfired BLISSFULLY in a way that i never internalised their hate for starters

so by the time i reached puberty i never thought it was weird to find girls hot as well, it just came naturally to me

lesson of the day never raise children",bisexual
A smol Rant,"Anyone else feel being LGBTQ+ is tiresome? Being bi makes me really indecisive and I dont know if thats the same for every Bi. I also feel that Ill never really find true love or just fuck up my life and end up kms. I've also been more sexually attracted to males(18 M here) but have always wanted a wife and a family. I've always romanticized the feeling of having a girlfriend and kissing under the rain but never really get turned on by females.

Have ya'll ever wondered of this alternate universe where everything considered abnormal here is normal there. Basically being LGBTQ would be the majority?

Also doesn't anyone here wonder how different their lives would've been if they were just straight. I feel like i would be way less insecure since I would have to care only about what females think of me and not males. Also i feel i might be more social and can talk to people easily(I'm socially award). And i feel like i have the fear of being alone.

Sorry for this rant, just wanted it out there :/",bisexual
I feel like Tinder has made me question my sexuality recently,I’m a bisexual female who often scrolls on Tinder but recently I cannot find ANY males who I find attractive. I can’t help but laugh because know I’m bisexual but the lack of selection makes me wonder if they aren’t any good looking guys or if there is a reason I’m not attracted to any of them! Just a thought :) ,bisexual
Advice needed :),,bisexual
How to change flair.,,bisexual
Could use some advice,"So I'm brand new to r/bisexual, and I came out to my parents last year. My mom was a bit shocked at first but now she accepts me for who I am. My dad on the other hand is fairly religious and tried as much as he could to tell me that I wasn't bi. The reason I'm bringing this up now is that I've started attending a religious college (my mom requested that I attend here and out of love and respect I decided to honor that), and it's been difficult to have all these people around me openly discuss homosexuality as a sin. It feels like I'm surrounded by my father's words constantly, when I went to college to get away from that (and to gain an education, of course, I want to be a better artist). I know that it isn't a sin and that people judge so harshly without understanding me as a person, but it's still been hard adjusting to this. Probably a good 98% of the school is this one religion, so I haven't met anyone who would agree with me religiously (I'm an agnostic atheist). So...any advice? How should I handle this? Should I drop out, or consider changing schools? Or just keep ignoring everyone? Even just some comforting words would be great. From what I can see everyone in this subreddit is loving and accepting, and it means so much that I've come here. Thanks :)

TL:DR - Attending a religious college, the way people talk about homosexuality reminds me of how my dad won't accept me as bi. I'm happy with who I am, but it's been hard being bi with nobody knowing. Any advice?",bisexual
Identity issues,"I’m a bi woman married to another Bi woman. I’ve identified as bi for quite a few years now and prefer women. I’ve been trying to get in more WLW spaces and learning more about wlw culture but I feel sometimes so ostracized by other people in the wlw community, because I’m Bi. I used to say I was femme and now I’ve been leaning toward futch or butch in the way I dress and appear (I’m more comfortable that way, it feels natural) but I’ve been seeing on social media (mainly twitter) that I’m not allowed to identify as butch because I’m not a lesbian. 

Do we, as bi women who mainly like other women (obviously including trans women), not have identifiers like butch, femme, etc? Are we not allowed to use those words? ",bisexual
So there's this one girl,"I like her, and I think that she likes me. We have a lot in common, and she seems like the kind of person that I could fall in love with if we were to be in a relationship together.

Here's the problem - I'm leaving town to go to college next September (August, really) and she's staying. I've already told myself that I'm not going to let anything hold me back from getting the most out of college, as it's a degree that I'm passionate about. So my instinct is to not ask this girl out, even though there could be something there, as we'd be on borrowed time and we could both get hurt in the end (I don't think that long distance relationships are a good idea so we'd have to break up). But I like her, and I'm kinda lonely, and next year is a while away... plus if she does like me, and she asks me out, I don't think that I could turn her down...

So what do I do? I really don't want to be selfish about this but I don't want to try to ignore this and be all emo if there's the potential for happiness there, however temporary.",bisexual
Coming out to my friends story,"So I have been straight for the most part of my life and my friends have known me as that, dated multiple women and kind of a masculine athletic guy. Not until recently I have realized my attraction for men and had my first hook up. I had told a few people but that was it and I kid of assumed after that word had got out. Fast forward to a “game night” with some friends playing never have I ever, certain people were asking homosexual questions(only about 2 people in this group I had told about it) and I felt those questions were aimed towards me. One question came up asking has anyone ever had homosexual sex and I wanted to stop feeling paranoid and just tell everyone. I told everyone that I did it and immediately felt weird after. Most of them seemed shocked and it seemed like I had halted the fun to a stop. I looked around to see if anyone had a problem with it and it seemed to enhance the awkwardness. After this event some friends have poked fun behind my back and act weird around me now. Is this normal? Is this a terrible outcome for me coming out? Need advice for how o move forward ",bisexual
Bisexual men: is it possible to be gay and have no idea?,"I will try to keep this as succinct as possible.

&amp;#x200B;

For 25 years I considered myself straight. Growing up in middle school and high school I would spend all day staring at girls in the class, having sexual fantasies, going home and jerking off. Around the age of 12 I found porn, and went pretty heavy on it.

&amp;#x200B;

Growing up I also had men in my life I would form close bonds to--a sort of friendship that went beyond friendship into admiration and something I couldn't describe. But I never felt any sexual TENSION with these guys. I never had a single sexual fantasy or looked at gay porn or anything.

&amp;#x200B;

Lately I've been having a sort of spiritual awakening through the help of a mentor of sorts. He insisted I was gay and had no idea, he says when I am around women I don't actually like them. But I have felt strong sexual tension with men, I just didn't understand it before. 

&amp;#x200B;

This is a complete 180 from how I viewed myself my entire life--as 100%, unequivocally straight. He insists I am overcompensating.

&amp;#x200B;

But there are times where I recall having strong sexual tension with women--but lately, that has been going away. I no longer can have fantasies at all or even masturbate--when I am around women, I barely get aroused, and around men I can feel something. I have had sexual experiences with men, but I never felt any sense of sexual release. It was more of an emotional one, but I never got aroused or felt like getting off. There are also plenty of experiences I disliked with men, and I remember kissing a man and being repulsed.

&amp;#x200B;

I am extremely confused at this point. I wonder how much of this is psychological--is it possible that all of the sex drive I felt for women for so long was a lie? That's what he says, but I can't help but wonder if this runs deeper. I wonder if I am bisexual in a way, and that my preferences have changed, or if I am stressing so much about being ""Gay"" that I am causing that to happen in my own mind.

&amp;#x200B;

I would love to hear the experiences of bisexual men here. Does this sound familiar? Is it really possible to have such strong attraction to one sex for 20 years, but in fact it was just ""conditioning,"" and you are a totally different orientation?

&amp;#x200B;

I've never heard of any gay men talk about this. It seems like something pretty black and white.",bisexual
Should I (f27) tell my new friend I have a crush on her?," 

I have been in a serious mf relationship for almost 5 years. In the past two years I came out as bisexual to my boyfriend and we have been navigated our version of non-monogamy. While at first we considered us ""open"", I have struggled with the idea of him actually dating another woman. The idea of just sex doesn't bother me at all to be honest (we have slept with other people together randomly in the past) But I don't exactly trust other women and I can be insecure with communication that I don't know about. Our relationship has evolved into me be primarily seeking women while being up front about having a partner and I have brought a woman into our sex life before. While I have been worried about being selfish or a hypocrite in our relationship because I am the one who actively searches, or at least has had other partners and relations (only with women and while bringing him into them at points) he assures me that he is completely happy with the situation and feels fulfilled and happy to let me explore my sexuality. Of course, if a girlfriend situation were to happen I would welcome it, and he would totally support me having a girlfriend. And for what it's worth I have recently started asking if he thinks any women are special or would want to take them out, and we talk about it and I am getting to a new comfort level! I consider this a win!

So, the other woman I have slept with in the past year is amazing and I have feelings for her, but she also is in a serious relationship and we just aren't ever going to go emotionally deeper. Which I have battled feelings of disappointment over, but mostly I just want to find a female connection where I could potentially be vulnerable and fall in love with. I am still great friends with this woman, and we do share a flirty connection, but I have had to compartmentalize that in my heart and head, and I respect it.

Well, in the past week I met a woman at a party while out with my bf and our friends and we just immediately hit it off. I had attraction, but I have attraction to a lot of women, and I am pretty sensitive to not be like forward, or weird, because I like making new friends and definitely don't want to come off as predatory or creepy. She is 7 years younger than me, but there is no maturity issue, we get each others' humor and overall I am just really really interested in her. It's a little overwhelming, this crush I have, and I have told my bf about it, and he thinks it's amazing and that I should make a move. I am very apprehensive. While my heart tells me I am picking up on vibes, my head keeps telling me that I can't just delude myself into a relationship just because it would make my heart happy. This woman, let's call her Eden, has shown major interest in getting to know me, she is genuine and cool and really smart and just an overall dream - a great person. I have only pursued relationships through sites/apps with the conversation starting with the immediate recognition of ""what I'm looking for"". I have never ""come onto"" another woman that I didn't already have an understanding with or who didn't already know I was bi and wanting a girlfriend.

I don't find myself to be delusional in relationships, I actually think I am quite intuitive and can definitely tell when someone is into me. But I feel in a gray area. While I want to continue a friendship - we have plans soon to hang out again - I have this overwhelming need to tell her I am interested in her romantically. I HAVE NEVER NAVIGATED THIS and am pretty nervous about it. I could just let it go, but there is just something about her that I just reallly really like and a basic friendship may not be enough for me. I need advice. How do I know if I am living in delusion? How do I know ""the signs"" I am a novice bisexual and scared to lose a friend/feel embarrassed. My bf keeps saying that you miss 100% of the shots you don't take, but I also don't want to feel the disappoint of being completely obtuse to someone's feelings.

Any advice is helpful, and I am sorry if I am being insensitive, am not saying things correctly, I am new to all of this and just looking for a little help! Thank you!",bisexual
in love at 15?,"
okay so first of all i think i’m  bi, idk if that’s like weird but i’ve never been comfortable w that myself. it makes me feel so confused because i have this constant feeling that it’s not possible to be attracted to both genders and i hate that feeling but anyways there’s this girl she goes to my school but she’s just a grade below me. so we became friends almost 2 years ago but we were never that close bc she had this toxic best friend that probably made her hate me at some point even tho me and her best friend were close. a year later they stopped being friends and me and her got closer, whenever were alone i could swear sometimes i’d think she likes me too i get way too shy to talk to her in school so we mostly talk when we hangout or on text and it seems like she’s shy to come up to me and there’d be weird signs that our friendship is different than my other ones and probably hers too. she also told me she was bi. but i doubt she does could like me since she sees me as her friend and she herself said that i guess? i never told her i had feelings for her but at some point i did tell her i used to have a tiny crush on her in the past and she seemed so okay with it, not creeped out at all and we probably became closer after it and she never brought it up. i think it is a possibility she could find out i like her since i still get shy and awkward around her till this day with us being close and all but same kinda goes for her. i know she sees me as a friend though so i doubt it could ever happen but i know she finds me attractive. i’m so in love with her it hurts so much she means the world to me there’s not one second of every day that i do not think of her. it’s gotten so much because at first it was a small crush a year and a half ago but now i think i’m in love. everyday that passes by i think i like her more if that’s even possible at this point. this girl drives me crazy i wanna kill myself cause of her but at the same time she’s the only reason i wanna live. i overthink sooo fucking much about the tiniest situations between us that could mean nothing to her but would hurt me or would make me so happy if that makes sense. it just feels so special whenever we’re alone together, every time i touch her it’s like fireworks igniting in my whole body oh my god i don’t know how she’d react if i confessed but i don’t wanna risk ruining our friendship ",bisexual
I can't get rid of my feelings for my best friend...,"I apologise for the super long post but I needed somewhere to rant and this seemed like a good place for this. I (22F) have feelings for my best friend (also 22F) that have basically lingered for around 9-10 years. When we were 12, we both had crushes on each other. We kissed a few times but that was it. We were really close though. In highschool, we hung out with different people during school most the time, but we still hung out at times after school. She got a boyfriend and we were still close (almost too close at times, like cuddling, sitting really close together, and hand holding). 

While she was with this guy, that stuff continued which I think caused my feelings to continue existing but I didn't act on or say anything because she had a boyfriend and I was still not sure of myself. I came out as bi to her in our freshman year of college when I had a crush on another girl and she didn't give any indication of also being bi or anything at the time. The crush on her faded a little and I didn't really pay attention to to it as I was focused on my new crush (which went nowhere).

In our junior year of college, her and her boyfriend split up and she came out as bi to some of her friends. I noticed that, at the same time, all of the hand holding and sitting close to each other and cuddling stopped. I missed it a little but didn't pay too much attention to it since I was not really thinking of my feelings for her (the crush wasn't really back at this time) and we went to different colleges so I was able to escape them when not visiting her. At this time, I was kind of jealous of her roommate as they were close and I felt left behind but I guess that is what happens when you go to different schools.

During the summer, her roommate screwed her over with Senior year living arrangements and their friendship feel apart. My best friend was having a hard time as she never got an answer from the other girl as to what happened (the other girl basically cancelled the plans and flaked). That mixed with the breakup from the previous year, my best friend was hurting and I wanted to be there for her. My crush started to return but I tried to bury it. 

Senior year comes around and I get hit hard with my feelings for her again. I didn't want to say anything and wanted to see if any of the old physical closeness was there (sitting close to her for example) but she would move away and never initate it. I stopped rather quick as I figured there was no way she had feelings for me. I tried to rid myself of these feelings as we agreed to move in with each other after graduation and I didn't want to ruin that as she is still my best friend. 

Having now graduated college and living in a house with her, I don't know what to do. For the last 11 or so months, I haven't been able to get over my feelings. And I don't feel as if she has any for me in that way due to signs I've picked up. I also value our friendship too much to possibly ruin it by admitting my feelings to her but I'm afraid I will blurt it out to her one day if I can't get over her. I had a dream the other night of me doing so but I woke up some after and don't know what happened (not like it would have mattered as it would have been my subconscious anyway). I don't think it would ruin the friendship all together but I don't want to make things awkward as her parents thought the reason her roommate got all weird was because maybe she had feelings for her. 

I just feel like it's really hard to get over considering I have kind of felt this way since middle/high school and I'm now a college graduate who is almost desperate for a girlfriend. I keep thinking that getting out there and getting a girlfriend (or boyfriend) would make these feelings go away (maybe I'm just projecting my feelings onto her since I'm alone) but I'm afraid of getting with someone and not getting over her as that wouldn't be fair to them. I'm just a total mess.

Anyway, I mainly just wanted to get this off my chest as I have kept it bottled up for way too long. I don't expect anyone to really read this super long post but if you did, thank you. I've been contemplating this post for days but was afraid as she mentioned possibly creating an account to follow this subreddit. But I figured, even if she recognized my username (or the story if this had been a throwaway), I needed it off my chest so it didn't matter. I just didn't have anyone else to talk to about this as I'm not exactly out to many people.",bisexual
Update on straight friend,You can read my old post from 4 days ago. As soon as I start to pull away she makes it more serious. Now she wants to go to a fully nude female stripclub ... and when I call she answers first ring. I have done lunch with her now twice this week- she usually will decline invitations as she’s a homebody but she has taken me up and lingered a long time- two hours at lunch the other day. She keeps on sustaining deep eye contact- almost flirty. How do I take this to the next level? I get that she is turned off to pussy but why would she want to go to a strip club? I am playing like I am straight because I don’t want to scare her...  but I know I want her fully... I am in love with her. ,bisexual
Someone said the Bi flag was ugly,They said something like thats my least favorite flag  part of the reason i say im pansexual instead of bisexual,bisexual
"that moment when youre like ""nope not straight""","27F, married for a little bit. had talked to the hubs about exploring and diving into my possible female attraction. He was cool with it and I created a tinder.

 Had a couple of matches, but this one girl and I really hit it off. She was okay with my no female experience and the fact Im in an open relationship. hung out a couple of nights, one of which we made out. It was my first time kissing and making out with a girl and it was amazing. It solidified everything I hoped and dreamed it would be. 

Only my husband, her and well now reddit knows about this and I'm okay with that for now. But def got encourage to persue this part of me from this sub. So for that I thank you!",bisexual
Dudes I’m bored and curious...,"I was at a party and was playing truth or dare, being the only Bisexual got asked to list my favourite sexual body parts in order... I thought for a second and was like Boobs, butt, dick, puss, ballz... Lol I’m bored and curious would anyone else mind telling me what the like in order? Like also I mean it in a more aesthetically/sexy way like what parts are more fun to look at? Am I weird for asking this? ",bisexual
Bi slang??,I know there are lebsian slang and gay slang. And there are some same-sex slang that applies to bisexuals too but is there any Bi slang?,bisexual
The bi-cycle sucks,"I'm a woman married to a man. But I'm entering a part of the bi-cycle where I'm mostly into women. Sometimes it's not too bad or doesn't last too long. But it's unpredictable. If I was with a woman I'd have the same issue. Why is being bi so difficult sometimes? Also, all of the news lately sucks and I guess I'm just feeling super down today.",bisexual
Should I come out to my family?,"Hi beloved people,

A bit of background. My mom is really religious and does not approve same-sex relationships, until my stepbrother came out as gay, at first she really did not approve and even asked them not to kiss infront of her. She would always complain about them at me. Fast forward 10 years later (now) 

She loves my stepbrother and his partner. She never says anything negative about him being gay, she really tried to understand them and loose her small minded opinions about being gay. She apologized to him and all is good now. 

But still, I am really scared to come out, because of her reaction at first, they live abroad so I barely see them, so I don’t want to ruin the relationship, because I really love her. 

All my friends know, my siblings know, everyone knows but her and my stepdad (he is amazing and wouldn’t give one shit). 

I am not dating anyone atm, but if I got a GF I would definitely tell her, because I don’t want to hide it, but should I tell her? Regardless I am not dating a girl? Or should I wait until I have a GF?

I am just scared I guess 

(My dad is not around, only mom and stepdad)",bisexual
A awkward position to be in...,When you have a crush on your straight friend and he is super cute and you just want him to be yours to cuddle and love but you also have a crush on his girlfriend and legit you see them holding hands together and legit start dying from a overdose of cuteness and jealousy! LIKE OMG I CANT FIGURE OUT WHO IS CUTER! ,bisexual
Sounds like something I'd say.,,bisexual
Advice?,"I have only been in relationships with men but identify as bi.  The guy I am seeing for about a month talks frequently about wanting a 3-some, something I’ve never done.  It’s a nice “fantasy” but the reality is I have a lot of concerns both psychologically and in terms of health/exposure.  Especially the psychological.  But he says “there are no guarantees in life, even if you’re married someone can always run off with the secretary.”  I don’t know anymore, I’m starting to feel like I’m just an object to be used and like my feelings don’t matter so much.  I haven’t even had time to build a solid relationship with this person; while I do like him a quite a lot, his compliments of me are almost entirely physical attributes.  Perhaps we’re not compatible?  I’m looking for some advice.  I am a truly romantic and sensitive person with a lot of feelings and I don’t want to give my heart to someone if they are kind of just using me to fulfill their fantasies.   He’s respectful and kind but seems to need or want an “adventurous” relationship; I’m intrigued but also pretty sure that likely I could end up feeling hurt or used.  Thoughts?  I’ve not been with someone who was so eager for adding more people.  It doesn’t make me feel very special?  ",bisexual
Lets get one thing straight,LGBT= Lets Get Bread Today,bisexual
All it takes is a misplaced “dash” or “space” to tell someone straight up doesn’t get bisexuality:,"I knew the conversation was downhill from there when one of my gay friends started his message  to me with spelling like “pan sexual” and “bi-sexual”. 

Downhill a bit further and I got schooled on how “identifying” is not the same as “being”, that if you live a “mainly hetero” life and are only “sometimes bi” then you are just a straight person who sometimes like the same sex. And that that is just identifying, and not *being*. 

Wow, I never knew there were part-time bisexuals, or occasionally bi bisexuals. I never heard of a part-time gay??

Friendly reminder: your sexual *conduct* does not define your sexual *orientation*. 

PSA: gay brothers and sisters - help us be fuller time bisexuals and add us to your “will date” criteria. We are friendly accepting folks who make great partners. Pro tip: lose a few spaces and dashes in all the right places and we might just love you forever. ",bisexual
I'm finally realizing that I'm a 20-year-old bisexual male - and that's okay,"So as the title says - I'm a 20-year-old bisexual male. Even just typing that seems strange. I guess I've always questioned my sexuality - wondering why I was only attracted to girls. I mean - I didn't see why I wouldn't be attracted to men - there are a lot of handsome fellas out there. Well now I'm starting to realize that I always was attracted to men aswell - I just hid it from myself bcause it didn't seem right - it seemed abnormal and weird.

Now I'm at a place where I'm finally realizing that my sexual satisfaction is not limited to that of a beautiful girl with tits to kill for - I can find just as much pleasure in a wonderful cock. 

Then there is just the complications of coming out to friends and family. It just seems unconquerable. I mean I have already talked about it with my wonderful suportive girlfriend - and that was amazing. But other than her, only my best friend knows. It would just be so much easier if you could come out to everyone you know at the same time - you know just rip the bandaid off. It is just so hard to explain - and worse when you are not sure how they will react. 

Even just putting a label on myself seems hard. I mean I identify as a bisexual male, but I have a strong feminine side that is definitely a part of me. I mean feel completely comfortable being male - I just can't call myself 100% male - there is definitely some female side to me. This makes choosing a label that feel comfortable really hard - and maybe that just goes to show that theese things are not applicable to labels and are always a spectrum of sorts. 

I hope some of all this mess makes any sense to you - it is finally somewhat starting to make sense in my head.

TLDR; I'm I a man, but not only and entirely a man, that think pussies are wonderful &amp; wet and cocks are perfect and hard - and finds pleasure in both. And for the very first time in my life I'm comfortably admitting that. I didn't even feel the need to use a throwaway account!  ",bisexual
Cards Against Humanity gets us,,bisexual
I'm just leaving this here incase anyone hasn't seen the new Sabrina show 🤤,,bisexual
"My friend told me hes straight, yet I have a feeling...","I made an awesome and very attractive friend about a month ago, and I can't stop thinking  about him. He is such a kind, funny, intense and sensitive dude, that even after seeing each other twice, I feel we have a wonderful, incredible connection between us! But here's the thing... I think he likes me a little more than even he may know. And I can't resist the thought!!

So on the first day we met, I initiated the affair. And on such day, he literally made  maybe about 7 or 8 comments about me being attractive. I'm a trans guy, so the first thought I had was maybe he subconsciously was noticing certain features on me that were somewhat feminine (I didn't tell him I was a transsexual till like 20 minutes before he left my place). On the second visit, we hugged like 4 times, and I remember quite clearly that he rubbed both my knees. He said sorry afterwards, I'm honestly getting turned on by the thought of it, feels lovely. Really don't want that to stop, even wish he'd do more to me!

Now Im not making any assumptions whatsoever, but this gut instinct of mine and the emotions I noticed in him kind of told me that he finds me more attractive than what he's saying. We became so close so fast, that in my heart I can't help but wonder if there's something more complex going on there... The second visit he actually showed up just to see me (or maybe not I don't remember, he lives a bit aways from me though)!

And no, I AM NOT ONE WHO BELIEVES THAT SOMEONE CAN BE CONVERTED WHEN THEY ALREADY POSSESS ONE SEXUALITY, THATS A LOADDA HORSE SHIT! Just this feeling that theres something subliminal he's conveying. But if not, no swear off my sack (the sack I wish was there!!).
",bisexual
I have a huge issue,Im too gay for sports but not gay enough for musicals. What do?,bisexual
I’m not ready for a gay relationship,"I’m 14 and  male. I know I’ve known I’m bi for abt 5 months, and im out to practically all my friends (not parents) I was asked out my some of my friends that are gay, but I rejected them. I don’t feel like I could be able to be in an open same sex relationship. My school is rlly supportive of the lgbt community so I’m not afraid of being bullied. I feel like it’s important to mention that I’ve never had a girlfriend either. But, I’m completely down with a gf. Not a bf tho. Does this mean something, am I a valid bi guy? (My ratio is like 60 straight 40 gay btw)
",bisexual
I might be aromantic???,So I'm starting to think I maybe aromantic??? Because I have never felt romantic love for anyone and I'm starting a new relationship with a guy who 100% accepts my bisexuality but I'm not sure how he would take this too ,bisexual
lesbian questioning might be bisexual,"Hey you guys I am a 21 year old lesbian! Or so I thought. Lately i've been questioning wether I am a Lesbian or just Bisexual with a preference for women. 

 I am a bit terrified because I have grown so attached to the Lesbian label. So being bisexual is a whole new ballgame.

&amp;#x200B;

I know I am attracted to women from a young age. But lately I have been remembering I also had a lot of crushes on male celebrities growing up and even as a preteen. My attraction to women was just so much stronger so I began identifying as a lesbian. I've avoided questioning my sexuality, but there have been several instances where I think I have experiences sexual and even romantic attraction towards men. But I have ignored it i think due to biphobia.

&amp;#x200B;

When I was 16 I met this guy in my high school. We would joke around a lot and playfully punch each other. There were moments where we would look into each other eyes and smile. I wanted to kiss him, which freaked me out. But I wanted to. Eventually we would hold each others hands and he would playfully touch me or get closer. During these moments I would get so turned on and want to jump on him. I began checking him out and notice how good he looked in specific type of clothes and start fantasizing about what he could do to me. I began masturbating to the thought of him, something I had never done before. He began joking about sex with me and I would get incredibly horny. There was so much sexual tension. But it never led to anything so I ignored it and moved on to continue crushing on women and being attracted to women. I thought it was a one time thing or that my attraction was not valid.

&amp;#x200B;

Then it happened again at 20, I became attracted to a man. He was older than me and a coworker. I grew feelings for him which was shocking. Each time he was in the room i'd get sexual thoughts of him fucking me. He would wear these button up shirts with his chest hair showing and it would turn me on just looking at him. Id like it when he'd grow his beard out and I had the urge to kiss him several times. It would hurt to not be close to him. Again I masturbated to thoughts of what he could do to me. But again it never led to anything. 

&amp;#x200B;

And again I ignored it. I continued to date women, be with them. It was easier. I eventually made a tinder and for some reason I chose both genders. I decided i'm going to experiment with men. Well I met this guy made out with him and felt nothing, so I guess i said, well that was a phase. But something told me I should try it again, with someone I actually found attractive. So i went on a different date with a guy, several dates and each time we would be close he would turn me on like crazy. I wanted to kiss him and have sex with him by the second date. I was incredibly turned on each time we would make out. Again it never led to anything as a pussied out. But god did I want to.

&amp;#x200B;

Do I sound bisexual? My attraction to men is surfacing in my early 20's? Ima bit terrfied as I have been identifying as a lesbian for most of my life. I feel like a fraud. 

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
Me realizing I am bisexual,"Hi there, first time poster here, please enjoy my rambles.

&amp;#x200B;

When I was a little boy, I never really had any doubts about being completely straight; wanting nothing but a pretty gf. Now not only did this not work out (damn you shyness) but I during \*research\* on the internet I sometimes ended on male only videos.

&amp;#x200B;

At that time I still saw myself as straight, just desperate. At 19 I got my first gf, which did not exactly end well. Shortly after I had my first gay experience with an acquaintance (I ended it after maybe two weeks of casually getting off). Two rather long term girlfriends later, I kept thinking that maybe I had been hasty ending things with him. 

&amp;#x200B;

He was in a relationship at the time, but set me up with a friend of his and we hit it off. We dated for about six months before breaking up on friendly terms. 

&amp;#x200B;

At the moment I am 24, single, finally sure about my orientation and proudly bi.",bisexual
I came out to an old friend the other day.,"I’m a 24 year old male who recently accepted his bisexuality. There’s a girl who I’ve been friends with since middle school who I knew would understand. Among other reasons, I know she’s pansexual and I felt really comfortable telling her so I did. I’ve gotta say... I never thought I’d tell anyone at all. I was perfectly content keeping it to myself for the rest of my life but I figured what the hell. It’s a strange feeling... but a great one. Anyway, I just thought I’d share. ",bisexual
18(M4C) Is it too early for me to come out as bisexual?," Hello all, I am a bisexual girl, 18 y/o, And now I want to have a nice  bi girl, and I join some bisexual dating sites, such as okc,her, tinder,  [women looking for couples](https://www.womenlookingforcouples.com/),  actually, I met some bisexual friends, but they always say: You are  young!!! I am very confused, Is it too early for me to come out as  bisexual? ",bisexual
A Ranty Type Question!,"Hello everyone! 

I'm a closeted 20 year old Bi guy. Of late I've kinda been noticing that even though Women show interest in me(not bragging lol) I somehow seem to reject them and not consider any idea of a relationship. I'm mostly into Women but like Men too especially Dick( Sorry if it's TMI lol). When I decided to think about why the reason I avoid women and getting into a relationship with them...I narrowed it down mostly to ""acceptance""...which brings me to my question.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm quite dominant with women and I like it but I dont know what it is about Men specially Dick that makes me want to be soooo submissive (Sorry for tmi again lol). My question is...are there Women out there that might find this attractive or sexy? I dont want someone to just ""accept"" this part...I want a Woman to be excited by this and for us to explore this together. I want someone to be excited about my ""submissive"" side and not just merely ""accept"" it as if it were a crime. Are there dominant women who get turned on by a switch Bi guy and the idea of exploration together in this world? :/",bisexual
Accidentally Came Out lol,"I was at my friends house and we were playing drinking games. It was “never have I ever been attracted to a girl” and I mindlessly drank. I immediately was like oh shit wait can I take it back, in my head. Anyways I think it’s super funny, but I feel kinda bad because I always wanted to tell my best friend first. I know she’d be fine with it and even get a kick out of it (she’s gay), but I’m not sure if I’m ready to tell her- but other people already know. Any thoughts on what I should do?",bisexual
I'm absolutely disgusted with myself and I have been ever since I knew I liked both men and women.,"It even pains me to write this. It makes me feel sick. It makes me cringe. I hate saying that I like both men and women. I've fallen hard for both men and women before. The first time I fell completely head over heels for a boy was when I was 13. The first time I really really really liked a girl was when I was 17. I always knew I liked girls, even at the age of 4. In fact my first crush I ever had was on a girl named Megan in Catholic school. I didn't know what this was called until high school and I didn't know other people felt this way. I'm still disgusted with myself for feeling this way and I know my parents would not be happy about this. At all. Any of you guys have any advice on how to get over this feeling? It sucks and I don't want to feel this way about myself. I've always wished I just liked one gender. Either man or woman. One or the other but not both. I feel like it causes more problems. ",bisexual
Why is it a joke?,,bisexual
caught between crush &amp; boyfriend,"I've been dating a guy for abt a year and a half and I'm super into him, but I have a crush on my friend, too. I didn't used to, but I've just kind of grown into liking her as more than a friend. We went to a party together this weekend, but I found out that she has a crush on someone else (a mutual friend of ours who also has a very long-term boyfriend) and, even though I want to stay with my boyfriend, I can't help but be hurt. She was grinding on this other girl all night and I know I don't have much of a right to be hurt but I can't help my feelings for her. I feel stuck bc I can't talk to my boyfriend about it and no one knows that I'm queer (this is really the first time I've had a crush on a girl and I think it's made me finally ready to come out to myself). I just can't shake the feeling of jealousy of the other girl and guilt for having a crush anyway and have been kind of glum all day. I think maybe I should spend some time away from her? I don't really know what to do with all these feelings

TL;DR I'm in a long-term relationship with a boy but have a crush on my close girl friend, but she has a crush on another girl friend of ours and I'm (wrongfully?) jealous",bisexual
"Hey Guys, I'm Yan, a 4th year UCLA Student-Athlete and I made a rap video my struggles to try to understand my sexuality. Please check it out and let me know what you think! Link below, enjoy!",[https://youtu.be/Riu-3k40Zug](https://youtu.be/Riu-3k40Zug) (&lt;-----)Link,bisexual
Just came out to my sister!,"Me and my sister are four years apart. I’m 20 and she’s 16 so she’s still in high school. Sorry if I’m like repeating myself I’m high and still processing it, I told her I’m bisexual and she in her own way said that it’s no big deal she loves me either way and won’t have to worry about me getting pregnant lol ",bisexual
NSFW-I'm having a really hard time with this,"And I guess I'm not sure why. I sort of came out of the closet in high school, when I started ""dating"" my best friend. We'd mess around and once had a threesome with my boyfriend (now my husband). He's ok with it, we've talked at length about it. He wants me to explore this side of myself. It was a messy breakup with my first girlfriend- she really hurt me, and I'm sure I hurt her. I kinda doubled down on my husband for years after that. If it came up I'd just say I liked it but I don't think it'll happen again. I'm pretty open in telling people that I dated a girl, but most people don't push for too much information.

 I haven't found myself very interested in sex for a while. Like, years. It's not really that I don't think it feels good- I just really have no interest. Sex feels a bit inconvenient. It's caused some strife in my marriage, but we've worked on it a lot in recent years. I started thinking to myself that teen me only acted like I liked sex to make boys like me (I have some sexual abuse in my history and it's manifested in some upsetting ways). And maybe I'm asexual. I don't think about it day to day, but I've been worried about it for a while. 

However, a few days ago my husband and I got on the topic of porn. (SORRY FOR THE TMI) And he ended up kinda introducing me to it. I'm probably way too old to be ""getting into"" porn, it's a little pathetic, but I think some of my past has led me to be very scared of sex and I have a habit of shutting down and I think I just block off anything unfamiliar. But I found myself very, very turned on by the lesbian stuff. Like, embarrassingly. Not so much by the straight stuff. 

The last couple nights we've had sex while watching lesbian porn and it's been amazing and I'm not sure why I'm having such a hard time with it. Afterwards I keep crying. This is the first time I've been thinking about sex without prompting for a very, very long time, if not the first time ever. 

I think I'm feeling like it's one thing to feel like girls are really pretty and want to kiss them, and a whole different bird to be feeling like I wanna fuck them. I don't know. I don't really have any close bi friends to talk to right now, I just switched jobs and am feeling a little isolated I guess. My husband has been wonderful and so supportive, but not I'm just wondering if I'm 100% gay and I'm just really conflicted. ",bisexual
Any other bi girls get assumed to be “actually straight” because of this? 😒 (Bar the last one),,bisexual
I feel like a fraud,"I haven't seen a man irl that made me aroused, I have seen fictional men (all furry/scalie) who have. If I'm not attracted to men irl but am attracted to fictional ones am I bi? Idk, probably not.",bisexual
"i’m just now coming out to myself, and some of my close friends","background: i(f15) can always remember just kinda staring at women, but not really thinking anything of it besides being a little embarrassed. i still like dudes and all, but i also wouldn’t mind being with a gal.

I’ve been lurking on here for about 2 days, and it’s really helped me solidify where i stand in terms of my sexuality. Yesterday i came out to a very gay friend of mine, and she said i should come out on my own terms. She was forced outed (i don’t really know the terminology here) to her mom by one of her friends, and understands what i’m feeling. Talking to her really helped me come more to terms to myself, and i’m ready to tell one of my closest friends, whom i’ve known since i was in kindergarten.

I don’t know if i’m ready to come out to my parents quite yet, but i live in a very gay-accepting city, and most of the kids i go to school with also go to the pride festival, so i’m not really worried about acceptance. I want to come out to both of my parents at the same time, but they’re divorced and i don’t think that they’re gonna be in the same place for quite some time. If anybody has suggestions, feel free to tell me. I’m pretty new to this whole thing, as one should be when coming out for the first time, and don’t really know what to do.",bisexual
"Hey y’all, just having my weekly emotional low, tell me about something to distract me. Tell me a high, tell me a low, or tell me some random thing that happened this week for you",,bisexual
am i bi,I really like the idea of loving a girl and being in a relationship with a girl and girls turn me on and I have had sex with a girl. Guys can be cute but straight guys annoy me alot sometimes so yeah I think I'm bi and I prefer girls like 80/20 but not sure tho I can't tell this is hard. hsjdkskmfms,bisexual
Well this is a bit of an existential crisis. I had my hair about this length when I truly came out and accepted myself. It's a coincidence I swear.,,bisexual
Came out as bi but still feeling unsettled,"So a little background - I am 29, married for 3.5 years but have been with my husband for almost 12 years. I did have a few male sexual partners prior to meeting him, and at that point in my life I never really thought about girls. I recently accepted that I am attracted to women, though I probably started having those feelings about 4 years ago, just never really wanted to delve into what it means.

I came out as bi to my husband about 3 weeks ago and I’m still feeling incredibly anxious and confused about everything. We have had our share of intimacy issues through the years and have had a very hot/cold sex life. We had been going through a bit of a rough patch in the bedroom lately and I have been surprised to find since I told him, it put some fire and fun back into sex for us. I have been desiring him much more lately, and feeling much more aroused at his desire for me. Overall on the emotional level we have been great partners to one another, and I never had any doubts about our compatibility until now.

I feel like lately I’m consumed by the fear that I am actually just a lesbian, and I’m finding it hard to think about anything else. As a result I feel like I can’t relax around my husband, whereas before this recent revelation we were getting along fine and having fun together. I guess in a way I’m afraid to explore this new part of my identity. I also understand that if I do eventually find out that I’m 100% gay, I can no longer be with my husband. Problem is I can’t stop thinking about it and now it’s making me feel off when we are together, which is almost all the time. When I look back on our years together, there have been many times I was totally and completely happy and had all the thoughts about growing old together. He has been so amazing through all of this, totally supportive of me, but I know to some degree he now has some doubts about our future together, as do I.

When I read other stories here it seems many of you who came out felt a sense of relief, and initially I did too. I’m not normally an anxious person but I have become one now. Ugh just struggling and wondering if anyone else has gone through this. I feel like all I can think about is women right now and hoping it’s just a bi-cycle which will level off soon.",bisexual
Whole new meaning to this song - Scott Hoying; BI BI BI,,bisexual
"Experimenting with dudes in the Lesbianville, U.S.A.","Alright guys, sorry in advance for being a little all over the place, I’m a bit confused. In more way than one.

Basically, I’ve been identifying as a lesbian for a few years now, had the tortured period of being in the closet and came out and had revelatory sex, the whole deal. I’ve never had a girlfriend or a crush, only hooked up, but I’ve felt pretty confident/comfortable in the gay lady label.

Until recently, I’d never had a wet dream, but in the past few weeks I’ve had a few wet dreams about dudes? They haven’t been about anyone I know—I go to a women’s college, which makes all this even more ironic—but they’ve been kind of intense which weirds me out because I’ve never thought of men sexually/romantically. Then again, I’d never thought of women sexually/romantically for the longest time either because I repressed so damn hard. So I’m starting to notice men more than I have in the past, and I’m not sure how I feel about that. My current mindset is: I know I like having sex with women and I’m... cautiously open to trying some stuff with a guy for the sake of figuring out whether this is just a fluke or whether it might actually be something.

So my question is, how do I explore this? I don’t have any male friends that I could just call up and ask to make out with. I don’t interact with a lot of men my age on a regular basis because I go to a women’s college, and because my town has something like 5 times more gay couples than the national average (so much so that it’s called Lesbianville U.S.A., for real). If I decide to act on my curiosity I’ll probably go online, but how do you make it clear on Tinder that you’re pretty sure you’re a lesbian but are willing to hook up with a dude unless you realise midway through that it’s not for you? Complicated stuff. My brain hurts and I’m horny all the time. Please help me r/bisexual, you’re my only hope!


TL;DR - Always thought I was a lesbian, still pretty sure I am. Willing to experiment but not sure how. Could use advice/encouragement/personal stories.",bisexual
I’m bihexual 🧙‍♀️🧙‍♂️,,bisexual
I really need help,"I’m 15(F) and my partner, also 15 and female messaged me last night. She said that she needs to get her life straight and she thinks we should split till then because she doesn’t want me messed up in it. I don’t know what to do or say and I won’t see her till tomorrow. I can’t just ignore her because this was like 13 hours ago and I still haven’t answered but she knows I saw it. I need to say something but I don’t know what.",bisexual
Does anyone know how to get over someone you’re attracted to?,"I’ve been attracted to this guy at school for a long time, and at this point I just can’t do it anymore. I think about him way too much, and he causes me to feel way too many emotions, too many of which are negative. I can’t deal with liking him anymore. He’s been gone on vacation all week, and I’m really scared of how I’ll feel seeing him at school tomorrow, so I want to get over my feelings for him. I have an idea of what might work, but it’s something I’d really rather not do, so I want to search for any alternate, less drastic ideas. If anyone has any tips on how to do this, any help would be greatly appreciated.",bisexual
I can't tell if I'm bi or straight,"I don't know my sexuality. I'm definitely sexually attracted to guys but I can't tell when it comes to girls. Seeing images of a naked girl can sometimes turn me on a bit, while a dick pic doesn't. I don't think i'm attracted to girls regularly but i can come across one i'm into. I always think many guys are attractive. I can imagine having sex/kissing with them but I don't know with females. Am I bi or straight (with some exceptions)? I'm really down to try anything.. does that make me bi-curious?",bisexual
Came out to myself and wife; Still lots of feelings,"Hi there,

I’m a 29(M) in a heterosexual marriage with kids. A week or two ago, somehow my wife and I got to talking about sexual preferences and I told her that I only recently realized that I don’t just think men can be attractive; I actually am attracted to them as well. I was scared to death because this has probably been the most difficult year of our marriage and I didn’t want to add any more complexity or challenges to it. She was very kind and didn’t shame me at all. She asked if I wanted to act on those feelings and I felt so many emotions. I love my wife with everything I am. She has fulfilled me sexually since the beginning of our marriage. But I now feel like there was a chapter in my book I didn’t even know was there and it has been ripped out completely. I don’t have any interest in leaving my wife or kids whatsoever. They are my everything. But I’m kicking myself because until a few months ago, I never realized I was truly attracted to both men and women. I grew up Mormon (but am not anymore) and always pushed down any kind of sexual feelings I had. Apparently, I was better at repressing those for men than women. 

I would like to experiment with men, but I don’t know how much more I can ask of my wife. She asked me to just be honest about how I’m feeling and not cheat on her, but I can’t help but feel like I’m cheating even thinking about having sex with a man. I’m not interested in completely emotionally invested in any other human than my wife, but I wish there was a way to fulfill the part of me that is attracted to men. I feel like even though I’m not in the closet with her, I’m trying to shove myself back in. And at the end of the day, my relationship with her matters more to me than anything else. 

I am also just feeling guilty in general because I have been an ally for the LGBTQIA+ community for several years now, and part of me feels like I don’t get to be part of that community because I’ve lived a strictly heterosexual life up to this point. 

Anyway, I know my situation is not unique, but any advice is appreciated. ",bisexual
How to watch the bi+ reality dating show The Bi Life on E! UK,"Hey if you guys want to watch E! UK’s 🇬🇧 reality bi+ dating show The Bi Life you can download Windscribe extension for Google Chrome and change your connection to United Kingdom. Then use this link (from Courtney Act’s instagram page)
to watch:

https://m.youtube.com/watch?feature=youtu.be&amp;v=88DRB9_riBs#menu",bisexual
"Me: saying men and women can't be friends is ridiculous, by your logic I, a bisexual, cannot be friends with anyone.","Also me: slept with most of my close friends of either gender.

Look, guys, it's the principle of the thing.",bisexual
uwu Bi on Tv?,"Thats right we got a TV show!  
A bunch of bi people dating on tv! Yeah but wait? Are they all just dating and shit?! Oh a whole show about bi's just going dating to find sex partners?! thanks tv for you amazing representation! fucking joke of a show, trying to prove a point and going completely against it by making bi people out to be completely sexually focused! love it!",bisexual
Am I straight??? Am I bi???? Do I like women just aesthetically?????,"I've had crushes. Mostly of them boys. And I think I'm developing another one (again on a boy) and I'm a girl.
But! 
Sometimes I see some women (usually older, in their twenties, and not my age) and they are just BEAUTIFUL! GORGEOUS! MAGNIFICENT! They are like Aphrodite!! Even she would be jealous! 
The thing is also, that I rarely think boys are MAGNIFICENT!!! but I do think they are hot/handsome/pretty. Basically I've never felt the same way about boys. And when I see a beautiful woman I'm like!!!!! Wow!!!!!!!!!!!
But I've also never imagined kissing anyone (mainly bc I am too ugly and ik nobody is attracted to me). But I'd like to kiss a boy. But a girl??? It's kinda weird???
I know this isn't well structured, I will try to write a summary:
Mostly of my crushes are boys, but sometimes a see a very beautiful woman and I'm like WOW!!!!!!
Am I just looking at a woman like she's a painting, you know, aesthetically, or am I attracted to her??",bisexual
Is this just me,,bisexual
best lighting,,bisexual
Do I need to come out to someone?,"I feel like I should come out, but I don’t know who I could come out to.

My family is super chill about this kind of thing, and probably wouldn’t notice if I brought a boyfriend home.

I don’t have many friends (by choice) and I live in rural florida, so I have no idea what side of the acceptance spectrum they’d be on.

I feel like I’m trapped with no one to talk to.

Send help, and lemon bars.
",bisexual
Sigh. Kinda in the closest,"So I came out as gay a number of months ago and it has gone really well. Everyone has been supportive and accepting. Which I really love. 

There’s always been an undercurrent of something else. Strong almost romantic attractions to close girl_friends as well over the years and a waxing and waning of my interest in guys. And right now I’m sitting in a Starbucks and I find both the guy and the girl on the till attractive. While over the summer I was exclusively attracted to guys. 

I thought I might be aromantic or something when it came to girls and that explained things. But now I’m learning about something called bi-cycling. 

Anyway, I feel I’m in the closet now about probably being bi or pan sexual and if I come out as that, or suddenly show up somewhere with a girlfriend, people will just think I was lying when I came out. It is all making me very upset. Luckily I have one family member I’m close to who is also versed in gender theory and they have been always very supportive to me and I’ve chatted with them about this. Sigh. 

I almost want to cry. 😢 ",bisexual
Bi lizard... a blizzard?,,bisexual
What do you think of this?,"First post here ... Suffered an abuse around the time i was 13, then played with my cousin, mostly bottom ... Started feeling the urge to stimulate my ass, and started experimenting with home made dildos, bigger and bigger. Recently, went and met a guy and blew him - he pushed for sex but did not feel ready - i now imagine i should of went for it... Quite religious, and judging myself, while at the same time i stimulate my ass sometimes ... What does all this make me? I am not attracted to guys, only to penises (must be because of all the porn i watched...)",bisexual
Bi guy looking to chat with some bi girls :),25M here. So I'm finally done with my college midterms and haven't really made more LGBT friends since coming out. I'd love to be able to connect with some bi girls and have some genuine conversation going. College has been keeping me super busy but also trying to learn how to relax and hopefully make some new friends along the way :) If interested feel free to send me a PM and looking forward to any responses.  ,bisexual
I made us a pumpkin. ❤️,,bisexual
Can't find this post about friendship. Did you see it?,"I’ve been trying to find a post I read on Friday. I think it was on this subreddit, and I am not sure how old it was, but now I can’t find it and it’s driving me crazy. I really want to reread one of the comments. Do any of you remember reading this one? Did I dream it? 

It was a post about a woman being at a party with her bf. She’s bi, and he was feeling jealous or insecure about a female friend of hers. OP doesn’t think there’s anything to her friend’s tipsy behavior and also thinks her relationship with bf is fine. Bf just wanted her to know that he thought the friend would’ve come onto her if he had not been there. It sounded like OP just wanted bisexuals’ stories and perspectives about their friendships rather than input on the situation.

The comment I wanted to reread: The user maybe had blue in their username, but I’m not sure. He talked about boundaries being fuzzy for him. He talked about how in his 20s he had ended a dear friendship with a queer male friend because his wife was jealous and regretted that because he needs that in his life. Now he has a similar friendship in his 40s, but he spent a lot of years in between without friends. Does any of this ring a bell?",bisexual
Loved this moment in The Good Place,,bisexual
Im 16 bi and need some help,"Hi I'm 16 and male


Hi so I'm in a situation I never thought I'd be in, so 3 months ago I got into a long distance relationship with with a guy and I was super happy and still am but theirs this girl I've liked since 6th grade but I just thought I had a crush but after not seeing her for about 2 years we met again at a friends birthday party and I instantly liked her again and and lately me and my boyfriend just seem to not communicate as well and I don't know if that's a contributing factor or not or if I've just always wanted to be with this girl and I'm scared of what to do in this situation.  

But anyway, any advise would be appreciated thank you.",bisexual
Bi guilt bc in a “het” relationship,"Ok in retrospect it’s so obvious. Kissed one female best friend. Kissed the other one, too. And another one lmao. Called them my girlfriends even. Still didn’t realize I was queer cuz I was meanwhile dating a boy (also f*cked that I didn’t realize that kissing a girl would still be cheating... so much internalized biphobia).  

It’s just that now I’m in a different relationship with a man that I’m pretty happy with, but there’s always that feeling of wanting to be bicurious and really explore my bisexuality more. It makes it hard to really commit to this relationship when I know there’s gotta be a future where i get to kiss more girls. Current boyo seems v unlikely to say yes to open relationship or poly too. Anyone else feel this? Makes me feel loads of guilt towards the guy I love but also lots of longing for my own desires and big bi dreams ",bisexual
Bi Questions,"How did you come to terms with your bisexuality? 

What is the best way to network and find support?

Are bi male bi female relationships common?

Are there any women who find bi men attractive? 

I’m a male trying to come to terms with things. ",bisexual
Too subtle?,,bisexual
I Spoiled Myself With Atypical,"So I started watching this show called Atypical mainly because I read somewhere that a character named Casey was bisexual and I was super excited to hear that cuz it’s rare to see a bisexual being represented without being “stereotypical” I guess.. 

The show is fucking good! I probably would’ve watched it without a character being bisexual but I just got excited! 

I hope that the producers will keep Casey as bisexual and not use it as a stepping stone to be a lesbian. 

I’m actually at the part where Sam’s ex girlfriend cut off the penguin lol. ",bisexual
Decided to add a *little* bit of pride to my iRacing car,,bisexual
must be bi to attune,,bisexual
Life is like a Ferris wheel,"Ik the title is cheesy but,..

(TLDR At the end of post)

My friend boyfriend and I are not being bullied as much but we still recently were told that we had to eat lunch, change for gym and go to the bathroom in faculty rooms so that there was no time we were out of faculty reach and in other students reach (as in faculty is unable to stop a student from bullying us) or the sight of cameras. It is like having a security office trainee doing a half assed job of protecting us.

Also one of my friends (A) is not talking to me because I am still friends with friend B even though he is a bit homophobic and A reported him to the principal. I am still friends with B because we have really good debates on certain topics and I respect that he has different points of view. 

Then, The GSA in my school was closed for the next couple of months due to some other LGBT kids getting bullied and my school assuming that it was because of the club which is completely stupid and makes no goddamn sense.

Finally, I brought my former boss to court For wrongful termination and also workplace endangerment and breaking child labor laws (he had me working past 11pm constantly on week nights. He was found guilty of the last two things but did not have to give me my job back because “I didn’t provide notice that I wasn’t going to show up.”

TL; DR Life is sort of getting better but not by that much",bisexual
I like my men how I like my woman,Unapologetically feminine,bisexual
"Need to be done with this dude, need to vent","Last year in uni, dealing with a dude who is closeted and in a fraternity (but claims that it's because of family reasons, which I don't doubt). Met from apps, but I wanted to meet them in public (studying for class, coffeeshop, etc.). This guy also shadows in the department of the hospital I work in.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, got into a big argument of why I wouldn't go to his house - claiming ""I met you at work, why do we need somewhere else too?"" I've had so many bad experiences getting to know strangers, I'm doing this to protect myself - to find out if anythings gonna work out before I have to trap myself at their house or bring them to mine.

&amp;#x200B;

Basically, I like this guy; he reminds me of a younger me. But it's clear getting this dude to even venture out into public to do schoolwork with me or talk over coffee or something is ""too much exposure."" Do I even continue talking to him? I want to at least be friends with him; I don't have too many LGBT friends. But this drama of back and forth arguing trying to meet in a public place just to talk makes it so difficult for me to want to try to push any farther.",bisexual
I feel like I've passed a bi milestone,"Getting a sugary starbucks frapp for my basic white chick of a husband, and I noticed the drive-through barista. For the first time, even though I couldn't tell their gender, I didn't wonder or try to guess. I just thought ""that is a very cute person, and I wouldn't say no to a bit of a snog."" Seems like an important achievement.",bisexual
I feel alone,First time poster.. might delete tomorrow. Im intensely extroverted and feel very happy around people but when im alone i get really sad/anxious. Im not sure if this is the place for this but im wondering if part of it is that i feel so alone in my identity as bi. Only some of my friends know and although I have some gay friends I dont know anyone bi. I dont know how to reach out to people when im still partway not out. I feel like i dont belong here and i just moved back home so it feels like everyone has already decided my identity. Theres no one to talk to who understands. I just want to move far away and start over. Im also just exhausted from trying to run from my emotions constantly by being social. Anyone have any advice?,bisexual
Does anybody else ever feel like their sexuality escapes them?,"I (22M) have been coming to terms with my sexuality for the past 7-8 years of my life. I've recently fully admitted to myself that I am bisexual. I've gone on heterosezual/homosexual cycles where I'm only attracted to one particular gender at a time (breasts begone! I want to suck dick now!) But whenever I try to identify my sexuality, I never feel bisexual, I feel straight or gay, and the only reason I know I'm bisexual is from my knowledge that I have been attracted to a particular gender, but at the moment I can't make myself feel attracted to both at the same time. I feel really scared because what if I can't hold down relationship because I'll just stop being attracted to my partner.",bisexual
This is it chief,,bisexual
I like a girl - should I tell her I could be bisexual ?,"I (19, F) hung out with one of my good friends last night and there were multiple times I felt like kissing her. I know for sure she’s Bi because she’s talked about it but I’m pretty sure she thinks  I’m 100% straight. I’m currently confused about my sexuality at the moment - should I mention to her in passing that I could be Bi? ",bisexual
d r e a m i n g o f y o u,,bisexual
hey everybody just rezliex im bi im 22.,[https://imgur.com/a/DeOQAI1](https://imgur.com/a/DeOQAI1),bisexual
Amphi(bi)an predicament,,bisexual
"Thought I was at the gay end of the scale, sure but now vagina makes me feel really sick","So my personal feelings about vagina has always been 'I don't really like it, not my thing'. It was apathy and had no desire for it tbh but now it has changed to 'Ew, that is disgusting'. I can't even watch porn and see vagina and not be instantly repulsed. I don't get it, I have always just not cared about it, the odd occasion it would make me feel weird but it was very rare but now it makes me feel really sick, every time. I still like the rest of women, like they are really pretty and i'd say breasts are nice if I am in the mood, though admittedly it about being the girl when watching porn but that's probably fetish related and unrelated but yeah I can still get off to the idea of breasts if I really want to, my attraction for other men has been through the roof lately so I thought maybe it had something to do with that and that it would be a temporary thing and I would go back to not caring but it doesn't seem to be the case, I don't think I ever want a girlfriend again and I guess it wouldn't work if I don't like vagina but I still think women are beautiful so I am a bit muddled up because I don't think I am completely gay but I don't even feel bisexual now, curious if anyone else is similar?

Thanks for reading",bisexual
Even Video Games Are Using Slurs Against Me,,bisexual
The song/artist that helped me come out,,bisexual
I heard some of you were hunting for this mug,,bisexual
Was I just invalidated by one of my bi friends?,"Yesterday I found out a (bisexual) friend of mine (I’m also bi) said to someone how she wanted a gay best friend to which the friend responded  “you have *my name*” and the bi friend said “yeah but she doesn’t count because she’s not out” 
I feel genuinely so hurt about this. Like I already feel like I’m not gay enough for the community some times and actually hearing someone from it say that because I’m not out to my family I don’t count. (I am out to pretty much everyone else in my life though?? So like???).
Am I maybe misinterpreting what I was told she said?",bisexual
Not sure if this has been posted before :),,bisexual
Super awkward situation I was in in my Ancient History class.,"So like the teacher was talking about how the Ancient Spartans used to participate in Gay sex, this grossed out all the straight guys, left all the girls giggling and me smirking. She then was like “Ya know really there is only Gay and Straight, Bi is like some weird thing over there” legit that second my friend turns to me and smirks super hard... I begin to blush and the teacher begins to stare at me, I was super scared of being outed because I can’t keep a straight face when I feel embarrassed or awkward. I also felt like she invalidated Bisexuality at than moment which hurt a little inside tbh, also it’s a Christian School so you can already guess how awkward I feel. I know in year 12 Studies of Religion we will be covering Sexual Ethics so like that’s gonna be a ride, OH GOD KILL ME! ",bisexual
So confused,"Hi all, bi/pan curious 23 yo guy here. Recently moved to Melbourne which is a comparatively progressive city that has opened my eyes to different possibilities for sexuality and gender. Been with lots of girls during uni, girlfriends etc. Had crushes on boys before but never really acknowledged them as crushes (I thought I just thought they were cool) until recently, which helped me realise I might be bi.

I've talked about it with friends but I'm still unsure. I've always had the picture of settling down with a beautiful girl and having a family. I find some guys attractive but idk if I could ever do sexual stuff with a guy. I've talked to my friends and sister about it and everyone is very supportive which is awesome. 

However, one gay friend took it the wrong way I think, and came into my room to try have sex with me while he was really drunk. We kissed which was fine, then he tried to grab at my crotch and stuff. I was kind of scared, luckily I was stronger than him so pushed him away despite him fighting a bit and told him to get out. We talked about it and I know it wasn't who he really is, but it's still damaged my desire to explore and made me feel less sure, since I wasn't turned on at all during any of it, even just kissing. 

I'm talking to guys (and girls) on Tinder, and taking a guy out for coffee a bit later this week. 

I was just wondering if any of you beautiful bis have had experiences like this when you first came out? And if you figured out you were bi or just a curious phase? 
",bisexual
I just want to say...,"After reading all of these wonderful and inspirational posts about my sexuality, I just want to say all of y'all are the most amazing and beautiful people I could ever come in contact with across the internet. You make me feel like I can be truely me. Stay amazing ;)",bisexual
Hello,,bisexual
Would you consider this to be platonic if a male friend [19M] did this to me [19M]?," After careful deliberation, I've decided to write this post so I can get to finally move forward and not think about it as much anymore. So for context, I've met a guy last July in one of my university classes, let's call him ""N"". We've known each other only for a short time, a year and a half, our friendship seemed to hit it off and he's what I consider to be a good friend of mine. One time however, we were waiting for our bus and I don't exactly recall how or why, we've joked about one of us being blind and it led to N asking me if he could hold my hand? I exactly can't recall if he was joking or not, it seemed rather insignificant at the time. I told him I didn't mind and we held hands for a solid couple of seconds. Neither one of us let go during that time though I did later because of his rather sweaty palms lol. It may seem that we were just joking, and that I thought so too... for a while. The next thing that made me pique my interest in him was on another time, I tagged him on a meme on Facebook detailing how ""the next time we will see each other in university, it won't be until March"" \[paraphrasing it\]. N commented that: ""...felt sad as he hadn't talked to a friend in weeks. Wanted to feel warm and cozy again."" I don't know but I get the feeling this isn't what men usually say to their guy friends, especially coming from a straight guy and me... well, gay. He knows this. He even one time, let me know he was gonna walk with me on our ways to class, still I didn't think anything of it then and remarked to him he was a mere gentlemen. The final thing nail in the coffin was during at the end of our semester, there was a small pet a farm animal event in our university, and as we were walking past it, I decided to pet the goats... after all, they are cute after all. Anyways, after I petted them, I saw N just standing, unmoving, gazing at me, as if he was admiring me from afar. I know how delusional it sounds, even when I tried to rationalize it in my head, it was a nagging feeling I sort of had.

&amp;#x200B;

We're simply platonic, and I'm sure that's how he views me. He'd call me his ""homie/buddy"" once, heh... Aside from that, we'd take classes together, usually sitting next to each other... nothing special, hang out every once or so often due to our busy schedules. I was once attracted to him, but nothing more than that. I mean he isn't exactly the guy that is considered devastatingly handsome... but handsome nonetheless. This can't possibly be anything more than platonic right? I've been intimate with none, nor have I allowed myself to be intimate with anyone... and besides, I didn't want this to end up the classic gay guy &amp; straight guy trope. That almost never works out well. What do you think? I am probably just overthinking it, it probably is the case of meeting a very affectionate, sweet, sexually secure guy who just happens to float on the other side of the river. In all honesty, I wish it was the truth... I'm not even ready for anything romantic at all!

&amp;#x200B;

 So men and women, is this merely a rare, sweet form of platonic friendship or is this indicating something more? ",bisexual
The Mako shark is a raging bisexual,"Just found this quote on the Wikipedia page on Mako sharks

“Mako sharks occasionally exhibit homosexual behavior outside of their usual mating season.[4]”",bisexual
Bisexuality explained with apples vs. bananas,,bisexual
Co-workers frequently use gay as a pejorative. Honestly not sure how I feel about it.,"On one hand, I'm 99% sure they don't mean it homophobically.

On the other hand, I'm not out to them, and *what if they do*. I don't want to play the victim, or be oversensitive, but it does put that worry in the back of my head.

What's you guy's thoughts on it. Does it bug you? ",bisexual
Bi colors wristband that I wear everyday.,,bisexual
33 F Asexual virgin now incredibly confused if what I am experiencing is attraction or a confidence issue?,"So yesterday it dawned on me that I saw a picture of a friends friend and thought she looked super pretty and next thing I know I am searching for more of her pics online and when I analysed my feelings I think it was more of a ""aww I wished my smile was like that"" and comparing my looks to hers an maybe even wanting to be her. Ordinarily I would chalk this up to usual comparing myself to others sort of thing but I recognized that I really do think she looks super pretty almost like perfect like features and I am not sure how this explain this but I find my strong reaction to her looks made me question if I was attracted to her as I never have really gawked at a person like that before. Now if you ask me would I want to date her/kiss her/be close to her then hand on heart the answer is no as I don't have the feelings but despite forgetting all about and having no interest to look through her photos today the fact that I spent ages going through another woman's social media to just gawk at her makes me completely lose understanding of how to gauge whether or not this means I am attracted to her.

I am 33 and a asexual virgin and have been this way my whole life, I guess I never have come across a situation where I am gawking at someone's appearance for endless hours like yesterday despite not feeling a sexual or romantic desire for her. I also think for me I have always struggled to understand what attraction feels like. What would really help is if anyone can share how they know whether or not they are attracted to someone as that may help me figure this out.

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
Being told you’re not a ‘real’ bisexual..,"Hi! First time posting here :-)

I know that sexual attraction to men and women doesn’t have to be perfectly equal for you to be bisexual, but i thought I might seek some advice (sort of) as my friend often calls me out for not being truly bisexual.

I am physically attracted to women ( I am also a woman) but not romantically attracted to them. I’ve never had a crush on a girl or wanted to date one, so I don’t think I could as the attraction is purely sexual. However I am romantically attracted to males and only very occasionally sexually attracted to them. So I think, I am bisexual because I am interested in both genders.

Is this weird? Does anyone’s else’s attraction filter like this? My friend says I shouldn’t call myself bisexual but I’m actually homosexual, heteromantic.

Thank you ! :-)
",bisexual
I keep getting confused?,"I've been venturing through this subreddit for quite some time. About a year and a bit as I've had quarrels about my sexuality. I keep falling into the trap where I think I have it all figured out but then I experience something else and that just fucks me over. So I self-identify as gay, but even then I feel like that's a lie or does not encompass my full truth. Although I do like the same-sex, I still find myself fantasising about the opposite sex. I don't know if that's because of compulsive heterosexuality, it might be that or because I'm genuinely interested in the opposite sex. I have had crushes over the years on the opposite sex. I don't want to go into gruelling numbers but so far I've had 3 BIG crushes on girls (the opposite sex) and 2 somewhat BIG crushes on guys (the same sex) which is fuel for my confusion. The major concern that I've had is that I don't feel as sexually inclined to women as I do with men and I do understand that bisexuality isn't a 50/50 split, preferences can emerge but my attraction feels somewhat static. It does change, don't get me wrong. I do feel sexually attracted to women and only women, albeit rarely but even then I fall into the trap where I'm like ""HAHA I'M NOT FULLY GAY."" I do have some bits of internalised homophobia that I'm dealing with so that might be reason why I'm forcing myself to look at the opposite sex. But even then, my crushes have felt real and I mean really real so I'm at a loss. It might be compulsive heterosexuality that's forcing me to like the opposite sex and that's why I never fully adopt the bisexual label long-term, and when I do, although it does feel right for a short amount of time, I quickly change it. 

&amp;#x200B;

I'm pretty sure this subreddit is used to posts like these so I'm sorry for the spam :D. Either way, you all are awesome. Regardless of whether or not I'm in the bi+ community, bisexuals are key to the LGBT+ movement. ",bisexual
Am I being greedy?,"I dont really know how to begin, or whether this better fits r/relationship_advice or here, but here goes.

So, I’m a 28 year old guy who’s spent the majority of his life believing being straight with maybe a bigger attraction to other guys then any straight guy has any right to have. Up until I was 25 I’ve been rather unsuccessful  with relationships, when all of a sudden I’ve stumbled out of nowhere upon my current sweet, funny, caring and just amazing boyfriend. Everything fell into place, and I’ve been waving the blue-purple-pink flag with pride ever since.

However, while he has filled a void in my life I didn’t knew I had, I feel like I’ve reached some kind of crossroad in my life right now. I strongly experience the infamous bi-cycle, and during the straight-phases this gnawing feeling of regret of not experiencing the other side of my sexuality. I feel this almost primal urge to be with a woman, which poses a pretty big problem since both me and my boyfriend are committed to monogamy.

We’ve both been discussing the prospect of me moving in with him and start building a life together, and while I love him so much it drives me crazy at times, the thought of me settling right here right now for the foreseeable future scares me.

So now I’ve been putting off the decision to move forward, but that is only postponing the inevitable.

Also complicating things is that recently I’ve reconnected with an old friend from high school and there is mad chemistry between us.  We’ve managed to refrain from acting upon it (though getting way too close at one point), but to me it confirms that this urge is not something I can completely ignore and put away.

I’m at a loss here. My boyfriend knows I’m struggling with this (though I’ve kept the close encounter from him, as knowing would only hurt him without resolving anything), and while he is completely supportive he also doesn’t know how to deal with this. I feel that I’m really acting selfish and unfair by trying to have my cake and eat it too, but I have no idea what to do.

I don’t expect anyone to have the ‘golden’ advice, but any help is welcome or just words of recognition so that I know I’m not alone being ‘greedy’ like this…",bisexual
Came out to my Wife,"Kind of an interesting story culminating to last night.


I have been bisexual pretty much my whole life, but only just recently put the feeling to the title.  

I'm male and married to a woman who I love very much, but once I figured out this part of who I am I figured she needed to know.


I wound up googling ""how to tell your wife you are bisexual"" at one point on my computer that only I use to get some better info on how to break the news.


I let it be for a while, but planned to come put eventually.


Anyway, cut to last night and she had to use my computer for something, so she jumped onto the browser.  I guess she started typing ""how"" and it brought the rest of my previous search.
I was out at the time, but I got back home and she told me that she hadn't been snooping, but it just popped up.


I told her the truth that, I'm bisexual, but also happy with our marriage and don't plan on going out and banging other dudes or women behind her back or anything.  Nothing has changed other than the fact that we can argue about which brother from Supernatural is hotter (team Dean here).

Then, unexpectedly, she admitted she was bi too!   I didn't expect it, but I'm pretty happy that we were both able to talk about it, and even better that we both play on the same team that just happens to believe the other teams are pretty great.


So, overnight we went from a presumedly straight and married couple, to bi and married couple.  I think we are both happier for coming out to each other!",bisexual
(NSFW) The hardest decision everyone of us Bisexuals has to make daily...,"Hmmm... Should I get off to guys, girls or something in between today? ",bisexual
Scared of relationship with a guy.,"Hi guys,

I'm a bisexual female (19) and although I've always had crushes on guys, I've only had romantic and sexual experiences with girls. One girl, to be precise, and we broke up because I wanted to pursue a relationship with a guy (probably a mistake, but there we go). I'm very, very picky about who I kiss and behave romantically with, meaning I have little/no experience with anyone else. Since me and this girl broke up over a year ago, I've only ever kissed my friends platonically and one guy who I had completely fallen for but he was in a relationship (that's another story). So I know I can fall head over heels for a guy. But other than that, I just find it so difficult to form emotional connections with men, especially men who I find attractive. The men I do find attractive I don't form emotional connections with, and with men I have emotional connections with, I don't find attractive. I've recently started talking to this one guy who is great from an emotional standpoint, but I am just not entirely sure I find him attractive. It's getting frustrating. I find it so easy to fall for girls, and the one guy I fell for was taken, and now it's hard to find anyone who ticks all the boxes for me. I don't want to settle for less, but I also don't want to wait for perfection because, you know, that doesn't exist. But I had the 'perfect' first girlfriend, and I so badly want the 'perfect' first boyfriend too.

TLDR: I know I can be attracted romantically and physically to guys, but it's getting bloody difficult to find one that ticks all those boxes for me, and it's so easy to form these connections with girls. Do I quit trying to find perfection, or wait for the right guy? 

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
"Full Episode of ""The Bi Life"" Series Premiere.",,bisexual
How do I find someone,"I find it to be difficult to leave my place of solitude. I want a relationship, but i do not see a clear path to that success. It's stupid i tell myself, but there is a side of optimism that still finds its way to the surface. I know I won't find it anyone with a shy perspective or an introverted mind. It's challenging, which most can understand or relate too. Where is some places or examples you might have, of meeting people or places to look? Any advice would be helpful. Thanks.

Also, I'm a guy. Bi. 
",bisexual
I got to dance parlor and ballroom dances with several beautiful women and some men,"I've honestly never felt as happy as I do right now. I learned new dances and to top it all every one was so nice and it was nice dancing as ""the man"", even with some men who were in the role of ""woman"". I thought I'd never be this happy.",bisexual
My first crush on a girl,"So I'm F23 and really came out of denial of being bi this year, so all these experiences are still new to me.

I met a girl who lives in my building and I get giggly like a middle school kid when I see her. I thought at first it was just me being excited to make a new friend. I didn't even spot that it was a crush until my straight roommate was like oh sounds like a crush.

My friends are saying just ask her out, but honestly that terrifies me because I've never done any of this before. What if she's straight? What if she thinks I'm weird? What if I'm not really biromantic and am just bisexual?

I've also only talked with her like 2 times so I'm not sure if that's weird. ",bisexual
"One of my teachers is awesome, if your birthday is coming up and you tell him what you like, he'll bake something for you. Y'all know what I had to ask for",,bisexual
Shooting my Shot,"This girl in my biology is so cute and I’ve decided that I’m going to say something to her next lab. Unfortunately, she not in my lab group, but that doesn’t matter. Any tips, pickup lines, or suggestions on how to go about it. I rarely shoot my shot cause of social anxiety but it’s something I’m trying to get over! ",bisexual
Someone said something about bisexuals doing finger guns?,,bisexual
Am I pan? what woulda pansexual like that a bisexual wouldn't? I'm so confused...,"So firstly I mean no offense to anyone. I genuinely have nothing but love.

&amp;#x200B;

I like MTF, FTM, CD, Male, Female, and non binary. However, I don't like some non binary lets say sexual juxtaposition of hetero normative features. Like say moustaches, dresses, mohawks, tattoos and makeup. You look rocking and I wish you the best, but I don't want you.        

I just figured if I liked boys and girls I'd like the in between. So... it never occured to me that it was not exactly bi to like trans people. Or is it?        

Labels are hard... ",bisexual
Same vs. opposite sex orgasms,"Out of scientific curiosity, do your orgasms differ based on the sex of your partner at the moment of the cerebral homonal-chemcial flood? Details not necessary, but appreciated.",bisexual
The Good Place gets it,,bisexual
Need advice...,"Hello- I am in 32F and have been married to my wife for 2 years but together for nearly 10. I am madly in love with her and she is in all honesty perfect, I fully realize that. I am absolutely happy and in love with her. We are also trying to get pregnant. 

With that being said, there are these women that come into my life and it’s usually as soon as I learn they like women I get mentally wrapped up in them. I have only dated a couple women prior to her so I am not sure that has anything to do with my feelings. It’s almost like I haven’t had a chance to be wild. To this point I have been 100% faithful, as has she but there have been a number of times I have been emotionally/mentally got caught up with these random women. I would never want to hurt my wife or ruin what we have but I can’t seem to shake it. What is wrong with me and how do I make it stop? ",bisexual
Young bi man struggling in life and finding a female partner,"Hey folks,

&amp;#x200B;

I am 26 and quite disappointed of my whole life. It's been over three years that I broke up with my ex (because he was a douche) and moved to Canada to seek the possibility of a better life. Now I have more problems than ever in my life... I don't have my family financial support, I suck in finding a decent job (struggling financially because I cannot find a job in my field after losing my previous job) and more importantly I am miserable in finding a female partner for my life or at least for experimenting and sex. Don't get me wrong, I am not looking for (only sex) I just wanted to love a cute female and see how it feels but there is just none of them who would like a gross bi man!

&amp;#x200B;

As a migrant with financial difficulties and someone new to Toronto, its not easy for me to attract girls. I made a move recently and trying to make friends with my ancestry and feel much better but finding a female partner is still a dream. I kinda approached one or two girls. One of them doesn't want to talk about me being bi (trying to hide her thoughts) so I am not sure if she is attracted. The other one who is actually bi herself was telling me the other day ""she doesn't like men who have been with men and she knows that might be selfish!"" Also, I found many women like gay/bi guys as friends because they feel more secure but as soon as you start approaching, they close the gates...

&amp;#x200B;

Folks, I don't want to date guys anymore but I gotta tell you, its much easier to date guys than girls. I am not the best looking guy but I am kinda cute (thin, nerdy, straight-looking) :)). If I show up among some guys I probably attract a few of them. However, I want to meet a girl who would accept me as who I am without me hiding my bisexual identity. Is there anyone like that out there? Or is just a dream that I have?",bisexual
"I’d like some opinions, if that’s okay with y’all?","My biggest concern is that growing up through my teenage years, I had/still have quite a few lgbt+ friends. And I didn’t come out to them until like last year. I remember having sexual thoughts about the male gender growing up as well as female, but my whole life I’ve only sought after women. And I’ve never had sex or even fooled around with any men before, but I have kissed a few guys and really enjoyed it.  So did I merely assimilate into this friend group to “adapt to my environment” subconsciously or am I actually bisexual?  

",bisexual
Cool Bi Popsocket,,bisexual
Am i bisexual? Or hetero? Or gay?,"Hello fellow redditers,

I am troubled by what my sexuality lies. I must state that i havent had any sexual experiences yet so far (20s M virgin). 
So when i was a child until ~16 years old. I liked girls. I fell in love with one girl but i chicken out when it was time to date. At that time, i was not interested in boys. So all my porn taste were hetero sex/ or girls mastubating. Later on, after i came across to gay porn, i started liking it. But still not sexually attracted to males (if that makes any sense). Then, i began to be conscious that males can be handsome i guess? 
Now, in the present i mostly watch gay porn and less to hetero porn. And i still feel that girls and boys are both handsome. However, i still virgin so what do i know , right? I mostly think of dicks now more often than vaginas, so does that make me gay? When i masturbate, i also think of sexy hot guys doing it. However, i have also think if girls and making out with them (but when it comes to thinking about sex, its mostly anal but not thru vagina) lmao writing this is so weird. Also, when i think about the future, i am 100% sure i want kids, but like i feel like watching gay dudes doing it maybe excite me more than doing it with girls? And thinking of long term relationships i often think of woth girls, but like short term is with boys? Am i weird? 
I a bit of an introvert person and due to my upbringing i was not a very talkative nor a very outgoing person who was not 'allowed' to date until i finished school or until marriage . So i havent dated befote either. Also, i would be disown if my parent knew or any family member knew i even have thoughts about doing it with boys or being ""gay"" or ""bi"" (basically not straight)

So plz help me out guys. 
I want to know how you guys approach this?

",bisexual
How bi am I?!,I'm so bi I'm both sexual and polar! *finger guns*,bisexual
How did you find the ideal friends and partners?,"As a member of the proud bisexual community, have you considered spending a little money on social networking sites to help you quickly find the ideal friends and partner? What is your attitude towards paid social networking sites?",bisexual
I changed my laptop keyboard settings today.,,bisexual
Open the Bi-frost!,,bisexual
SO (f34) went to use my (m42) cellphone &amp; gay pic popped up. We’re both bi and have talked a lot about our bi sides but she seems really quiet tonight like I’ve hurt her.,"So this afternoon I had to clean the shed but in my wisdom I flicked through a few gay tumbler accounts while moving boxes. I wasn’t jerking off but just felt the urge to look at cock (as one does). 
We’ve been together for five years but have known each other for twice that. We were both open about our sexuality but are monogamous and are faithful to each other. 

I rarely look at porn as I used to watch a lot (and I mean a lot) but every now and again I feel the need and every now and again I enjoy gay porn. 
I don’t jerk off to it as my s.o is dtf whenever and she would rather me fuck her in any case but I do enjoy having a quick look. (I can’t even remember the last time I went solo).

Which brings me back to this afternoon. I’d just came back from a bike ride and was in the middle of chores when I thought it’d be a good idea to flick through tumbler. I was called back inside and just locked my phone. When we were sitting on the couch she grabbed my phone to look at some pics she had taken (sfw) and of course the last thing I had was a pic of some guy being lead through the bush by his cock. 
She shows me the phone, asked me why is there a cock on your phone and gave it back. 
I just mumbled that I don’t know why I do half the things I do and left it at that. 

Since then she’s been ‘standoffish’ and we haven’t really talked like we usually do. 
I don’t know if this is because I looked at porn when I know that I have a problem or if it was because it was a cock...
She’s both my dream partner and soul mate and I would never be with anyone else. 
Surely she would realise that being openly bi means that I’m not fussy what I look at and that it all depends on what I feel like at the time?",bisexual
I visited home and we all got drunk and I think I accidentally came out to my dad,"And for some background; we don't get along. In fact we usually hate each other (he is an emotionally abusive alcoholic) but everyone was getting drunk she e were discussing music (the one thing we have in common) and I said I'm bisexual. He said something like ""I know"" but I hope he forgets because he is liable to tell people and I haven't told anyone yet. He was very drunk so I think he will but it's worrying me.",bisexual
I've had this since June. I'm going to come out to my parents when it breaks,,bisexual
I DID IT.,"Guys. I did what I thought was impossible. I came out to my wife as a bi-curious male. I had tears and fears and I didn't know whether I should freak out or what. 

I didn't know how to approach the situation. At all. I'm still just... I don't know. I did it. And it was only a big deal in terms that I told her *so late*. It's not a big deal that I am *bi-curious* to her. She didn't know, and it doesn't change our relationship. She was glad that I told her now instead of her just finding out 20 years from now when ""you just leave me for a man and I had no idea""

Honestly, I don't even care if I never get to act on my curiosity, as long as someone I know personally and love  so much accepts me for who I am and what my heart and brain feel. I kept apologizing for not saying anything and so on and so forth, but holy fuck. I feel so much better. 

I did say that I felt like I could never say anything because of my very right wing conservative upbringing, and I was crazy for never saying anything. I think she was more annoyed that I kept apologizing. 😂😂 

I'm sorry to myself for putting me through this insane mindset. My mental and emotional well-being was being put at risk, and I hope my unborn son knows one day that it's okay to be whatever he wants to be and love whomever he wants to love. 

I love my wife even more now. ❤️

And I love you guys. Your thoughts and desires matter. You matter. Don't forget that.",bisexual
Came out to my girlfriend,As it turns out she’s bi too so everything went better than expected ,bisexual
Baby steps,"I'm posting this from a throwaway account, but I've been lurking on this sub for awhile and spent quite a bit of time recently rethinking my sexuality; up until now I've identified as straight. Tonight for the first time (with the help of a good deal of alcohol) I admitted to one of my close friends that I think I might be bisexual, (bicurious is the word we settled on). As mentioned I am currently drunk, and I still have a lot of doubts and questions, but just being able to admit the possibility feels like a big deal to me. So now I'm sharing the news here; thank you for your time.",bisexual
Advice on coming out to parents (who might already suspect)?,"So, I'm extremely bisexual. I grew up in a very conservative, religious household where that kinda thing doesn't fly.
Despite all that, me and my parents are very close. Not only that, but I haven't been really subtle and have been doing my best to give hints about my true sexuality. So, unless they are real deep in denial, there's a good chance they suspect I'm not straight.
I really want this secret to be lifted off my chest, I want to finally just be myself, but I'm scared shitless about how they might react. One moment they'll say something really supportive about my gay friends, the next they'll say how ""devastated"" they'd be if I kept such a large secret from them. I don't know what to do.

TL;DR: I just wanna address the rainbow elephant in the room but I'm too chicken shit, please help.",bisexual
My first date with a guy,"So I wasn’t originally gonna post this but my last post on here about when I got a bf was popular so I thought y’all would want this

So basically our schools theater team were doing music numbers from popular musicals and saying my boyfriend was in theater (he wasn’t in the show) wanted me to go with him. I’m glad I did cause I really enjoyed it and I enjoyed him sitting next to me

(Ps I wore his long sleeved flannel the entire time cause I was cold and also cause of romantic cliches)",bisexual
One of us...one of us!,,bisexual
So the guy I'm seeing,"So the guy I'm seeing asked me about my bi sexually and for once wasn't an off putting question! I owned who I was for once and it felt good! 

The question led to "" how do girls flirt with eachother?"" And the only answer I could give was, we kinda don't ? Because half the time you don't know if she's being nice or is actually into you lol",bisexual
My partner designed this for me in response to Aquaman's attitude!,,bisexual
Saw this at the supermarket today,,bisexual
I'm too ugly for this...,"Do you ever get the feeling that you're too ugly to be bisexual? I have acne, a wildly asymmetrical face, dress awfully and too poor to do anything about it. All the other bi people I've met are gorgeous and it leaves me feeling completely out of place. Idk. I just feel so out of the loop on this one. I probably shouldn't even post this to reddit Bc reading over it makes me feel stupid as hell. Whatevs, I need to vent.",bisexual
Should I come out to my boyfriend?,"We've been going out for just over two years, and he's really sweet and loving. I don't really hide the fact that I'm also attracted to women, but I haven't explicitly come out because I just never felt like it was especially relevant.

He once made a comment that bi people were rare like unicorns, and he's only ever met two in his life...lol. Surprise.
He's pretty open minded and I don't think he would be too bothered by it, but the idea still makes me surprisingly nervous.

Do you think I should?",bisexual
Being Bi: Futon of the Furniture World,"So I remember when I was questioning my sexuality and whether I was actually bi or just confused until I heard an amazing explanation from a rad bi girl I met at a party. 

Heterosexulaity is like a couch. If someone were to come over and see your couch, no one would bat an eye. It's just a couch that anyone could just sit down on without an invitation. You could even have one on your porch as many college students do. I know I still do. 

Homosexuality is like a bed. It's something that society deems a bit more private. Most people wouldn't just walk into a friends house and sit on their bed. 

Bisexuality is like a futon. You could have it in the upright position like a couch or in the layed down position like a bed. But no matter how you put it, it's a futon.

First time post in this community. I hope you enjoyed my analogy. Feel free to let me know what you think. I'm going to go have some lemon bars now.   ",bisexual
"Just came out as bi to myself, do I come out to fiance?","Just like the title says! 

&amp;#x200B;

Bit of background, I'm a 31 year old guy, been engaged to my fiance for nearly 2 years now (wedding date has been pushed back because of her schooling), together for almost 7 years. We share a house (rental) and have a dog together. Long story short, I guess I've kinda wondered about whether or not I'm bi for a long time, but I finally had a realization a couple weeks ago that yes, indeed I am. And I'm OK with it! It feels freeing to admit this to myself. I feel like it's a part of my personality that I have been in denial about for a long time, and I'm sure is somehow connected to the years of self loathing and major depression I've been through. But that's something to untangle another day. The real issue I'm having is what to do about my fiance. She's wonderful, and we've weathered a lot over the course of our relationship, helping each other through life's difficulties and whatnot. I feel like this is something she should know about, right? 

&amp;#x200B;

I am afraid of her having a negative reaction of course, her potentially seeing it as me being dishonest with her all these years. Full disclosure, I have never had a sexual encounter with a guy, nor have I ever cheated on her with a guy or girl. But of course, how could I make her believe that? She has asked me before if I am gay or not, which I've always denied, because I guess that was the truth at the time - it's even what I believed. I have a penchant for for wearing super tight pants, which I think has raised her eyebrows over my sexuality, and looking at it now, maybe it's been an unconscious expression of that. We've had issues in the bedroom too, which probably doesn't help my case either. On the other hand, she herself has admitted that she is bisexual, even from the beginning of our relationship! It is not clear to me if she's out to anyone else, though she has alluded to at least a couple friends knowing. I've always been too scared to ask her about it, maybe because of my insecurities about my sexuality. 

&amp;#x200B;

I have not come out to anyone else yet, except for a therapist that I just started seeing. I figured that was as safe a place as any to come out (she is LBGQT friendly)! One thing I worry about though, is whether I came out years ago to a mutual friend of ours. I used to be a very heavy drinker (3 years sober yay), and seem to have a hazy recollection that I may have done that. Heck, I probably did, but I don't know if I should ask him if I did? Something tells me though that if I probably did!

&amp;#x200B;

Bottom line is, I need help and advice navigating this, before I make a promise to someone based on a lie. I know it's one thing to have feelings for guys (and girls) and not act on them, but I really want to explore this side of my sexuality before it's too late. I don't want to lose her over this, but if that's what happens, it's probably for the best, right? Probably something I should brace myself for, right? Sorry for the rambling, thank you everyone!",bisexual
Bi visibility on the Netflix original show Big Mouth! 💗💜💙,,bisexual
I just realized I used to be in love with my best friend.,"I’m not friends with this girl anymore and I’m in a happy relationship of over 2 years, but tonight I realized the whole time we were friends, I was in love with her. 

When I was 15/16, I was really really close to this girl I met at church. (I didn’t know I was bi yet. I finally came out to myself and my friends a year ago this month. I’m 19 now.) We spent a lot of time together; she was always staying at my house and when she did we would cuddle at night, eat tons of food, and talk until the wee hours of the morning about everything you can think of. I remember now that I would find myself wondering what it would be like (and wanting) to kiss her, but I pushed it down because I guess I had some internalized homophobia? (I was raised as a Christian in a small southern town so gay was something I was terrified of being.) I could never figure out why I cared about her so deeply, and why it hurt so badly when she stopped coming around. but now I know, and figuring it out really kinda shook me up.  Quite frankly, it hurts a little. 

I just wanted to know if this kind of thing has ever happened to anyone else? I would like to hear your stories. I think it would help me feel a little more peaceful about the whole thing. 

tl;dr I was in love with a close friend before I knew I was bi, and now that I look back, it was kind of obvious. I came to the realization tonight and it felt like all the pain of her leaving was brought back to the surface. ",bisexual
How to come out to my best friend,"Hi!! I’m 18, bisexual, f, etc. 

I was subscribed on a different account but it was too personal of an account and this is more of a secret user for me

ANYWAY

I’ve been best friends w her for around 7 years and I just accepted myself this past year. I have a boyfriend of 11 months and just told him about a week ago that I was bi. He took it very well and was really accepting and sweet. 

The issue is: idk how to come out to my friend. We used to talk about our life a lot to one another but lately it hasn’t been like that and it’s hard to bring things of importance up. I just want to be able to tell her but it’s really difficult for me. I have a bi keychain and I drive her practically everywhere and she (I guess) doesn’t know what it means. I have a feeling she is also bi or pan (update: she’s asexual) idk but she definitely hasn’t said anything. I hint at being bi all the time (I told myself I’d tell my close friends soon like around oct/nov) because I finally feel ready to come out. I just don’t know how to do it. Our relationship is very intimate in a friend way, we know everything about eachother and used to shower together (in a completely platonic way of course). Idk it just seems weird I don’t want her to look at me differently or be afraid that I love her or have had feelings for her. I just don’t know how to approach it and NEED HELP oh wow plz. Thank youuuuuuuuu. 

Also side note: I died laughing at the lemon bars story and I LOVE THEM they’re so fucking good oh my god.

Anyway thank you all for being the best people I’ve literally only been on here for a few days stalking but everything is so helpful and comforting💗💜💙",bisexual
ME_BIRL,,bisexual
Any other demisexuals who can go either way in the house? Sound off,"Took me a VERY long time (I am now 24 years old and only just recently came to the conclusion) with a lot of soul-searching to figure out how I could be interested in both men and women, but only romantically and with basically no sex drive. I feel so alone, people look at me like I just told them I have a pet unicorn when I explain it to them IRL. Even other bi people I know IRL treat me like there's something wrong with me when I admit that yeah, I feel attracted to, well, attractive people or either gender, but have never once slept with one, and that just made me question all the more whether I was actually bi or ace or what, adding to my insecurity.

 This sub is super open and supportive (moreso than r/lgbt and others tbh) so I was wondering if anyone else here is in the same boat? If not, oh well, just means maybe *I* am the unicorn. Either way, keep being you, keep being awesome! : )",bisexual
Tomorrow I'm coming out to my friends,"It's been a while thinking about my sexuality and I [M, 18] finally accepted and realized that I am Bisexual. And now that I am comfortable with being bi I'm going to tell to my two friends, I'm a bit nervous but I think it's the right thing to do and I'm prepared for that. Thank you for reading!

(sorry for any grammatical mistake) ",bisexual
Please don’t hate me.....,But why lemon bars? What dose it mean? ,bisexual
Recently came out as bi and now I'm being asked to give advice,"I've (m22) only known I'm bi for a little over a month, I decided to rip off the bandaid and told all my family members sooner rather than later.

I'm pretty happy to just take each day as it comes and just be more open minded to future opportunities, it honestly hasn't changed much in day to day life and I'm fine with that.

A family friend who's only 17 has come to the realisation their bi this week and now they're meeting up with me to talk about it, feel validated and get advice. I'm still pretty new and how I'm choosing to handle the news might not be best for them.

So what does the community suggest? Any generalised advice that applies to all people going through this? I'd hate to imply they're just confused or miscommunicate and cause offence. 

I guess while I'm asking advice for them it's worth mentioning I'm pretty open minded to any advice for myself, thanks for taking the time to read this.

",bisexual
A little update thread on my friend crush situation. (Advice please?),"i have a friend who ive known since high school who've ive gotten closer to through a group of our other two friends. Even though i don't have physical/romantic experience with either gender, I'm out as not straight and she and the other friends know are super open and supportive I'm . technically bi, but lean more to girls even though i prefer no labels. I started to develop a romantic interest/crush on this friend when i saw signs she's possibly not straight.

1st, i found her swiping through girls on this popular dating app (however, i know straight girls can use it for friends) other signs included her liking quite a few my tweets/retweets on twitter in relation to bisexuality and being into girls. it also doesn't help she has a flirtatious personality with everyone, but then again, she's just a sweetheart.

After a few months, i felt the need to tell someone. so, i told one of the friends from the group, then the other friend (which happens to be her best friend as well).

the best friend was surprised and asked what made me suspect she could be bi (being she likes guys a lot), i explained and she said theres nothing to feel embarrassed about, but that i should tell my crush just to get it off my chest, and get more experience in not holding back and expecting a relationship to come out of it.

later, i ended up texting the friend very casually about having a crush on her and i just wanted to get it off my chest, and about not being sure of her sexuality.

i didn't want to make things awkward. i said it doesn't matter if she doesn't feel the same way , that her friendship means a lot to me and I'm grateful to at least be that. her first response was ""why didn't u tell me sooner? how long have you been feeling this way?""

i then explained and she replied ""well ive always been open with my sexuality but I'm not sure I'm completely bi. right now I'm just curious. still figuring out what i like. (this happened almost a year ago)

once i finally experiment with girls ill finally figure it out"" and of course i wanted to offer my support and said that i hopes she finds herself. she said ""thank you. just know i love you and that you can talk to me about anything.

things will never get awkward and i hope were friends for a long time too"" she then asked how did i suspect she's bicurious? then i explained to her, and she didn't reply after that. from there, things haven't been any different and she still texts out friend group chat like everything's normal, joking around and stuff.

i cant help but to want to spend more time with her in person, and get even closer as friends. obviously i should leave this case. i deff don't want to bring it up again or pressure, but i cant help that being she technically didn't say she didn't like me back, i think theres hope?

its kind of ambiguous. then again, i think because she's veery sweet (sometimes almost too nice) she probably didn't feel comfortable saying that straight up.

ever since that last year, I've been getting a little closer to her little by little, but seem to mainly see her through our mutual close friend all together. one time an old guy friend from the group we all haven't seen in a while, hung out at my crush's house catching up and drinking some wine. he asked about my life and dating/sexuality. then he brought up about my crush being bi-curious, and she immediately said, ""yeah thats not a secret""

and I replied to him saying I already knew but tried to change the subject to not make things awkward. another time I hung out with her and our friend, she texted me, ""hey bitcchhh I had a lot of fun with you. I hope the feeling was mutual. goodnight boo hope to see you soon &lt;3"" and I replied about of course of the feeling being mutual, and so on. she then said, ""I'm sorry I just don't want to feel like I annoy you.

I get anxiety about that"" I reassured her that wasn't the case whatsoever, and that she could talk to me about anything and whats most important is that I make her feel comfortable. she said, ""I'm starting to feel closer to you and really comfortable like I can talk to you about anything""

I'm trying to not read into things, but another my crush and our friend who was in the car played this gay song called, ""I wanna be ur girlfriend"" by girl in red. our friend said, ""look, a song for you"" and Idk if she was telling that to me or my crush, but it was about this girl who wants to more than friends with this other girl named Hannah. and I couldn't help but to think if it was playing through the aux on my crush's phone, or our friend, and then I thought she was low-key trying to hint something to me.

at the same time, I don't think she could ever feel anything for me more than as a friend considering she doesn't get jealous when I when on a few dates with someone else. she was happy for me. then when this other girl hit on me after a concert, and I told my crush that the girl said I was really cute, she was like ""you are. you're beautiful. you should've gotten her number""

then my crush was showing our friend messages on this dating she got from other girls and asking me if I thought they're cute :/ which kinda confused me and made me think I'm deep in the friend zone. thoughts? have any of you been the same position, and turned sour? or in your favor?",bisexual
Wanting to freely accept myself,"A bit long, so I apologize. 

I am a bi female with a bi male fiancee. We both found out we were bi at relatively the same time before we got engaged, years after we started dating. 

At the moment we are long distance because we go to different universities, and ever since he started going to their lgbt group, he's been extremely open and happily bi. He's been going to social groups, coming out to people,  and even went to a pride fest. 

Meanwhile, I've been more quiet and closed about it. I've done a few things, I got a little pin and I went to the lgbt group on my campus, but I got the vibe these weren't my kind of people. (Not too much similar interest or personality). I tried coming out to family, though my mom told me it was a choice and I was caving to my liberal school, and my grandma said I shouldn't get married if I'm like this, and I should keep it to myself. 

I want to be free and open and celebrate like my SO, but I feel a bit trapped. Not too sure where to go out what to do. Has anyone else had this issue? I know I'm valid, I just want to celebrate that validity. ",bisexual
"Hello! I'm a 25 year old male, who is bisexual, obviously.","I first realised I wasn't straight when I was a young teen, when I was a child I remember wondering why men married women and women married men, but why didn't men marry men and women marry women? I also realise now that the funny feeling in my stomach when I was around a boy I liked wasn't because we were 'good friends' but because I had a crush..  
I came out to a friend when I was maybe 13-14 years old, in turn he told me he was gay and we never spoke about it again.. I told another friend who told me it didn't matter to her and she supported me.  
I was 15-16 when I told my mother.. I somehow managed to do it, stumbling through ""Well.. You know how.. You know how people can be greedy?.."" (long story short, she accepted me for me, even though I've had to explain certain things to her since then she has never not accepted me.)  
I told my father when I was 18, in a car, with a paper cup with coffee in it.. I remember looking at the cup while I told him his son was bisexual and that I hoped he still loved me.. And he just said ""Like I didn't already know?"".  
I've been lucky..  
After I told my father I told everyone else the best way I knew how.. Facebook, of course. And I was surprised at how accepting everyone was.. No questioning, just accepting and moving on with life.. I got what I wanted.  


I've never dated, or had sex with anyone. (It's a long story, maybe I'll share it one day.) but I've had crushes that make me lay awake at night thinking about that person.. Those fun butterflies in my stomach, wanting to be near people and to see them smile or laugh.. Wanting to hold them tightly.  
My sexuality is clear to me, even though I spent time questioning and wondering, I know what it is now. And I'm happy with it.

I hope that if you're questioning your sexuality right now you understand that one day it'll be clear to you, bi, straight or gay.. It doesn't really matter in the end as long as you're happy with it.",bisexual
Are your standards for male vs female partners similar or different?,"I've been thinking more about how I experience attraction recently, and I've started to think that there are different factors of attraction. There's general attractiveness, like having a symmetric face and clear skin. There's prettiness, which is culturally associated (whether you agree with it or not) with things like delicate features, longer hair, large eyes, youthfulness, etc. And there is handsomeness, which is culturally associated with strength, stature, a strong jawline, facial hair, etc. Typically women are judged by the first two standards, while men are judged by the first and the last. Does anyone find that, as a bi person, they don't look for the typical markers of attractiveness in one gender or the other.

Here's some personal info explaining why I'm asking, if anyone is interested:

I wasn't sure until recently that I was bi, because I preferred women a lot, but I've been realizing recently that the way my attraction works is that I judge both women and MEN on the scale of prettiness, not handsomeness. For instance, I can look at someone like a male model and think, ""That's a man who most people would find handsome,"" but I get no tingles from looking at a man's biceps or beard or whatever. I feel like there is an aspect of attraction to men which most straight women and gay men experience that it totally foreign to me. When other women talk about how their boyfriend makes them feel safe by being able to protect them physically, my reaction is basically, ""That sounds useful from a utility standpoint, but how does that translate into sexual or romantic attraction?""

I thought I was a lesbian as a young teenager, and entered the world of bisexuality through androgynous celebrities like David Bowie and Japanese rock stars, but the thing is, I don't think it's a matter of me wanting men to be as similar to women as possible. When I'm attracted to androgynous men, I'm *more* attracted to them because they are male and feminine at the same time. I'm definitely not gay (not to get into TMI but I definitely like sex with men), I just, for whatever reason, apply somewhat feminine beauty standards to the men I'm attracted to.

This makes me worry a bit, because if I am with a man long term, I worry that the male aging process would masculinize his features, like a lot of young men who have long hair and androgynous features tend to develop a hairy back and chest, cut their hair short when it thins, and age into a more mature and ""handsome"" look. Maybe that's a dumb thing to worry about, though.

Can anyone else relate?",bisexual
Bisexuality Solves Problems,,bisexual
Sad sex,"I feel bad about having sex on the first date because it turned out to be bad, but the guy seems to like me and keeps texting me, and I’m trying to be nice but i don’t wanna lead him on. 
We don’t have that much in common anyway, and i honestly just think he’s into me cuz he thinks i look like timothee chalamet with the long hair. Maybe a haircut will solve this? Lmao. HELP. ",bisexual
could i be bi?,"I am 24F , no sexual experience whats over and identify as straight . Off late I catch myself checking out hot women , I keep googling pics of hot women in underwear , watch them till they are out of my sight on the roads, sometimes as an eye candy and also out of jealousy. I fantasize about males but personally never found anyone I want to have sex with (male or female) . I think i like boobs and would rather see a naked woman but i don't think I want to have full on sex or be in love with a women ever. Could i be bi in future ? I mean develop more feelings towards women? I am curious and bit confused",bisexual
"The UK's first bisexual dating show ""The Bi Life"" airs today on E! at 9pm! 💙💗💜",,bisexual
I was reading the post about the person who had their teacher make them lemon bars for their birthday and made a startling realization.,"Not only do I love them but, so did my mom 😶 whoomp there it is..",bisexual
There is a good chance this was cross posted already but it is too true and needs to be spread again. This is how I am responding to biphobia from gay guys from now on.,,bisexual
History class is where I learned I was bi.,,bisexual
Is ghosting a common trend on tinder?,I swear it happens every time I will be talking to a guy on tinder then get ghosted after a few messages it honestly made me put no effort into tinder at all cause I always is ghosted constantly. ,bisexual
"When you aren't feeling like a flannel, hoodie, OR leather jacket... my targeted adds say I'm a shiny Bi",,bisexual
Something I just have to say...,"Hello World! I'm a fucking bisexual! Screw all the religious bigots out there! We should support the freedom of people wherever they may be!

&gt; “It takes no compromise to give people their rights...it takes no money to respect the individual. It takes no political deal to give people freedom. It takes no survey to remove repression.”   
&gt;  
&gt;“Gay brothers and sisters,... You must come out. Come out... to your parents... I know that it is hard and will hurt them but think about how they will hurt you in the voting booth! Come out to your relatives... come out to your friends... if indeed they are your friends. Come out to your neighbors... to your fellow workers... to the people who work where you eat and shop... come out only to the people you know, and who know you. Not to anyone else. But once and for all, break down the myths, destroy the lies and distortions. For your sake. For their sake. For the sake of the youngsters who are becoming scared by the votes from Dade to Eugene.”   
&gt;  
&gt; “All men are created equal. Now matter how hard they try, they can never erase those words. That is what America is about.”   
― **Harvey Milk**

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
The good thing is that they don't have to choose,,bisexual
The Good Place,Anyone see tonight's episode of The Good Place? Bi Eleanor is official!,bisexual
The Bi-life if any of you cuties were interested,,bisexual
"I'm a 5'3"" top. How can I bang bottoms that are literally a foot taller than me, but most girls won't even give me a chance due to my height?","I just had a pretty good hookup with a guy that was 6'4"", over a foot taller than me. So it got me thinking. I've been with a handful of guys that we're literally a foot taller than me, and most guys I've been with have been average height or above, which is still significantly taller than me.

And don't get me wrong, I've had dates and hookups with girls that were taller than me too, but it's nothing compared to the number of guys I've been with.

Disclaimer: I'm not trying to be woe is me, it sucks being short. People are allowed to have their preferences, I just find it funny that most guys don't care compared to most girls, even though I play the ""man"" role when I'm with guys.",bisexual
Anyone find themselves questioning their sexuality because they don’t act like a gay stereotype?,"Like legit there is this straight guy who acts like a gay stereotype and I feel super insecure around him because like I feel I’m not acting gay enough Lol. Like I don’t really have to be a gay stereotype to be Bi right I can be my normal awkward, weird shy self? Oft I feel so weird. Like tbh I don’t really like the gay stereotype tbh... don’t mind feminine guys but the flamboyant stereotype is odd to me. ",bisexual
My new pin just came today!,,bisexual
"Bi-Cycle, wtf.","This is gonna be weird and disjointed because I’m tired and I should probably be sleeping. I’m a woman in a wlw relationship, and right now I’m very much attracted to men. Like, my girlfriend is the world to me, and I would never think to betray her by doing something unforgivable.
Not to mention I find her extremely attractive and adorable.

But Jesus Christ on a cracker, I am craving male sexual energy. There’s this guy that works at a gas station I go to sometimes, and I was struggling not to imagine us together when I bought some tampons there today. And then tonight, I watched No Country for Old Men for the first time, and I found Chigurh bizarrely arousing, as horrifying as that sounds. It’s like a craving out of nowhere.

I haven’t been this attracted to men in over a year and a half. I’d almost been exclusively into women. I honestly thought maybe I was a lesbian for a bit. I was wrong (though after my dating experience with guys, I have to say dating women is a hell of a lot easier, and I could be exclusively homoromantic.) 

I’ve never experienced such a hard swing in sexual attraction before. What does it meeeean... 

Sorry, like I said, tired as fuck. Please excuse this dumb post. ",bisexual
A Bisexual dating app,I don’t know if it’s been suggested but it’d be cool if there was a bisexual dating app. I am looking for a relationship but I don’t really want one with a straight woman or gay man. I’d prefer a bi or pan partner. Or maybe I’m being picky?,bisexual
My social life in a nutshell,,bisexual
Man's love vs. Woman's love,"(This is a question for bisexual girls.) Does it feel different when a boy/girl loves you? I've never been in a relationship, so I'm wondering. If I were to make a generalisation, I would say that the way a girl loves you is more peaceful and calm while a boy's love is more dynamic and protective. What's your experience?",bisexual
Black Friday is coming!,"I am Really Looking Forward to November 23th. How do you like this Shopping Team Shirt i found? I love it!

https://i.redd.it/fhudgrqg1iu11.png",bisexual
Being stealthily bi at Work.,,bisexual
Guess us males are gonna have to unsubscribe,,bisexual
DAE identify as bisexual but prefer same-sex relationships for one reason or another?,"I’m trans-feminine and I identify myself under the bi/pan/queer umbrella, but for some reason I’ve always found same-sex partnerships to be more “natural” than opposite-sex ones. This applies to myself and to other people as well. 

Before I realized I was trans and transitioned, I leaned more toward men and perceived myself as a gay man. Now that I’m on the other side of the gender spectrum, I lean more toward women. I guess I’m just much more attracted to “sameness”. Anyone else?",bisexual
Im a bi and i like this guy but i am unsure as to whether or not he is in the lgbtq+ community,"There is this guy in my math class and i am thinking that he might like me. I catch him looking at me occasionally, like the i see his face and it darts away kind, and he mimics some of my body movements like crossing my arms, crossing legs, ect. The main problem is, i have no clue as to his sexuality and i only have suspicions but no evidence, things like how he has never had a girlfriend yet, or whenever this one guy that sits next to him talks about girls or dating he is never really interested, but i know that doesn't necessarily mean anything. I don't know if im reading to much into this but are there other factors i should be looking into? Or am i just crazy?",bisexual
I put the Bi in Bitter,"idk if it has been posted on this sub yet but there is a cute little web-series on youtube called ""I Put the Bi in Bitter""! It focuses on a bi girl in high school, the entire first season is up and each episode is only 3-4 minutes so its a quick watch! its very cute imo :') 

link to the show playlist: [https://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PL9GvoHL2CpNapGh2iG0jQgBFeq8\_djdC\_](https://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PL9GvoHL2CpNapGh2iG0jQgBFeq8_djdC_)  
",bisexual
Bi pride plaid tie-dye,,bisexual
Can someone help me,"Long story short I was raised by a conservative Christian family that showed me conversion therapy. I went no contact a year ago but the scars remain. I have nightmares at least once a week, usually every other day about them.

I can't have any sexual thoughts without a panic attack basically. Um, I'm sorry I don't know where to post this. 

I don't like to call myself bisexual but that's the most logical description of me. If this is the wrong sub please tell me who can help me.

EXTRA: I am an adult and haven't kissed or anything. I'm able to download dating apps and all of that, but I have too much shame to meet up with anyone. But I'm also so sexually frustrated I can't focus on my work. 

I can't even tell my therapist, it just makes me so ashamed I literally can't tell anyone. I joke that I'm ambidextrous but its too much for me to say.",bisexual
I came out to my supervisor!,"I’m a younger guy and I work at a grocery store. I work with a really fun, relaxed group of people. Even supervisors and managers are fun to be around. But the other night my supervisor was talking to a coworker and myself and she openly came out as bi. I was taken back by her bravery and how easy it was for her to just come out. Especially in the south. 

When I had a chance I talked to her personally and came out to her as bi. It felt so good just to let it out freely. I didn’t chicken out, I just let it out. It went great though and we shared experiences and stories. I’m out to a few other people but it took a while to build myself up to come out to them. But it felt great to freely discuss my sexuality without being worried sick or full of regret!",bisexual
"Body hair on female partners? Yay or nay. (Asking for a friend, cough)","I’m talking armpits, leg hair, as well as bush. 

What’s the general consensus?

Hetero hegemony seems to be no hair anywhere except on the head, and maybe the eyebrows.... 

Advice and suggestions please. 

I have body hair right now and I assume if I want to get busy, I have to get rid of it. 

I have very sensitive skin so Id really prefer to leave my hair where it is, but “love hurts” I guess :(
",bisexual
I have this crush on this trans woman and I am doubt about being a good bisexual,"Recently, I've been fantasizing about this beautiful and passable post-op trans woman and it's been bugging me a little bit due to the fact that I identify as bisexual (I am mostly attracted to women and I am male). I worry that if I were to meet this woman and tell her that I'm bi, she might think I am some kind of fetishist. I would like to note that I do believe that trans identities are valid and that I want to pursue a relationship for the right reasons.

From age 14 to 20, I have had a strong sex drive and would often fantasize about having sex (usually with women) and it would often come with grief and shame due to how feminists view men with strong sex drives. For me, 2015 was part of my golden age in my sexuality. I discovered so many things about my attractions and desires that I never knew before. It was also around the time I started educating myself on transgender issues and gender identity. There were cases where I would find ""passable"" trans women attractive and I would often had to suppress those feelings out of fear of being labeled a fetishist or a ""tr*nny chaser"". 

The fact that I was discovering my bisexuality at the same time didn't really helped. I feel like if I were to label myself bisexual while finding trans women attractive would mean being low key transphobic. As if disclosing my bisexual status meant that I am invalidating the experiences of trans women. But I am not. I am saying that trans women are real women. Also, my intent is not to fetishize anyone. I believe that I should treat people how I would like them to treat me. I am a black man and I don't want people to fetishize me for my skin color.

I don't know what to say. I think that I am being a bad bisexual for finding trans women attractive even though people say that it's OK. I need guidance. I would appreciate your feedback.",bisexual
Netflix’s Terrace House (spoilers)!,"So I finally caught up on Terrace House Opening New Doors and I’m so excited that the newest member is bi!!
He wants to experience being open with his sexuality while living with boys and girls and I can’t wait to see how things go!
I hope that no one is mean to him, but I also hope people aren’t fake-understanding towards him.
He came out by going on the show, which is so brave of him! I’m guessing he wanted to push himself to except and explore his bisexuality.

If you haven’t watched Terrace House I highly recommend it!

It’s a Japanese reality show and I know, I know reality shows can be really fake and contrived; but this one is engaging, subtle, and the commentary that comes with every episode is hilarious (think Talking Dead kind of after show, but the segments are spread throughout the episode)",bisexual
Figured this would be funny,,bisexual
Whats better people,Girls with short hair or guys woth long hair? 🤔🤔🤔🤔🤔🤔🤔🤔,bisexual
👭 Walking in public holding hands (22F &amp; 24F)... how to handle rude comments?,"So I (22F) have been seeing this girl (24F) for two months now. We have gotten to the point now where we hold hands in public. I know this is something that makes her nervous as she mentioned it was hard for her to do in her past relationship with a female because she worried about what people would say/think. 

Because I know it makes her nervous I want to kind of know what things have been said to you and how you deal with it so I know what to expect. Is it best to just ignore people who say anything? Also this might be really naive but is it safe for us to hold hands in public at night as two women? 

When I would walk with my ex who was also a girl we had a few comments form sleazy guys saying they’d want to go home with us but never anything actually homophobic (thank god). I live in Toronto which is pretty progressive but honestly my expectations aren’t very high. 

One last thing unrelated- do you guys smile at other lgbtq2+ people you see holding hands in public? I always have the urge to smile but I know it could make people feel singled out or something idk. Let me know and thanks in advance!!!! ",bisexual
"Please help, I'm (26M) very confused about my sexuality. (And rant.)","TL;DR: The prospect of being with another man repulses me, but I like things up my butt and would love to be with a beautiful trans woman, with or without a penis. 

Hi, everyone, I'm a 26 year old guy who's been 100% straight for 26 years, and who just realized is definitely not straight anymore. Literally, just now. I have no one in the world to talk about this with, so please. I humbly ask for your help and support. Please be warned. I have this... I don't know what it is but every time I write something in an online forum, I have this superpower or something that I just incite the ire and hatred of everyone instantly. Something about my tone as a writer maybe? Tons of times I receive hatred for my views and I go back and re-read what I wrote and I'm like, ""dude! This is totally reasonable shit, why'd you get so pissed?!?"" Just please, don't hate me. There's just so much going on in my life right now, and now this? I just have a lot in my mind and literally no one to talk to. Apologies in advance for the rant.

 

&amp;#x200B;

My dad's kind of homophobic. I once heard him tell my brother that ""it would be a disappointment if one of his sons turned out gay"". He said he would still love them and support them, but that it would be a disappointment nonetheless. My mom's the only one that has repeatedly assured me that she loves me unconditionally. She told me if I ever brought a man to meet her, she would love him and accept him just because I love him. My mom's literally like the only person in my life who's halfway a decent person in terms of open-mindedness. My ex-best friend is homophobic. He once jokingly told me if I ever became gay to ""never tell him or do anything gay around him"". Whatever, I removed the fucker from my life a long time ago cuz he's an asshole anyway and our friendship ended because of things not related to this post. My family are all catholic conservative bigot ASSHOLES who discriminate others for, like, literally anything. You turned out to be the atheist in the family? You're gonna go to hell. You politically align more to the Left? You're a communist even though in reality you're just center-left. You bring your girlfriend to meet the family and everything's okay, until my cousins found out she was bi. ""She'll leave you for a woman!"". You're pro-choice? You're a baby killer. And on and on and on and on and on. So yeah, I'll probably never come out. Ever. I just don't wanna deal with all the bullshit that will pile upon me if I ever come out. So yeaaaaah, nope. It's okay, though. I never planned on ever coming out anyway. Maybe if things change in the future I will, but I am completely fine never coming out.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

So how did I come to the realization I'm not straight anymore, you probably wonder? To be fair, my first hint should've been the first time I tried a... um... cylinder-shaped object with a rounded tip and liked it a few years ago. But I had never even thought about it. I thought me liking those kinds of objects up there... It was just a really effective way to increase my pleasure during masturbation at first. Nothing more, nothing less. And the fact that the frequency in which I shoved things up there was really low. The first time I did it I must've been like 23 or something. And from 23-26 I did it about 5 times a year, tops. Well, yesterday was one of those times and something different happened. I had never even considered the possibility of me being bi until just now. Yesterday I found my prostate and had an orgasm through it. Without even touching the John. I didn't even know this was possible and that's the thing that set the gears in motion. I've been thinking about that prostate orgasm ever since, and browsing Pornhub a few minutes ago, it finally clicked. On my Favorite videos, I have A LOT of videos of this trans woman named Vica and her girlfriend Milla. Vica and Milla are both so lovely, so gorgeous. I have a huge crush on them both. And Vica is a trans woman who has not undergone gender-reassignment surgery, so she has a penis. And it's a pretty good looking penis. A penis that I... fantasize about suspiciously often. I finally realized I would be DELIGHTED to have it inside me. I also have a crush on another trans woman named Amoramias, who performs on Chaturbate. Amoramias, in turn, has undergone gender-reassignment surgery and has a vagina. I would LOVE to be with her or someone like her. And I don't just mean for sex. I would totally be delighted to have a relationship or even spend the rest of my life with a trans woman like Amora or Vica. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

So by this point you may probably be saying something along the lines of ""yeah, he's totally bi"", but not so fast! This is the thing that's got me confused. When I think about having sex with another man... A man that looks manly. Or even if not that manly but a man that doesn't look AT ALL feminine... The prospect just plainly disgusts me. Imagining kissing another man just repulses me. It's possible that I MAY be able to give another man a blowjob if perhaps I don't, like, look at him. But just vaguely imagining some manly, muscular, bearded, bald motherfucker sucking my dick is enough to make me cringe. I also wouldn't be able to feel attraction for a transgender woman who looks like Galaxia from *Anger Management*, for example. I guess I am exclusively attracted to feminine women, and feminine trans women, regardless if they have a penis or not. But having a penis would definitely be a plus. But they have to be pretty feminine in order for me to feel attraction and sexual desire towards them. So does that mean I'm bisexual? Or ""Straight with a fetish for feminine-looking trans women""?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

So I logged my throwaway and came to Reddit, because I'm not entirely sure if I'm actually bisexual or something else entirely and I'm not exactly swimmin' in alternatives on who I can ask. Like, maybe I'm straight with a trans woman fetish? If that's even a possibility? I struggle a lot to believe that ""self-definition"" narrative. It's like I WANT to believe I can define on my own what I myself am, but I can't. Like halfway into the process of trying to believe I can define myself as, for example ""Straight with a fetish for feminine trans women"", my inner monologue's like ""oh, what a crock o' shite, you're not the first fucker in the world to like the things you like, so defining yourself is extremely inefficient and imprecise. What is dramatically more probable is that you fall into a definition that already exists, and there are others like you, therefore it's one hell of a lot more efficient to simply search or ask people that know, instead of believing you're this know-it-all that can define yourself, because you'll probably define yourself wrong"". 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

So, there it is, r/bisexual, am I bisexual? What am I? Please tell me. ",bisexual
Saw this on Tumblr thought it would fit here!,,bisexual
I have mixed feelings with something I said to my friends after I came out to them,"After coming out to a few of my friends I said to them that “the only reason that I consider myself bi and not gay is because I still hold the possibility of being with a gorl, but only slightly.” For context I guess I could say I’m kinda on the 80/20 ratio when it comes to liking guys/girls (I’m a guy). Plus I’m not really sexually attracted to girls while I am with guys (especially the thiccc baes)

Does this sound like a stupid statement to say to my friends? I just have a feeling that it sounds a bit off to me in some way but I can’t identify what it is. 

Also, I don’t want to misdirect their perception of me by reaffirming this statement because there’s a relatively small chance that I actually may be more attracted to women than previously thought, that is if I happen to have an encounter with one. That would feel pretty shitty if they thought of me as one thing but then I turn out to be something completely different, almost like I lied to them. 

",bisexual
(25)F in 7 year relationship with (29)M coming out as bi,"Its taken me a long time to admit and not feel guilty for feeling this way. I've decided I'm going to tell my boyfriend but am incredibly nervous about his response. We've lived together for 2 years and do well as a couple. I love him.

 I've hit this wall in my life. I had decided last year to go back to school fulltime for my doctorate. The choice of that is entirely scary on its own. Hes been supportive the entire way thus far. 
Ive had feelings for a couple ladies and have always openly joked with my guy friends about besutiful women at bars at such but never acted upon it.
 I fell in love with my older best friend in highschool and unfortunately she got into a bad drug addiction and lost my trust and love.
 I feel like I'd almost want it to be just between another women and I.
 I just feel so uncomfortable talking about any of it to anyone...
I'm just not sure what to do or say, or if I should do or say anything at all.


Tl;dr unsure if I should tell my boyfriend about wanting to sleep with a woman",bisexual
UPDATE: I'm freaking out. Give me advice that makes sense.,,bisexual
Bi Mulan figure from Funko,,bisexual
"Short Film ""One of the Flowers"" Is An Ode To Bisexuality",,bisexual
I came across this plant today! I need it!,,bisexual
Genuine question because i am dumb and bi,"so i use tinder, and since i’m bi i have preferences set to men and women. i met this super sweet person with an androgynous name and face and we’ve been chatting for weeks. we have a date set up soon but i genuinely have no idea what pronouns to use with them and i feel like i’ve left it for too long (WEEKS) to ask. what do i do?!",bisexual
I emailed my doctor about PreP,"A little background. My father is a retired physician. And he used to be on the board for one of the local hospitals, AND used to be Chief of Staff, AND because he was an OB, people come up to me all the time telling me that my father delivered their baby, or their daughter’s baby, etc. 

I go to a family practice doc whose practice was bought by the hospital my father is affiliated with.  As a doctor’s kid, I’ll tell you that hipaa is not always followed. 

I am not out to my father because he believes “there’s no such thing as bisexual.” And I worry that he will find out that I’m going to go on PreP. 

It won’t be the end of the world if he finds out, but it will be something that I don’t want to deal with right now for various reasons. 

For those perusing my profile, yes I am married to a straight woman and yes she knows I am bi and that I play with men (she totally accepts and supports me AND she likes to watch 2+ guys play....lol) and that I want to go on PreP. 

Anyway, I just wanted to share because this was something I have been worrying about but I just pressed that big ‘send’ button. Phew!",bisexual
My fingers are different lengths....,,bisexual
Did anyone tune into the bi life tonight?,"I didn't watch it since I felt a little awkward watching it on the living room with my mother, is it worth the watch? And can I by any chance watch it online?",bisexual
Only 9% of Bisexuals are in same-sex relationships?,"My fraternity son (who's gay) sent me a photo of a statistic that 9% of bisexuals in committed relationships are in same-sex relationships, and said it was a problem that needed to be addressed.
Between 5%-10% of the population is LGBTQIA+ (depending on what statistic you're looking at), so let's assume it's just under 10%. Which, unsurprisingly, is the same percentage that same-sex bisexual relationships hover. 

But I think he does bring up an interesting point, and I'd love to know your opinion. I think there's definitely (for me at least) the subconscious idea that an opposite-sex relationship will be simpler to navigate because almost everything we're socially taught is focused on heterosexuality. And there's obviously a way bigger pond of potential opposite-sex partners.",bisexual
There are a lot of topics about the fear of coming out to the people you love. So i wanted to share the effects that could come of this action.,"Ive shared this in the OITNB (orange is the new black) thread but ill post it here. Im so happy to find a group that shares my feelings.. someone.. who can relate to what im feeling.

Ive always had feelings for my fellow female classmates ever since high school but ive always kept it a secret in the close knit-racial purist chinese community in the philippines.

While watching this show, it started bringing up these feelings i havent felt in a long time. But i had to do something.

So i kept thinking about how to tell my husband i was bisexual. It took me about 2 months but i finally told him. And it was a relief despite the chance that it could have gone horribly wrong. (He called it a disease!)

He wasnt so happy with it but he was very accepting. Ü and i feel so free like i never have before! And it was so worth the risk! 

Lets stand up for ourselves and get that lump off our throats!",bisexual
bi girl crushing on coworker,so i just broke up with a bf of 3 years. never had a chance to experiment before him but always thought girls were hot. i met this amazing girl at work who is everything i could have imagined. i’m really nervous about having to disclose our soon to be relationship because of course i don’t want to get in trouble for hiding it but then i’ll be forced to come out. any advice?,bisexual
"when bi people ask if i'll always be bi i say ""it might change"" but when monos ask i turn around in this","&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/nplldt0ukau11.jpg",bisexual
DAE track their bi-cycle?,"I've started keeping track of my bi-cycle in hopes of finding a pattern, since in the past year it's been so volatile and my attraction shifts basically on a daily basis. Wondering if anyone else is doing it, and what tools do you use for that? (Apps, diaries..?)",bisexual
Cleveland bi-curious guy wondering where to begin (xpost r/bibros)," I'm  37, never married and have recently accepted the fact that I am bi.  To  this point, I have never been with a guy before but would like to meet  one.  At this point though, I'm not sure if I am better off trying to  find a hookup or someone who I could potentially start a relationship  with.

I have never been big on hookups or  one night stands and would probably prefer to meet someone interested  in a relationship, but because I've never been with a guy before I don't  want my inexperience to potentially ruin a good thing.  Does anyone  have any advice on what my best route would be?

Also, if anyone is in the Cleveland area and wants to talk, message me.  I would love to make some new bi friends.",bisexual
Sad,,bisexual
So I need some advice on a crush I’m developing.,So I’m Demi-bi. And I create emotional bonds easily (which is never a good thing) and I think I’m developing a crush on one of my friends. But I know he’s just being nice. He knows I’m bi and is ok with me. But I don’t know what I’m feeling or how I should react. So if anybody has gone through something similar. Or just has good advice I would appreciate it. ,bisexual
I have questions...,"So, if you are bi does that mean you are interested in men and women? Are you also interested in trans men and women? Because if they identify as a man or as a woman they fall under the same category? If so, what is the difference between pan and bi? And if you’re not interested in trans men or women, does that make you transphobic? 

Personally, I have no issues with any of it and I’m trying to ask this as respectfully as possible, so if you have any suggestions on how to better ask these questions please let me know and I’d be happy to rephrase! I’ve identified as Bi for a while, but only recently started interacting with the community. ",bisexual
Found this on Pinterest,,bisexual
Is it okay to have a crush on a straight guy?,I don’t know very much because I haven’t been here long :),bisexual
Colorful hair!,,bisexual
Need Bi Male Advice,"Hi, I’m in a committed relationship with a man that is bi that has never acted on his desire. We’ve discussed threesomes in detail and have played with toys. I know he really wants to explore the real thing. I’m completely ok with a third and he and I both want to have a threesome with a bi man. The advice I’m asking is how do you meet other bi men? We’ve discussed parties and have gone on tinder and fetlife, but it seems like the men are either not very attractive (not being insulting, I mean like 30+ years older than me and some making creepy comments that we wouldn’t even entertain) or are more interested in one or the other. It’s probably like asking for a unicorn, but I’d love to meet someone organically and have chemistry. I live in NYC and we’ve gone to a couple of gay bars and he gets all of the attention (can’t fault them, my guy is very hot!) but we really don’t know how to even bring up that it’s the both of us that he’s meeting. Neither one of us wants the person to feel like an object, but we are in a solid happy relationship and want to have some fun and hopefully not just a one night event. We’d love to have a FWB type situation with an attractive bisexual man. Any tips or ideas of how to approach this? Any experienced couples been in a similar situation??

",bisexual
Same,,bisexual
Is it okay for Bisexuals to fetishise other Bisexuals?,Like you know how we get annoyed about how guys fetishise Bi girls and women fetishise Bi guys... Is it okay for us to do it to other Bisexuals? Like Idk I find the idea of dating or having sex with a Bi girl/guy more enticing than a straight girl or gay guy. Idk like I find a person more sexually enticing if they are Bisexual... is the wrong/weird? ,bisexual
My parents gifted me this notebook to use at work.,,bisexual
Can we get a hand shake or signal ?,Like something that would be picked up on if your into a guy /girl you do this subtle trick if they’re bi they’ll be like oh your bi cool other than universally claiming the phrase I like lemon bars as the signal ? Which is is an issue Cause I don’t like lemon bars .... haha,bisexual
Have you ever want to search for someone to share your things on internet?,"Sometimes you may feel lonely. When you are alone, you may want to find a partner to talk about your troubles, but you can't find the right person to share your sorrow. Will you register some dating sites to find the right person to chat? ",bisexual
Just leave me in my bubble!!,,bisexual
Looking for personal stories!,"Hi, i’m doing reasearch on sexual orientations. My class and I will do a play/musical about it and we want to do it as accurately as possible. We are looking for real stories from people who are gay, transgender, pansexual,... if you’d like to contact me, send me a message :) ",bisexual
The scale?,So my husband came out to me as bi. Still trying to process that one as it’s made me feel like he doesn’t want me....that’s a story for a different day. Anyway everyone always references the scale (Kinsey?) hetero at one end and homo at the other. Is that scale important? Does where you place yourself change? I’m super scared that he may be actually gay and not willing to admit it (risk losing our family etc).,bisexual
"Came out to my parents, did not go well","Last night I (M24) got a call from my family, just checking in, nothing unusual. My mom asked ""How's your love life?"" because apparently my grandma had some girl she wanted to try and set me up with. I don't know why, but it seemed as good a time to let them know that I was actually dating a boy. We had a long talk where I tried to explain why I felt the way I do and where they basically talk me out of it. We talked again today and my mom said that last night she felt the same way she did when she found out my little brother had cancer (full remission). 

At this point I honestly don't know what to do. My relationship with my parents, and my family as a whole has always been amazing, they've supported me through some pretty dark points in my life. I knew that this would strain our relationship, but I had no idea how badly. Part of me wishes that I could go and take it all back and go back to the way that things were a few hours ago. My dad, and especially my mom, made it clear that they think what I'm doing is sinful and threw around some of our favorite lines like ""lots of people experiment in college"" and ""it's just a choice"". My mom asked that I stop seeing the guy I'm dating right now until we can have a serious discussion. And honestly, right now the whole situation has me so stressed and anxious that I'm not I'd be able to anyways without getting my emotions wrapped up. We only met a few weeks ago and have only gone out once so far, so it's not like I'm burning a serious relationship or anything. I have immense respect for my parents, but as much as I want to make them happy I don't want to just bow to their whim and give up. It's taken me so long to get to the point where I feel comfortable and safe talking to them about it and now the past day has had me second guessing everything. I'm living on campus right now, so at least we don't have to constantly pretend like everything is okay.

I guess I should also point out that they're helping to pay for a lot of my tuition, and my mom made it clear that she's willing to cut me off. And I'm still a Christian, I've just learned to rectify my faith with my sexuality.

Thanks for sticking through my anxious ramblings. Hope your lemon bars are tart and your jeans cuffed 👉😎👉",bisexual
Update on coming out to my mom,"It went amazing. She said that she loves me no matter what and to be myself because who I am is perfect. She asked if she could do anything for me or do anything differently for this, and she offered me counselling for moving forward with it if I wanted. She said she knows how confusing a time it is for teenagers like me because of hormones and other things, but no matter who I am she loves me. She didn't say anything about it when she got home, and I don't think it'll be mentioned again.

I can't believe it went this well. I'm so happy and relieved that it went the way it did.",bisexual
I consistently say “penis” to deal with my repressed feelings,"Like I’m just randomly humming a song and I just blurt out “penis” and my friends prob wonder why I say it so much. Prob cause I like dick and I CANT OPENLY SAY ANYTHING ABOUT IT TO ANYONE CAUSE IM A CLOSETED BICH IN COLLEGE SO THE ONLY WAY TO EXPRESS THIS IS BY SAYING PENIS ALL THE TIME FUCCC

Btw I’m completely aware that there are other ways to deal with this but I’m just a fuckin weirdo
",bisexual
RGB memory making a statement,,bisexual
The Bi Life starts tonight!,"A reminder for my UK bisexual pals that the Bi Life starts tonight on E at 9pm! I just saw Courtney Act on Good Morning Britain and she was talking about how nice it is - there's no prize it's just a bunch of young bi's looking for love. They actually go on dates with people outside of the house but she hinted that people do find love within the group.

I personally am very excited. I'm not usually into reality tv but with Courtney Act and what I've heard it seems like it's been done really well. They've even released a few videos on YouTube trying to dispel myths about bisexuality. 

FINALLY SOME REPRESENTATION! AHH SO EXCITING!!

Hopefully a few of you will be watching so I can discuss. ",bisexual
how do you deal with internalised homophobia?,"if you’ve ever had to deal with it.

eg “it’s totally fine for other people to like the same sex but i still hate myself for it” etc

edit: asking for a friend of course",bisexual
I've got a new phone background 📱,,bisexual
"I think i might be trans, and being bi nakes things convenient.","I'm assigned male, but in the year since I've accepted being bi, I've been thinking about my identity a lot lately and I don't think I'm cis. My egg has basically just cracked and I'm not sure if I indentity as a woman or non-binary at this point tbh. 

It's really nice to have the bisexual community around me and it's nice to know that I'm bi regardless of my true identity. ",bisexual
Not sure if this counts but I like it :),,bisexual
I think the sky might be bi!,,bisexual
I’m much happier :),"(I’m 18 and male) All throughout my life I had liked girls and a few times had crushes on boys as well shrugging them off bc I was scared to be anything but straight. About 2 months ago, from the help of a crush I had, I realized there isn’t anything wrong with being not straight. I finally came out to myself as bi and I didn’t know how I was gonna tell anyone, I was scared to death. About a month later i flipped a coin and lost, so I told my good friend I was bi and she thought it was sweet and told me how brave I was. 
My best friend now (different person) is a trans female to male who I never expect to have a lot in common with but after I came out to him he and I are inseparable besties. I’ve come out to a few of my other friends but I don’t think I’ll ever be able to come out to my family bc of past experiences I’d rather not talk about. I love gay things and I’m happy to be here with all of you gay things :))",bisexual
"I swear XFiles reinforces my gayness, like you would not believe",,bisexual
"(M16) I've never had a boyfriend cause all the guys I'm attracted to are either straight, too old for a relationship to be legal, or Troy Baker.",,bisexual
Best £4 I'll ever spend,,bisexual
Nice little flag I made for me in Stardew Valley!!,,bisexual
Bisexual Anxiety,"(33M bi) I still sometimes have fears that people will doubt my bisexuality or ask me to 'prove' it. This thought occurred when I talked to a guy on a dating app and he is very clear with me that he is only into bottoming. I've never topped anyone and so I feel like a bisexual fraud, unsure if I could even satisfy his desire. I was sad so I talked to a close bi friend about cuddling and I felt a little better. I think in writing this I realize that obviously you don't need to top a guy to be bi. I hope my self doubt goes away eventually. Does anyone else feel this way sometimes?",bisexual
"ladies, how do you tell if other girls are gay or bi?","i’m a closeted bisexual girl, and everyone thinks i am straight. i make some subtle (and not so subtle) hints, but they are always completely dismissed. 

i have a gigantic crush on this girl who could also possibly be lgbt but could really be either way. 

my question is: what are some subtle things you have noticed about bisexual girls that are an indication, and what can i do to kind of signal without being too obvious? ",bisexual
💜✨,Hey girl are you a lesbian cause I'm all bi myself 😉,bisexual
Bi culture is not knowing who you are more attracted to in this scene.,,bisexual
"I'm sure you guys get these posts a ton, but I'm so God damn confused.","All through out childhood, I never felt feelings for any guys in any sort of sexual or romantic way, but I'm 18 now, and I feel really different and confused for this reason. I still never feel anything romantic with guys, except one guy I met over the summer. I definitely had a little bit of a crush on this dude. No other guy I've ever felt any sort of romantic feelings towards. I often think dicks are hot, and guys bodies are hot, but it feels really inconsistent for me a lot of the time, and depends on how horny I am. Is it possible to be bisexual and not have romantic feelings towards men? I couldn't imagine myself dating a guy, but I could see myself hooking up with one sometimes. I just don't know what I am, and it's confusing the fuck out of me. I've never felt sexually attracted to any of my guy friends who I see on a daily basis. This is another reason why I'm confused, I feel like I should've at some point if I really am bi.",bisexual
solidarity. [oc],,bisexual
DAE [DISCUSSION],DAE get guy horny &amp; girl horny? I mean I've never heard anyone else talk about it. ,bisexual
"I came out recently. How do couples in committed, long term relationships deal with it when one partner is bi?","This is really causing turmoil in my relationship. My girlfriend knew I was bit but never knew what it actually entailed in terms of emotion or need, and it went undiscussed for a long time. I decided to come out recently, and now that I'm facing my bisexuality head on, I'm realizing I don't know how I can get all of my needs met physically. 

We intend to get married. We both want this relationship to be permanent. I love her and she makes me complete. But I'm having a very hard time explaining to her that I can be completely fulfilled by her and also have a separate need on the other side of the wall at the same time. 

She doesn't get it, and I'm just hurting her feelings over and over, and what she keeps jumping to is me leaving her or something.

I don't want to keep hurting her, but I'm only getting half of my physical needs met while she's getting all of hers. I don't need an emotional relationship with a dude, or anyone outside of her, but I have two completely different sets of needs and I'm kind of dying inside at the thought of never having dick again because I fell in love with a woman. 

Am I crazy here? Am I being selfish or reckless or stupid?

I guess like a FWB type situation would be perfect for me but I don't see any outcome where she accepts that. After all the time it took me to come out, I don't want to continue going through life with the burden of suppressing part of myself while needs go unmet. She is as black-and-white about monogamy as it gets. I haven't even introduced the idea because the getting there has been so upsetting.

She's convinced I'm going to break up with her or cheat, but I don't have any wiggle room here and am going without things I need. I didn't know it would be such a strong need at the start of our relationship, so she feels like I'm pulling the rug out from under her and trying to rewrite the terms of our whole union.

Committed couples, how did you address this issue? And how did you explain how the bi mind works to your partner so they finally understood?",bisexual
Even my phone doesn't believe I'm bi,The auto correct for bi is NO.,bisexual
I'm attracted to both sexes and yet I can't get with either one,,bisexual
"Lost my two FWB in 24h for the same reason, but I played the opposite role in each breakup #justbithings","As the title say, I just lost my two FWB (one male, one female). I'm female BTW.

Just telling you my story because I have no one else to talk to right now. Feel free to ignore my ramble, I'll probably be drunk out of my mind when I finish this. 

**TL:DR : I'm madly in love with my male FWB who doesn't love me and just started a relationship with another woman, and my female FWB just confessed her undying love for me but I don't love her like that so now she's hurt.**

ALSO KIDS LEANRN FROM MY MISTAKE AND DON'T SEXUALLY FUCK WITH YOUR FRIEND IF YOU VALUE YOUR FRIENDSHIPS MORE THAN SEX. 

So I had my male FWB for over a decade now. I was and still am madly in love with him. I would have done anything for him, I fantasized about the day he would realize I was The One. He always ever saw me just as a friend thought and he always described himself as a player, so we agreed to see other people but still remain each other ""main"" """" relationship"""". He had a lot of short term sexual relationships with other women but I was always the main one. And I was totally fine with that. We were best friends, just not boy/girlfriend. Like we always said :all of the advantages of a relationship without the troubles. I never even envisioned growing old without him. 

Anyway, he recently met another girl and I knew she was different. He started cancelling plans with me. He spent evening on the phone with her even when I was with him. He started putting his life in order and finally acting like an adult, which was a first and a telltale sign that things had changed. 

He broke the news to me yesterday. She's moving in with him. In fact, he's gonna be a Dad soon. My world shattered and I'm not proud of how I reacted. I yelled at him, I told him shit I'll regret all of my life. It was bad, really bad. It wasn't fair to him, I knew he didn't loved me like I loved him, it's my fault I was too weak to leave before I got hurt. But he also said shit that he had no reason to say except to hurt me. He knew my deepest insecurities and throw them all in my face. The reason he loves her is because she's everything I'll never be. I'll amidt this one hurt in a very particular way I don't wish on anybody. 

So today, my other FWB, this one female, showed to cheer me up. My relationship with her was vastly different than with him. She was an accident, something that just happened and it was fun so why stop. 

We knew each other since high school. In fact, I had a crush on her which I had confessed at 17yo, when I thought I was a lesbian. We sporadically lost contact over the years whenever her wanderlust spirit grew tired of staying put in the same place. She a free spirit, she travelled the world with nothing more than the clothes on her back, had a ton of life altering experience. She's the most amazing, caring person I know, but also she's incredibly naive to a fault. She developed a nasty drug habit in high school, combined with her naivety and trusting character, lots of unsavoury people did horrible things to her. I always remained the old faithful friend she called when she was in trouble. I did some very sketchy things to get her out of whatever trouble she was in and would still do it anytime. Then she disappeared with nothing more than a goodbye. 

She reappeared in my life maybe 5 years ago. She had lived oversea hiding from her past but her past caught up with her. She ended up in the same bad spots as before so she came back home and fucking deal with it instead of running away. She just appeared at my door saying she was back and we went for coffee. Over the months, one things led to another and she made it very clear she wanted me. She said it was something she often thought about ever since we were 17yo and always regretted not acting on it before. 

As I am not one to refuse such a request, we started to sleep together. Over the years, she often dropped by my place for the night. I always thought we were nothing more than 2 girls having a bit of  fun together. She always said I was her rock, her emotional lighthouse and how her occasional sessions did her a lot of good, both physically and mentally. She grew a lot emotionally during those 5 years and I felt some kind of pride seeing her grow like that. She even tried to dip back in the heterosexual dating pool, and found some guys who were actually great (those relationships didn't work out for other unrelated reasons). 

But back to today, after I told her what happened with him, she just dropped the news that she's in fact madly in love with me, that she dreams about settling in with me for real and forever, that she wants a grown up relationship with the woman she loves. That she never found a man who was more than 1/10 good for her as I was. 

And I'm like no, no... That's not what I want with you. That's what I want with him. You're my friend and I love you but not like that. All those years I just thought we were just having fun but no she was secretly pinning for me. And I feel like such an asshole for telling her ""I love you but not like that"". She was incredibly hurt, I could see it. But it's the cold hard truth. I don't love her like that. Our relationship dynamic is not something I see myself doing in the long run. I can empathize with her good enough, I'm going through the same fucking shit. 

She took it very badly but at least I managed to not say things I will regret so there's that I guess. She was very angry, saying I was not any better than all those guys who used her before. This one hurt like hell too FML. There's no words in this world to properly convey ""I love you and care for you and want to see you happy and safe but I just don't love you like that and the sex was incredible but it was just a bonus I would still love you even if we didn't sleep together but it was nice and I enjoy it but it wasn't why I liked you in the first place"". 

So tonight I'm the fucking dumb nice girl who waited on the sideline for a decade and got angry at a guy when he picked another girl. 

And I'm also the fucking jerk who betrayed the trust of someone who already got burned more than her fair share in life.  

Tonight the two people I love the most in the world hate me. So I'll withdraw from polite society for a few days, Im already pretty drunk, I'll get high then propabaly sign up to join the silent sisters or some kind of covent because apparently relationships are not my thing.",bisexual
I just did it,"I just sent the text telling my mom I'm bisexual. It's kinda long, but I put whatever I thought I should say in it. Hopefully it goes well, I'll be watching anxiously for whatever she says back.

Expect more posts from me about this as things happen.",bisexual
Chart Room??,Do we have one? And if not would we go about one? I barely look/used the chat room feature of reddit.,bisexual
Any couples who look for a third? Where?,"Having trouble finding a bi guy to join us ... Close to giving up. Not looking for a hookup though which may be the problem...how do you find a bi guy to basically ""date"" a couple? Where do we even look cause tinder sucks and so does feeld.",bisexual
What’s the best way to meet women?,"Bi gal here who has no idea how to meet women. All my life it’s just been happenstance when I have met someone. 

I’ve tried apps like Her or Tinder or Bumble and I have no luck with them. It’s so hard to get a conversation going on them. I just want to meet women in the real world.

There are no clubs or bars for lesbians near me. There are gay clubs. Is it worth trying them? From the reviews and stuff it seems primarily to be full of men.

I just... really need advice. This baby bi just doesn’t know where to begin.  :(",bisexual
For those who are stressed about coming out to family: a tale about never knowing how someone will react,"I came out for the first time during a fireside conversation with my mom, roundabout 7 years ago. Our fundamentalist Christian cult days were still not very far behind us, but I was tired of sitting on the realization I’d come to at 19. 

“I mean, I don’t know how you’ll react to this, but if me and Nick don’t work out, it’s not impossible that I might bring a girl home for the holidays at some point.”

My mom nodded, pensive, and then said, “Oh well, you know, I get that. I’d always rather see a naked woman than a naked man.” 

🤷‍♂️",bisexual
Is it a bisexual unicorn?,,bisexual
It seems I can only escape the bi cycle when I suppress one side of my sexuality. Anyone else feel like this?,"So I, 14m, have been questioning for 8 months, and comfortable for about 4 months. The way I finally stopped stressing over this was but completely suppressing my straighter side. I used to be fully straight, but have changed. I now have a boyfriend, but am always doubting myself. i just hate the feeling of being in between. I just want one or the other. I hate being unsure. So I just ignore it. Is it unhealthy to be doing this or has anyone else done this to help cope?",bisexual
"Sorry, I had to...",,bisexual
From one of my favorite tumblrs,,bisexual
help?,"Hi, I’m a bisexual female. I’m only out to a very close friend I’ve known for 8 years who’s also bisexual, and one other pansexual person I know who’s also become a close friend quite quickly. I so badly want to be fully out, but it just seems impossible. My family is totally pro lgbtq+, but they’ve never discussed my sexuality or gender identity with me or ever given me “the a ok”. They’ve never outright said, “you know, we’re perfectly fine if you’re gay”, and I know no parent expects to be the one with a gay kid. I’m their only child too, and it feels like there’s so much on my shoulders for them. Friends of mine make gay jokes and things, and it hurts, but I don’t feel like I have any other options as towards leaving that friend group—I’m forced to be around them at least 4 or 5 hours a day. Basically, I really need to be out of the closet but it just seems so much safer inside it. Another issue, (which I acknowledge is completely on me,) is that I sorta maybe like my one really close bi friend romantically. I’m so afraid of ruining our relationship. please help! Anything at this point, I just want this weight lifted off my chest. Thanks so much in advance.",bisexual
The first time I've seen someone say they're bisexual on a popular show,,bisexual
Happy and validated!!,"Y’all I need to share!! I’ve been thinking about my identity as bisexual but have been in a committed relationship with an man for almost a year. I got to the point that not ever dating women was really making me feel like I didn’t know myself. I expressed this to my partner yesterday and he’s comfortable with me exploring my sexuality. I feel so validated and excited to kiss some cute ladies :* 
Thank you for all of your support as I’ve posted on here before. Y’all rock. ",bisexual
"No patience, help!",I [21M] met this boy on tinder and he's so cute I can't take it!! We talked all day and sent Snaps 😉 back and forth. He makes me feel good about my insecurities. I'm absolutely dying to meet him in person! How do I continue without looking too thirsty?... I really don't want to mess this up,bisexual
Came out to my brother but not my parents.,I came out to my brother a few days ago and he's pretty cool with it. He was confused at first not because I was Bi but because he never saw it coming. He's totally used to it now though. I however do not know how I'm going to come out to my parents. My parents have several gay friends so I know they are ok with LGBT people but the thought of coming out is giving me intense anxiety and putting me in a depressive mood. I'm also especially worried about how my grandparents would react because I love them so much and they love me but I'm not sure where they stand on these issues but I do know they are friends with the priest at their church who is a Lesbian. Am I getting worried over nothing or is this something I should make plans for if they go south?,bisexual
Looking For a long-term relationship,"I want a long-term relationship, no hook up. As a bisexual.",bisexual
bisexuals are not “straight until proven otherwise”,just a friendly reminder you don’t have to tell anyone about the gender of your relationship to prove your sexuality!!!!,bisexual
Any fellow gamers here ready for this?,,bisexual
Anyone interested in the story of an Ex-bisexual? I am doing an AMA.,"You can AMA. I won't get offended. I won't mind tough questions and you telling me I am repressed/was never bisexual to begin with.

I will answer questions also here, if you want. 

https://www.reddit.com/r/AMA/comments/9r3a8x/i_used_to_think_i_was_bisexual_for_a_year_untill/

",bisexual
I went on a date with a guy and this happened.,"I thought this was pretty funny so I just wanted to share. My local pride event was last Saturday. I’m a bi guy and I went as sort of a date with a guy who I had met the night before and hit it off with. The event shut down before dark so we ended up going to a few of the bars that were close by. It’s pertinent to the story that I look pretty masculine and he’s super fem. I have a beard and was dressed relatively conservative, and he has long hair and was wearing makeup and feminine clothing. Anyway, we walked into a bar and ordered drinks. Not long after two guys sitting at a nearby table called me over. My date walked over with me which made them look a bit uncomfortable. Them: “Did you know that’s a dude”? I laughed me ass off and told them that I appreciate the concern but I’m well aware and into it. They still looked uncomfortable so I gave my date a little kiss and we both walked off.",bisexual
I'm cannot find a particular bi-pride shirt.,"I would like a shirt that essentially is the bi pride flag. Three bands, pink, purple, and blue, that make up the whole shirt. No other colors, no text. Could be vertical or horizontal bands. I think it's a simple design, but I can't find anything like it. Does anyone know where to find such a shirt? Is my description clear?",bisexual
True,,bisexual
Cuffed jeans amarite? *finger guns*,,bisexual
Does this go here?,,bisexual
I'm definitely bi,,bisexual
"Came out to my cousin, it went great!","HI! I love you all!
I'm out to most of my friends but I have been wanting to be more out and honest with my family. I'm not very close with the elders (aunts &amp; uncles). I have at least a 10 year age gap with my cousins. My cousins are very progressive and LGBTQAI+ supporters.

I've still been nervous about coming out. Last night I said fuck it and came out to a cousin. She is completely supportive! It felt really good to just say it. I have a safe place in their home. I am crying.",bisexual
So this is awkward... but body envy or shame or whatever... I am having some issues.,"So I'm a bi guy who tops and is dominant. That's how I feel in bed. With girls this was fine, but recently I was trading nudes with a guy and he was magnificently endowed. So beautiful was his glorious man rod that mine went shy and wouldn't play.        

I ended up just blowing him off, not the fun way, and we lost interest in each other. Cut to potentially having a threesome and other guy is hung. Suddenly I'm jealous of her giving him attention. I feel like she prefers him over me and I'm not big enough.  
I've started to worry I'm too small, despite having a perfectly fine package in my head. And I just excuse myself and leave once she noticed I was ""losing interest"".    

The other night I lost my erection masturbating. I've started only watching lesbian porn and only talking to girls. It's not cause I'm ""less bi"", but because penis anxiety is making me lose my erections.       

Help...",bisexual
Finally had enough courage to come out as bi to my wife!,"I've know that Ive been attracted to both sexes since I was in high school. But for some more obvious reasons never told anyone, after 5 years of dating and 4 months of marriage I finally gained the courage to tell her, and she has been so accepting and loving. 
Ive never been happier, and it feels so freeing! 
The moral of the story is find someone who loves you for you! ",bisexual
"""Coming Out"" to People You're Talking to on Dating App (M/27)","Hi Community!

Bi guy here, asking for some advice with a bit of a rant. I've been casually online dating for a while now, off and on. In my experience, and please tell me if you have different experiences because I'd love to hear them, but I find men (typically gay) have been much more accepting after telling them I'm bi then (typically straight) women. 

I'm now making sure to tell who I'm talking to that I'm bi before we ever meet IRL. The few times that I didn't say something sooner than later certainly bit me in the butt later, haha. It's of course very important that whoever I may have a relationship with knows and accepts my bisexuality. 

More often than not, when I tell a dude I get more of a ""Hey, I'm cool with that, thanks for telling me,"" and sometimes an additional, ""here's a funny non-normative thing about me!"" With girls I tend to get more of a ""Oh, okay"" if I get a response at all. The conversation tends to end there.

I usually bring up my sexuality after we've been talking for awhile and it seems like we're getting close to going on an actual date, so I'm not going ""HI HOW ARE YOU? YOU SEEM COOL DID YOU KNOW I'M BISEXUAL!?"" And I don't view this ""issue"" as necessarily a bad thing either, I'm just wondering if anyone else sees their dating life lean heavily towards one gender being more accepting than the other of our sexuality? Or if anyone has a smooth way of ""coming out"" to whoever we're talking to, since coming out is something we're perpetually doing.

Thanks, all! Have a bi-utiful day!",bisexual
It’s really happening! And also I had my first kiss today:),"I’m a 15yr old girl. On Thursday my friend(we’ll call her A) that I’ve been crushing on messaged me and said she likes me back. A wanted to be something and I said yes. I’m not going to put the full story here because I posted it on Friday, if you want to see it it’s still there. 

Today we were just walking around right after school and holding hands and A asked me “so you want to be together?” And I said yes. I guess she wanted to just make sure. But that means that we are dating officially for sure! And I’m really happy. Anyway, we were hanging out for a while today. We were gonna take the bus together so we waited for it. Then we were talking and she kind of asked if she could kiss me. I don’t really remember exactly how she asked. 

I kind of flinched or something cause I was slightly uncomfortable. Then A said “so you’re gonna by shy now”? And I just said that I don’t know what I’m doing. So A kind of told me to close my eyes and such. And then she just leaned in and kissed me. Just to clarify, she didn’t force me into it, I could’ve said no. But I just knew that I would probably never really be ready. I need to learn to get out of my comfort zone a bit more. And I’m glad I let her kiss me too.

I’ve never kissed anyone before at all. I’m actually so happy now. Today was a bad day for a while. One reason was I’ve been feeling useless and like a burden the whole day for some reason. And hanging out with A and talking with her made me feel better. Happy. I still can’t wrap my head around the fact that someone could like me that way, let alone the fact that I’m dating a girl. If you asked me even a week ago if I’d ever date a girl I would’ve said no. But I’m happy I am. 

I’m not out to anyone right now except A and another friend. I wanted to tell someone about it though. Since there’s not really anyone else, I decided to just tell you amazing people:)",bisexual
"Conflicted on, you guessed it, a girl AND a guy!","TL;DR: Girl on my study sending mixed signals for a while, doubtful myself but I feel like I should just ask her out. Problem is there’s a guy as well and since I’ve never done anything with a guy I feel like now’s my chance to do so. Typical indecision.

Wall of text ahead.

So when I started my new study, I met this girl during the introduction. We talked a bit but since I was kinda seeing someone at the time I didn’t flirt with her or anything. The week after, she sat next to me in the cantina, and we talked some more. Again, not trying anything. At this point, the girl I was kinda seeing told me she didn’t want to see me anymore. Whatever, tough luck. I contemplated flirting with study girl, but I just wasn’t sure of it. I had decided to not date anyone for a while, so I could just focus on my study and finding a job without all the hassle that comes with actively participating in the whole dating thing. 

Another week later, I saw her at the student association I joined. I talked to her again, still not pursuing her. In the weeks after this, whenever I ran into her, she’d smile and say hi to me, or strike up random conversation. We’d talk whenever we both were at the association too. Felt to me like she either wants to be my friend REALLY badly or is interested in me. At some point, one of my friends started trying to get to her through me. He asked me for her number and everything, which I didn’t even have.
One night, when we were all getting wasted at the association, I walked up to that friend who was talking to study girl to ask if he wanted to buy some shots. She was really happy to see me even though I walked up to my friend, quickly went to stand behind me and asked me to get that guy (my friend) away from her. Apparently he’d talked to her before and she really, really didn’t like him. I was admittedly blasted, but I did my best to help her and insisted to my buddy that we’d get some shots. He didn’t listen though, and when study girl walked off for a smoke he followed her. Even my drunk mind knew this wasn’t going to be good. 

I followed both of them, they were fighting, but nothing physical. She told him she hated him, that I’m “way nicer and cuter”, not sure what to think of that one. At this point I realised I was dragged into a situation I really didn’t want to be. But it was about to get worse. I wanted to walk off, but when I looked back she was scratching the fuck out of him, followed by him basically tackling her. I don’t know who started, but I grabbed my friend, pushed him away and asked him what the fuck he was thinking. He tried to get back, but I had enough of this shit so I pushed him out the door and told him to fuck off. After he calmed down, we got some drinks and I went back to check on her. She said she was fine, so I asked her what the fuck happened just now. Turns out he’d bothered her before and she really didn’t want to talk to him anymore. We talked a bit more and she asked for my number. We texted a bit too the following days. 

Every time I’d run into her, she’d have a big smile on her face and strike up conversation. This is still going on three weeks after she asked my number. I feel like either she sees me as her token gay best friend (which would only be half true) or as someone she’s interested in. Normally I can read people very well but with her I just can’t tell what she wants from me and I really, really need to know. This wouldn’t really be a big issue, but there’s this guy in my class I just can’t seem to get out of my mind. As I’ve never had any experience with guys before, I feel like now’s my chance to do so. But he’s in a relationship, and just like with study girl, I am getting mixed signals from him too. 

This is more of a vent than anything, I’m just really conflicted is all.
",bisexual
I'm up at 5:07,"Im bi(obviously) i see that as liking men and women trans or cis .One of my friends (ftm) guy, is one of the coolest people I know he is hot, and I think i would like to pursue a relationship with him. He has a polyamorous boyfriend but I'm not sure if he is, how does someone ask a poly person out.",bisexual
I got hit on by a pretty cute (m)ofucking guy!,"So I was wearing some old jeans that were a little tight around the butt. Went to a car parts store to pick some stuff up and got a complement on how round my butt was ""in those sexy jeans"" as a guy I was taken by total surprise, but felt myself blush and got a little bit of a hardy. 

Woah. 

It was exhilarating. 

Gimmie more baby cakes!!!!",bisexual
Dean and me... And Meg!,,bisexual
What is virginity?,"I have always thought that I lost my virginity to my wife. I was in my early 30s and before her I had never had PIV or PIA sex. I sucked dick and ate pussy like a champ but never had penetrative sex. Mainly because I don't like anal, not giving or receiving. I don't even like it in porn. It made any attempt to establish a relationship with a man difficult as as soon as they found out that I wasn't down to fuck they were out like a rat out of an aqueduct. I am also autistic so have difficulty establishing relationships with people, women being the hardest. So I classified myself as a virgin, I still don't know what that means. I had sexual relationships with many different people, young and old, male and female, but still thought of myself as a virgin because I hadn't stuck my dick in someone. My question is, what do you classify as a virgin? How does it relate to your early experiences?",bisexual
Hey so female here and THIS perfectly describes my situation! Lol how do I flirt with girls without them thinking that I’m just being “friendly?” I think you’re hot god damn it! THAT WAY!,,bisexual
Did I do the thing right?,,bisexual
What is your type for the opposite sex? And same sex?,"For me, I like girls with long hair, big eyes, usually pretty thin and I'm terms of personality it differs butusually someone funny who cares about something (I'm at uni so for a lot of them it's what they study).

As for guys, I am not attracted to camp guys like at all (no offence to anyone who is) as things like makeup on a guy don't do it for me but someone who I can just be friends with in any regular setting and again likely funny/cares about something and as for looks... well I don't know yet but I know that dark features (hair and eyes) just like with women do it for me. 

What about all of you?",bisexual
Does anybody feel like less of a man cause they like guys?,I’m bisexual guy 21 I was watching Malena the Italian movie and it came to the scene where the boy went to a prostitute his first time. I was just thinking to myself damn sometimes I feel like less of a man for liking guys. I used to get insecure a lot and think women didn’t like me because somehow they could sense I’m not man enough it stemmed from liking guys.does anyone else feel this way? ,bisexual
"As a follow-up to my “bi-plane” post I made a while back, I now present, the “bi-ghter jet”.",,bisexual
This is bi culture,,bisexual
On the first date would it be weird to...,"- Buy him a rose
- Kiss
- Hug
- Hold Hands
- Call him babe or hun 

Also cause of like homophobic reactions do you think a pub would be a dumb place to eat dinner at? Like Legit I’m sorry I’ve posted here a bit about my first Gay date but I’m soooooo Freakin’ excited!! ",bisexual
Isn’t that gay?,,bisexual
Is it just me or are women more represented in bi-society than men?,"Whenever I google something to do with being bi whether it's fashion, coming out stories etc the author/models are predominantly women...",bisexual
An Apology,"I'm not sure if this type of post is allowed so if it isn't, the mods can go ahead and take it down.

I'm more of a lurker when it comes to reddit. When I started using reddit, however, I was a very vocal person. I made posts about everything, and commented as much as I could. I found one of my old accounts somehow and remembered the post I made on this subreddit about a year ago. I'm not gonna go into detail but I expressed my dislike for transgender people in the post. One of you called me out on it but I stood my ground, continuing to believe that being transgender was a choice, and that people were doing it for attention, or because it was ""trendy.""

Months later, I met someone on the internet. We became close friends, and about three months ago, he came out to me as transgender. At first I didn't say anything, because I didn't want my opinions to effect him. He began to express his troubles to me, describing his dysphoria and how he identifies. And that was when I decided to educate myself more on the topic. I began to watch videos, read articles, and talked to people who were transgender. I learned that it wasn't a choice, I learned that they're not going to harm anyone, that they weren't doing it for attention, and most importantly, I learned how happy someone can become, when they finally realize their true identity. The apache attack helicopters and ""Did you just assume my gender?"" jokes weren't funny anymore, and I began to distant myself from my toxic friends.

One week ago, I was sent a really long message from my friend. A majority of it was too personal for me to say, but he explained things about how he feels, and what other people think of him.

That same night, he took his own life. He was only 17 years old, and his name was Dorian.

I wanted to make an apology, because while this isn't a transgender subreddit specifically, there are still some people here who aren't cis, and also that I originally made my transphobic post here.

So, from the bottom of my heart, I am sorry. I'm sorry to anyone I've hurt. I expressed my opinion on a topic that I had no knowledge of.

I hope you all are safe, especially in America right now.

I know these numbers are posted everywhere, but I still think you all should be aware of the hotlines (Nation Suicide Prevention Lifeline - 1-800-273-8255, and The Trevor Project - 1-866-488-7386, and [here's a list](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_suicide_crisis_lines) of the suicide prevention numbers if you don't live in America). Please talk to someone if you are struggling.

Stay safe,

RonoArcher",bisexual
Help me I’m dumb,"I’ve been out since 15 as a lesbian. Always had crushes on other girls, no interest in guys to that point. That’s pretty much continued as I’ve gotten older (not that old, I’m in my 20s) and I’ve only dated women. 

However, about 6-ish months ago, I started thinking about dating guys out of no where. No idea why. All of a sudden, going on a first date with a girl who’d mention that she doesn’t date bi  girls went from pet peeve to feeling like a personal attack. So I set my dating profile to bisexual and still hid myself from straight guys. 

Then I figured I was being dumb and un-hid my profiles from guys because I figured if I really wanted to I could do out with a guy. Got barraged by “wyd tonight”, that heart eyes emoji, and random sexual comments which at least in my experience, women don’t really send to me. Honestly, didn’t see a guy I personally found attractive since I still overwhelmingly find more women attractive than men. Immediately re-hid myself. Felt validated in my lesbianism. 

Until then last few days, that is. I again, was like, just go for it, date whoever you want. So I un-hid myself from straight people. Almost immediately get a decent (!) message from a guy that it turns out is a). Like crazy hot, b). is super funny and easy to talk to , and c). Thinks I’m also attractive lol. 

And so we’re going out on a date in a bit and I’m freaking out. Like Itd be super awkward to be like “hey so just checking that you actually kno I’m bi and that’s cool”, because no girl who likes girls ever has a problem with lesbians, but I know some do with bi girls and it’s probably the same with guys right? And (not that it matters on the first date or anything!) if things went well, I’d probably need to mention at some point that I know literally nothing about sex with a guy. 

Also, I’d normally tell my best friend if I’m going out with someone, but I feel super weird about it because it kind of feels like coming out all over again. And the petty part of me is super annoyed that I spent so much time making the “but you don’t look like a lesbian !1!1!!!” Crowd shut up and I feel like it’d all come back x100 if I dated a guy.

So if you got through all that, any advice? I just feel kind of happy/weird/I don’t even know right now.",bisexual
More selective of same sex attraction,"Is anyone else more selective of the same sex when it comes to physical attraction?

I’m a 25 year old male, and when it comes to the same gender, I am much more selective and critical of the same sex. For example, I find I am attracted to most women, but when it comes to men, I am very particular. 

Does anyone else experience this? Or is it the opposite?

Since I am more easily attracted to women, I consider myself “more” straight, though I realize that is a silly notion. 
Does anyone else categorize themselves this way? ",bisexual
Hii i am a gay guy and looking for advice,"Soo i am gay,and 16 and i am out for about a year and like everyone knows im gay around my school (its kind of a small school). Whatever i didn’t have luck finding a boyfriend.  So anyway i am human so last year i had a crush on this guy. And like i learned that he was straight and but that all the guys on the football team which he was on said that he was probably gay. So I kept hope during the whole year and like because i was know spending time with him, we got like pretty close. We text all the time but we dont talk that much at school. 
I during the summer just now considered him as a friend who was really cool( kinda still into him but less)
So like three weeks ago he came out as bi to me and his close friends, told me too keep it quiet cause he didn’t want the attention.
So im now im all weird and have attraction again to him
I need help he talks about girls to me so like do i have a chance, i just dont know what to think about this",bisexual
Would you ever leave your same sex partner because you want to have a family?,"I hope this question doesn't offend anyone, I'm just genuinely curious. 

If you're in a SSR, and you want a family, would you leave them for the opposite sex? Because this way, you get biological kids that are related to the person your with and all you have to do is bang. ",bisexual
Is This Bi Culture?,,bisexual
Today the sky went flipped bisexual flag,,bisexual
Microsoft Store repping bi colors on their screensavers,,bisexual
How can I be a good and supportive friend?,"Hey all,

So one of my closest friends just came out to me as bisexual, and I am super proud of him and happy for him. He's going through a bit of a rough period with school and all, and I really appreciate the fact that he was willing to share this piece of his life with me. I want to be there for him as he moves forward, but I'm faced with a bit of a predicament. I really don't know how to best proceed from here. Up until now, I have only had one openly non-straight friend, and he is very confident with himself. As far as my friend goes, he doesn't have the same self-confidence. I really don't want to make him feel worse by acting incorrectly or weird and accidentally alienating him. How were you treated by your friends after you came out? (or rather how would you have liked to be treated by your friends after you came out?)

&amp;#x200B;

I apologize if this is the wrong sub for this, if that is the case I would appreciate if someone could direct me to the correct one.",bisexual
"Yeah, I’m Bi.","Hey fam, posting from a burner account cause too many of my coworkers know that I have a reddit and that username is too obvious it’s me and at the moment I’m not into them knowing.

Which brings me to my newfound willingness to admit that I’m bi. I grew up super conservative and without real internet so I didn’t even know that it was “a thing” until high school.

You wanna know how I realized this? The damn movie adaptation of Rent in high school. Mimi was the hottest person in that movie (I am female). I don’t know why no one else realized this. 

Well, I’m now 25 and have been married to my husband for almost 5 years. Recently, I told him I was bisexual and thought about girls a lot. He’s super supportive of that and if we didn’t live in small suburbia, we would totally be up for a threesome.

Also, I cuff my jeans and do finger guns, and had the bisexual haircut even before finding this sub. So yeah, I’m glad to have found my people. ",bisexual
The comments below this tweet kinda show how much erasure happens to the Bisexual community. :/,,bisexual
What stopped/is stopping you from coming out?,"I'm 28 years old bi male, I've never been in a relationship with a guy or girl. I've never come out. Except to myself, a counsellor and one older friend who is gay. Answering my own question, I guess my answer would be, I'm scared of what people might say behind my back, I'm scared that my buddies might view me differently, I'm scared that people won't believe me and just say ""he's gay"" I also dread of hearing the words ""called it"" ""I knew it"" ""we all knew"" etc. ",bisexual
Oof,,bisexual
Struggling.,"Hey everyone. I’m really feeling sad tonight and I wanted to get it out somewhere. 

I came out to my family last November- nothing in particular, just that I was dating a girl from our hometown who they know (I am in college 8 hours away) 

I was raised extremely catholic and so my parents took it really really hard. My dad and I didn’t talk for about 4 months. 

My gf and I had a rough patch for about a month and we broke up. I idiotically told my narcissistic mother, and she was so ecstatic and of course made it about her and started telling me about how it was so hard to hear my dad, her husband, cry and ask her where he “fucked up” as my father. My dad doesn’t use that language. 

My gf and I got back together, and things are amazing. The thing is, i don’t want to hurt my dad again by telling him. I honestly give no fucks about how my mother feels because she’s honestly a jerk. 

But, my dad started working in the oilfield when I was 11 and has missed out on so much so provide for his family. He is the best man and I know how much he hated the lifestyle I was living/ am living. They also provide my car insurance, phone and health insurance finances because I am a full time student and my job doesn’t allow me to make enough to pay for those things. I feel so torn between my dad/mom and my gf. I want to love her fully but I feel like I can’t because I always think in the back of my head how I’m hurting my dad. And I just don’t know how to get over it... ",bisexual
In love with straight Friend,"I have tried to ignore my feelings for her for  so long. I am straight she is straight. We are both older I am 40 she is mid 50. She has told me I am beautiful and we always are talking about our bodies. She is my bff.. I love her, adore her, want her.  She sends mixed messages. Tells me she dresses butch.  Told me she wants a female roommate but not a marriage but in between. Told me once she would like to live with me. Told me That it broke her heart that I was seeing someone(new guy) . Told me she would fuck a female stripper in Vegas even. Looks into my eyes with love. Leaned hard into my shoulder one night during a concert... in a very non platonic way... for at least a minute. Tells me she likes tall women in an indirect way ... I’m tall. Made a point to get very mad at me when I said I wouldn’t date someone shorter...  I was referring to a guy but she’s shorter. But... she insists she’s straight . Makes a point of it. Talks about it. Tells me female pussy revolts her. What the fuck do I do...",bisexual
I told my best friend I was bi today even though I still get doubts sometimes,progress!,bisexual
Thought y’all might enjoy this beautiful bi badass!,,bisexual
Bi and Gym,"Being bi and going to the gym is like Christmas. So many distractions of firm pecs, tight yoga pants, biceps, cleavage on show and much more.
Just something I noticed as I morphed into a gym rat",bisexual
"I'm planning on coming out to my mom tomorrow morning, and I don't know what to say","So, tomorrow morning while she's at work and while I'm at home, I plan to text her telling her that I'm bi. I really feel like I need to do this, but as the day has gotten closer, I've gotten more nervous, and that has made me unable to think of a good way to say it. So I need your help. What should I say to my mom (through text while she's at work) to tell her I'm bi? Basically, how should I say/word it?",bisexual
Coming Out,I told the girl I am starting to date that I am bisexual. I know it was kind of risky this early in seeing her. She was completely accepting of it and I am so glad that she is. It honestly made me want to cry.,bisexual
Am I Bi? Do I Appreciate Fantasy? Or am I a Bad Person?,"Hopefully this is the right sub (it says if I can't work out my where I am, I should drop by).

&amp;#x200B;

I'm an introvert with social anxiety so I've never really had much interaction with a gay/bisexual male, or a transgender woman so I'm not sure how I'd react if either one attempted to flirt with me in private (in public I avoid flirtation even if it comes from a woman, so my real thoughts and emotions are only expressed in private).

&amp;#x200B;

Also in private, I've watched gay, bisexual, and transgender pornography so I've questioned my sexuality at times. For me, porn is a fantasy. Depending on my mood, I sometimes imagine that I'm either the more dominant male (the giver?), or the more submissive male (the receiver?) on camera. However in person, I look at gay men or transgender women and  say to myself ""Hm. They're attractive."" but I don't necessarily feel a sexual attraction towards that man or trans woman. 

&amp;#x200B;

Is that me just enjoying the fantasy when I'm watching porn? Or is there some subconscious desire I have, that hasn't manifested itself yet because I haven't been hit on by any gay men or trans women in a private setting? (I've been hit on by gay men in public, but like I said, I shy away from all flirtation due to my social anxiety). 

&amp;#x200B;

On another hand, I've heard people say things like ""The reason why some homophobes engage in the same sexual encounters privately that they denounce in public, isn't always because they're closet homosexuals who are ashamed of themselves. Rather, they get sexual satisfaction from mentally dehumanizing the person they're having intercourse with."" 

&amp;#x200B;

Could that be a reason why I watch that kind of porn, but don't necessarily feel any kind of sexual attraction to a gay/bi man or trans women? Does anyone else have these kinds of issues with their sexuality?

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
I have no idea what sexuality I am,"I'm a teen girl right now and I have no idea what sexuality am I. I thought I was recently bisexual because I have been attracted (not necessarily sexually) to both sexes. I have thought cartoon characters of both sexes were hot looking but never really thought much of it. However, I've only had one crush ever in my life and it was a dude and just can't really see myself having sex with anyone. At school, I'm not attracted to any females nor attracted to any female celebrities and I can't really see myself dating a girl. I definitely think my friends are attractive but I don't think of them in any romantic way. I think both sexes are equally hot though and female and male bodies are just really interesting and nice to look at. But sex and relationships just seems weird and abstract to me and are never on my mind. Dating and cuddling sound nice though. I don't really know and I feel really confused right now and I can't really talk to anyone because I have this irrational fear that if I tell someone that somehow my secret is going to come out and my homophobic parents will find out. Sorry for my rambles but this community and subreddit seem really sweet and welcoming and I thought I could post because I feel really confused. 

edit: This community is so sweet and I'm really happy that this subreddit exists. Your guys' comments made me feel so much better and that I can just take things slow and not stress about it. I'm really glad that I posted on here. Thank you. ",bisexual
Coming Out to My Best Friend,"A couple of years ago i decided to finally tell a few people that I wasn't quite as straight as they thought I was. My best friend and I were driving around, and I randomly asked him if he remembered when he and his wife made a joke about me possibly being gay (we've been friends for 20+ years, and I'd been single for a long time). When he started laughing, I informed him that they had been at least half right with their joke. After having to clarify that I wasn't just messing with him, his first question was ""Have you ever thought that way about me?"". When I told him I hadn't his immediate response was ""And why not, aren't I pretty enough for you?"". And that, is why he is my best friend. He actually handled it better than my now ex-wife did, and his wife still thinks it's funny when I screw with him about it.

Does anyone else have a fun coming out story?",bisexual
A boy hit on me at a college tour,"So I'm a high school senior (17m) and I just figured out I was bi this year so I haven't experienced much with other guys but I went on a tour to the Kennesaw State Marietta capmus yesterday and it was great. A lot of cute girls and guys and one guy came up to me and said ""I like your style,"" and winked at me, so I was pretty happy after that. So yeah, that was cool.",bisexual
I came out as bi.,"I knew deep down I liked women but I would always block it from my mind because of the bad experiences I had when I was in middle school. A few months ago I went out by myself, got drunk, and slept with a girl. I felt ashamed of myself for a while because I identified as a straight woman my entire life. I felt like I had to lie about it in order to keep that night a secret from everyone, even from the people that I loved.

&amp;#x200B;

I came out and told my SO (of 4.5 years) about the situation, and he supported me, and still does. The only thing is, I have so much anxiety about these conflicting feelings that I have for women now. I have gay friends who I have talked to about all of this and I feel like they don't quite get where i'm coming from. I would love to have friends who are also bi so they can walk me through what it is i'm feeling. Any suggestions or advice would really help. Thank you.

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
Anna Akana comes out as bisexual at the Streamy's! 🎉🎊,,bisexual
Just thinking about something,"I've been thinking about past relationships a lot since my boyfriend and I broke up and I realized I don't really know how to take control in a relationship. My first boyfriend was kind of controlling, not to an abusive extent, but it was there. My most recent boyfriend, there was a lot I didn't notice. With my second guy, he gave me control because he knew it made me feel safer in the relationship. 

I guess what I'm trying to say is, how do I learn to step up and not let my significant other control everything without them basically handing me all the power?",bisexual
Revoke my Bi Card,"I had made out my shopping list last Thursday for Walmart Grocery Pickup. On Friday night, right before submitting it, I noticed I had put six lemons on the list. ""Why am I ordering lemons? I don't have a lemon pound cake to make or anything,"" I asked myself, so I removed them from the list. I just remembered it was to make LEMON BARS. I'm not worthy.",bisexual
"Hello! New to group, not new to bi/pan","I just wanted to stop by and announce I'm excited to meet everyone, here.  I am pan, closeted and am starting my journey of meeting other welcoming, wonderful minds that can help me navigate my way through being more open with myself and others.  I'm nervous, excited and curious.  Here goes nothing!",bisexual
A short film about bi awareness,"Hi all! I'm lucky to be a part of a really amazing short film that is trying to spread LGBTQ+ awareness. I just wanted to share because I thought people might be interested in it here. 

[**https://igg.me/at/make-b-seen/**](https://igg.me/at/make-b-seen/)

&amp;#x200B;

This summer myself and a team of filmmakers working on a US/UK co-production wrapped principal photography in LA on a short film aimed at bringing awareness to the bi community, the ‘B’ in LGBTQIA+. We believe too many times bisexuals have been misrepresented and misunderstood in today’s growing debate surrounding sexual orientation and gender. And ""No, bisexuals don’t have twice as much sex as everyone else. But there is mounting evidence to suggest that they experience double the types of discrimination as their gay and lesbian peers"" ([Daily Beast](https://www.thedailybeast.com/are-bisexuals-shut-out-of-the-lgbt-club)). **We hope our** [**film**](https://igg.me/at/make-b-seen/) **will change that.**

I am reaching out on behalf of our [campaign](https://igg.me/at/make-b-seen/) to ask if you can contribute to our cause. In addition to raising awareness, we've also collaborated with and are raising money for the LGBTQ+ charities Los Angeles LGBT Center and the national Bisexual Resource Center. In addition to monetary donations, you can help spread the word! Perhaps you would be willing to share it on social media or connect us with someone who would be interested in getting involved?

**Our campaign:**

[**https://igg.me/at/make-b-seen/**](https://igg.me/at/make-b-seen/)

Below is a little more information about the film:

Grand Marquis - ‘B’, is a dramedy that focuses on best friends Belle &amp; Jessie as they go on a booze-fueled weekend to help Jessie get over a recent breakup. Soon lines begin to blur when the firmly heterosexual Jessie in her drunken, post-breakup loneliness, kisses bisexual Belle. And of course, it’s Belle’s fault, right?

&amp;#x200B;

Barclays bank in NYC is supporting us and will include a special screening within their 280-seater auditorium just off Times Square. You can donate for tickets!",bisexual
Another obvious example of bi erasure 😔,,bisexual
Online dating,,bisexual
The real issue with being a non-camp bi guy,,bisexual
Sexuality is a spectrum. And I might have found my 5%,"This is a throwaway account as I try and suss somethings out and see what my possibly changed identity is. I posting here at large for some greater context, I think.

I believe sexuality is a spectrum. I believe that very few individuals in the world are going to be 100% one way or the other (I understand that there's more than just gay/straight, but for the purposes of this moment let's considered a continuum that just takes into account those two poles). I think many folks might be in that 90th+ percentile for whatever they are attracted to but out of the seven billion people on Earth there's got to be that one or two people who might be of that five or 10% that if their paths cross at the right moment, if they are at the right point in their lives, if X,Y or Z that, that person might be considered attractive, and more than just a casual glance. Attractive in the terms of relationship attractive in the terms of sex.

So, for context because that was a whole bunch of vague posting. I identify as a cis, hetero, woman. As a member of the majority and having privilege of the majority I have never really had to consider what that meant for me and my day-to-day life other than the normal misogyny that women face. I was a tomboy for many years I'm not a person who is the stereotype of all things from femenine but I was comfortable for who I am as a woman and my heterosexuality. Over the years I have had a few people come up to me and make jokes about me being gay and just not coming out. It was never a thing that really weighed on my mind because I knew who I was. I knew what I liked. And I knew I wasn't attracted to other women.

Tanget I will tie back too: I have since high school, and through adulthood, (30s F) always had a small group of friends. Typically one or two female friends and one or two male friends. Generally speaking one or two of the male friends would be gay. It was rare for several years that the women would be gay. As I left college and got working the inverse happened. And I was confronted with my own internal biases about lesbianism specifically. I don't know why I was fine with everything else and that was something that I discovered I have these implicit beliefs about it. (I love to blame it on an encounter in college where this woman came up to me and slid me her number in public during the middle of a conference with three other colleges and her on the mic and pretty much tried to out me in front of people but there was nothing to out.) Anyways, as I became friends with these wonderful women I was able to challenge a lot of my biases and let them go and realize just as I am not attracted to all men and all men are not attracted to all women nor are all women attracted to all other women. Right? Common sense. I know. Sometimes Common Sense isn't all that common. Work with me here.

Back on track: so I've always said when talking about my sexuality with folks as it may or may not have come up that I identify as straight and that I don't think I'm 100% because I find it hard to think that there's a lot of people like that out there. And I recognize there so many people in the world that there's probably, I don't know, five women out there that I would be interested in something more than just friendship. So I always said that I was like 90 to 95% straight. Well, I was recently at a work event. It was well attended with a lot of folks in my field whom I only see once a year if that. And there was a woman there that I immediately felt drawn to but not just in the way where I want to know her gym secrets or I think she's amazing and want to be friends cuz they're just one of those people. It was a person who I was like 'Damn! Who is that? She's super cute! I feel a *pull* WHAT THE SHIT??' 

So I spent the first part of the day avoiding the crap out of her because I didn't know what the hell was going on and why I felt like that. Then I spent the second half of the day realizing I'm in a place where nobody knows me really, I'm a grown-ass adult, and if this is something that interests me why would I hold myself back from seeing what this was. Also recognizing I have some social anxiety, I knew not this woman at all, and what would I even say? So finally I got to a point where we actually ended up at a social gathering for the second time and I was like cool. This is a way to start the conversation. And, just like if I had met a man that I kind of was like *hmmmm...* about, I'd strike up a conversation and see how it goes. Except it wasn't in the cards. And I wasn't able to make the connection not for any lack of attempt but there was just no opening there. So be it, it wasn't meant to be.

But this experience left me with questions. Questions about my identity, questions about who I am attracted to and realizing I still have some biases. I called a friend who will get it cuz I just needed to tell somebody. I realized that I probably won't ever be on a dating site looking for other women but if I ran across from The Real World it might be a different thing. I also am as of the past few months discovering if I'm poly. Which is another massive identity change coming from a monogamy background. (I'm recently completely single and which I may or may not have discovered that monogamy might not be the end-all-be-all for me). The question is though am I bi? Or is this just that one in 7 billion where I'm attracted to a woman instead of a man. I think if I were to come out my friends and family would be hugely supportive.  Tying back to my tangent from earlier I realized while I will definitely come out among my friends I don't know if I could ever come out to my family. And I think that's internal issues with me but I don't know why. Anyways, thoughts on the matter at hand?

Tldr; for the first time in my life, I met a woman that I wanted something more than friendship with based on sight and few interactions alone. I have never identified as anything other than straight before. I've never encountered this before. What to do? What is this?",bisexual
How do i tell if a guy likes me,So I'm a bi guy and I want to get a boyfriend but I don't know where I would find one or even how to tell if a guy likes me or not I have tried looking online but I can only find stuff about how girls can tell if a guy likes them. If a guy likes a guy will he act the same as towards a girl or different. Can you help,bisexual
Thought I was gay. Turns out I’m...not.,"K so my life has always been a bit odd. Recently got out of a long-term relationship a few months ago with another guy and have been experiencing fluidity in my sexuality. I have a history of trying to repress attraction to women during my LTR when it would come up, but now that I’m single, I feel like I should be a lot more honest with myself. 

So...I’m bi! I like men and women but I’m really in the mood for women right now. Sexuality is odd but I’m just rolling with it now. ",bisexual
Look at the bisexual sky today OMG!!! 😍😍,,bisexual
Explain difference between attraction to more than one sex/gender vs attraction regardless of sex/gender,"What's the deal with this? If you are attracted to people you are attracted to their bodies/expression right? Can someone help me understand this distinction. 

I enjoy male and female bodies and, presumably, other variations (I have no experience with this to really know for sure though, but I can't see why not). When I want to be involved with someone I don't care about their sex/gender but it will be something that I am attracted to. Is this not the case with the latter group? ",bisexual
You know what? I'm bi.,There I said it. I don't like them the same way as girls. I don't like them sexually. But I still like them and that's all that matters. I'm bi.,bisexual
"My wife said to me, “You ARE bi and don’t ever doubt that.”","I was telling her how in college, I had a crush on the teacher’s aide from my science class. 

I didn’t come to terms with being bi until a few years into my marriage. I’ve never been with a man, so I often struggle with the whole “am I queer enough” anxiety thing. 

Anyway, I told her how I used to look at his photos on Facebook. I grew up Christian fundamentalist so I’d feel extremely shameful for looking at photos of him. I couldn’t help it, I had a crush on him! I’d get super bashful when he’d talk to my lab partner and me! Gah, his hair and his smile 😊 

So I was telling my wife about all this. She’s heard bits of this story before. And that’s when she just says to me, “Okay, you ARE bi! Don’t ever doubt that!”

She’s bi too and in the same situation. So we validate each other!",bisexual
I like my women like I like my coffee!,I also like tea.,bisexual
Fantasies,Lets hear some fantasies that we have. ,bisexual
A song involving someone who could plausibly be considered bi,,bisexual
I did not cuff these...I swear they did this all on their own...,,bisexual
"I first knew Huyna when I was in grade 9, she's the reason I knew I was bi. When did you realise you were bi and how did you realise that ?",,bisexual
Is anyone watching The Bisexual on Channel 4? (UK),"Is it any good? I’m happy that there’s a comedy/drama on mainstream tv to represent us but only if it’s done well.

I don’t think I’ll bother if it’s rubbish. ",bisexual
Cyclical bisexuality?,"Who I'm sexually interested in seems to switch back and forth. For a stretch of time, anywhere from 6 months to 2 years, I'll only want women. Then seemingly out of nowhere I'll start craving sex with men. The feeling of craving intensifies until it's either unbearable or attended to. So I'll see men exclusively for a while until the same thing happens and I start craving women again. It's confusing and sort of difficult to deal with, especially because I enjoy very emotionally invested relationships. I mostly just wonder why it happens that way and if anyone else has had similar experiences. ",bisexual
Does anyone else feel isolated from their friends?,"I recently went to a house party, where the mood good and everyone chill, dancing, etc.   
I decided to talk to a friend of a friend, and see what they were like. They seemed nice enough, happy to talk to me and seemed eager to get to know me, thus I complied and we got into a deep and meaningful conversation. This eventuated into the topic of sexuality, unto which they said to me they were a gay bottom which I was none too phased about.  


After that night, I learnt that he was straight, had a girlfriend and told several of my close friends that he felt like I was going to rape him.  
I don't understand why this happens to me, all I want is friends. But everyone thinks I want to seduce them.",bisexual
The definitive answer.,,bisexual
Need some advice,"I'll try to keep this short. I've identified as a lesbian for a decade now (approx.). I've talked about sexual fluidity before, and how despite my personal label, I think being open minded is the best thing to be.

Earlier this year, a guy I used to be great friends with reentered my life and we just sort of hit it off. I was kind of unsure about it first but now, I have little to no reservations. The thing that terrifies me the most is the idea of sex (goldstar!). This is something I've mentioned to him and he's completely understanding and willing to be patient and what not.

My question is; does anyone have any advice for these kinds of scenarios ? Anyone on this sub have this happen to them ?

TLDR: lesbian likes a guy and everything is great except sex 

ps. I posted this on r/actuallesbians and they suggested I post here 

:)",bisexual
I need some advice on how to help someone who is questioning,"Recently one of my friends has begun questioning his sexuality. Me being an out bi male, I tried to help and encourage him. However it seems I might have sent the wrong message.

He recently said that he doesn't think he will ever know for sure unless he does some physical stuff. I get that, I went through something similar when I was figuring myself out, but then he says he wants to do physical stuff with me.

He is a great guy but I'm not attracted to him. When I turned him down he said that it was dumb and that he is probably just going through a phase, and then proceeded to not respond to me at all. 

What can I do next? I haven't dealt with something like this before and am really worried about him.",bisexual
"Tonight, my girlfriend told me she's been lying to me...","So my girlfriend of about 4 months works in the theatre world in the city where we live and I'm currently at university, working on my bachelor's degree in Theatre. 

About a month into the relationship, my girlfriend offered me a complementary ticket to a show she was working on. I of course accepted because I'm a student and currently unemployed, so I don't really have any spare funds to be spending on theatre tickets, but I like to see as much theatre as I can. She told me she couldn't get them for every show, but she'd let me know if any more came up. She's done this a few times since then, but comp tickets have become less of a big deal for me since I've been getting them to write reviews for the student magazine. 

Tonight we were having a bit of a serious conversation about something completely different and she suddenly breaks down crying and tells me she's been lying to me. I wasn't panicked because I know how much we value our relationship, but I was concerned but how much it was upsetting her. The conversation went a bit like this:

GF: I'm so sorry, but I've been lying to you. I need to tell you.

Me: Ok...?

GF: I've been buying those comp tickets. 

Me: What?

GF: Those comp tickets I've been getting you, they're not comps. I've been buying you those tickets because I know you can't afford them and that you'd never accept them if I told you I had bought them for you, but I can't lie to you any more. I just know how much you like going to shows and I wanted to see you and and I wanted you to see the work I do.

Cue 10 minutes of me trying to process how someone could be so thoughtful and so devious all at once. 

I just thought this belonged here cause I can't picture bi-panic being captured more perfectly than secretly buying the first nice, cute girl you've dated theatre tickets so she sticks around. 

Tldr: My girlfriend was secretly buying me theatre tickets she knew I couldn't afford and telling me they were complimentary cause she wanted to see me more. ",bisexual
"If this doesn’t being here, I apologize. A journey from self hatred to self acceptance. I tried to be discreet with the bisexual colors haha",,bisexual
I love boys and girls,"But buys a lot more 😊


💖💜💙",bisexual
Love you too.,"My mother told me that I'm not bisexual, I'm just a desperate slut that will sleep with anyone that's nice to me. I'm not comfortable having sex outside of a relationship and have been sexually inactive since leaving an abusive relationship 2 years ago. But yeah definitely a slut. Her comment also came out of nowhere.",bisexual
So,"I'm 31 and for a very long time I've considered myself ""hetero flexible"" but it seems clear now that I was just hiding behind that term.  I'm actually a bisexual man.  The problem I have now is that most of my friends are actually LGBT and I'm hesitant to come out to them worried I'll appear to be jumping on the bandwagon, trying to appear ""special too"". That's where I am",bisexual
Today I told a cute guy he was cute,"Something I’ve never had the guts to do, but he was, in fact, too goddamn cute. It’s taken me a lot of years to accept that I’m attracted to small and sweet fem guys, so actually telling one I was crushin felt like a milestone. He said thanks and that he’d be thinking of it for the rest of the day (which I hope was a good thing) 😗",bisexual
These adorable wives!!!!,,bisexual
Giving head to both girls and guys is ridiculously fun,I love the feeling of knowing that I am in control of getting them off. Having sex is amazing obviously and both people hopefully get off but with head it's all about them and it's great.,bisexual
Perfectly balanced... *sob*,,bisexual
DAE wish they weren't bi?,"Okay so like my family is really homophobic and religious and make homophobic jokes and all that stuff and it makes me super uncomfortable. When I was younger I used to always think of myself as straight due to religion and me just not being bothered with my sexuality at the time. I started thinking to myself what was so bad with same sex relationships and I couldn't see it, I even thought to myself how kissing or having sex with a girl was not disgusting but actually kind of appealing and I couldn't understand why I had these thoughts. Finally a few months ago I stopped denying my sexuality but still have no idea how to come out, especially with homophobia all over the place. I actually just wish I wasn't bi and was just straight, it would be so much simpler. DAE?",bisexual
"Bisexual folks, let's stand with trans people (esp. as some of us are both)! WaPo: ""Fury over reported federal plan targeting transgender people""",,bisexual
I came out on Facebook over the weekend.,"After seeing my school's play about Harvey Milk, the first openly gay official in California, and listening to how important it is to come out, I decided to come out on Facebook. It is kind of relieving to just say it. It hasn't changed anything with my friends. My parents already knew so I didn't have to worry about them. We will see about the rest of my family. I'm just happy it didn't change anything and that I still feel like the same person.",bisexual
[m] What it feels like to realize you're bisexual at the age of 22,"So there are so many ideas, beliefs, thoughts and ideas that I have had to confront since I have come to the realization that I was bisexual. It has been a terrifying, anxiety ridden, and confusing time of my life. Yet there’s something about this that’s also very intriguing to me, because it’s all so new to me.

First of all, I’m surprised it took me until the age of 22 to completely and consciously accept this part of myself. Before this I always thought of myself as straight and I never had to really concern myself with anything LGBT at all. I was always attracted to women and I never thought I would find other men attractive until recently. I have often heard people talk about LGBT related things but I always thought it never applied to me and that it wasn’t any of my business anyways. The realization that I’m bi has changed that opinion rather suddenly because this group that I always knew existed in the background, is now something I’m apart of in a way. Now I don’t know what’s up or what’s down anymore. 

So now I guess I have a few different fears:

1.	I’m not entirely sure what the social and political landscape is going to look like for me if people find out. I’m assuming most people are too busy with their own lives to care at all, but what about my friends and family? I live in Texas, in the Bible belt but there are also a lot progressive people who live here with a lot of different backgrounds and beliefs. My parents are very conservative Christians (especially my dad) but they’ve always been supportive of everything I have done and have always encouraged me to follow my dreams thankfully. However, this is one thing I think they wouldn’t approve of but I’m not sure how they’d react.

2.	I always grew up being wary of what you might call “Identity politics”, but that seems like it’s not too far off the beaten path. I’m afraid of getting too distracted by this and/or ending up on the wrong side of history if that makes sense. 

3.	Also, I realize I’m not entirely secure in my sexuality. I often wish I was either gay or straight.
 
TL;DR: I’m confused and I’m probably overthinking everything. It’s like a battle is going on inside my mind.
",bisexual
How do you guys do it...,"Ok quick backstory: I’m a relatively masculine guy in college who recently became out as bi to his close friends.

Post-heartbroken me (in a heterosexual relationship) has been leaning towards men lately. Problem is... I’m almost exclusively into masculine-ish guys. You know.. like the type of close straight guy friends I grew up around.

I took a leap of faith recently by asking one of my female friends if a guy I met at a party was gay/bi cuz I was super attracted to him. She was super cool about helping me find out but I learned he was “most likely hetero”. Ever since then I’ve been doing mental gymnastics trying to distinguish cool guys that want to be friends with me from guys that might possibly be attracted to me.

I’m glad I asked her but it’s got me pretty discouraged. 

Anyways, just wanted to rant somewhere. Thanks reddit. I’d love to hear your thoughts.",bisexual
I think I've picked a time to come out to my mom,"Not too long ago, I made a post about how I really wanted to come out to my mom, but I was really nervous and I wasn't sure if I could do it. Well, since then, I've decided I have to, because I'll have to do it someday anyways, and we're so close that I think she needs to know. So, I've been trying to think of a good time, and I think I know when is best.

Tomorrow morning, I have no school. Because of that, I can wake up after she leaves for work, and I'll have time to psych myself up a little bit (if I had school, I'd be too distracted to do that). When I do eventually do it that morning, because I did it early in the day, it gives her hours to think it over and perhaps get over any initial shock of it. Hopefully then, when she comes home from work, she'll be more able to respond to it, and it'll be less of an emotional response (maybe, though she is an emotional person so I'm not sure). I'm not really sure how she'll react, so it'll also give me time to get over the incredibly nervous feeling I'll get from doing it, and maybe I'll be more ready for whatever she says. Then, whatever happens that night happens.

What do you all think of my plan? Are my reasons for doing it tomorrow morning good? Are there any drawbacks you can see in it? Any advice at all about anything is appreciated. Thanks for all the help you guys have been in this, I couldn't do it without you.",bisexual
"To people who are in a same-sex relationship: When talking to random people (or coworkers, classmates, acquaintances) do you bring up the fact that your partner is of the same sex?",Title pretty much says it all. I just got into a relationship with a girl (I’m a girl too) and when relationship talk comes up I avoid talking about mine because I don’t know how people would take finding out that I’m in a same-sex relationship (I’m not fully out) Just curious to see how others handle this situation.,bisexual
Are there any lesbians/gay folks who discovered they were bisexual?,I hear a lot about people originally believing they were straight and then discovering they were bisexual. But does it ever work on the other side of the spectrum? Has anyone originally thought they were lesbian/gay and then discovered they were bisexual? ,bisexual
"Info about a relationship + sexual health study for gay, bi and queer cis guys in relationships :)","Hello! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give you guys some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for cisgender guys in relationships.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn skills to strengthen your relationship, like improving your communication, sexual health and satisfaction. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible, you'll get to read over a consent form, which has more information about your privacy rights.

And obviously we're going to pay you for your time-- specifically $250 each for completing all parts of the study!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: [https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY](https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY)

Even more info on our website: [http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/](http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/)

IRB #STU00202802, STU00202939",bisexual
“We both know I’m straight but goddamn”,-(M)e talking about Leonardo Dicaprio in Romeo+Juliet back before I realized I was not indeed straight.,bisexual
Legit ummm it’s so lonely over at r/BisexualTeens if your under 18 could you consider Subscribing?,r/BisexualTeens ,bisexual
"Newly out bi guy (33M), recovering alcoholic/addict, just divorced my wife (32F), now have a boyfriend (36M).","Just need to get this story off my chest. And I got questions for y'all.

18 months ago, straight, married, very unhappy. I changed jobs cause I couldn't handle the pressure. 6 months into the new job, I quit because it wasn't the pressure. I'm an alcoholic/addict and my life was falling apart. The facility where I went to AA meetings was founded as an LGBT recovery club house. I went because they have secular/atheist AA meetings.

Got sober/clean and started feeling happier and happier, surrounded by gay men and gay culture. I started exploring my ""gay"" side. I finally felt comfortable talking about other men, finding them attractive, shedding some of the straight masculine tropes that never fit me. I felt more like myself. Started wondering ""am I gay?""

I met a guy and fell for him hard. He's so fucking dreamy. Owns his own business, super fit, we're always on the same page, and can talk endlessly together. Every time he hugs I want it to never end. I want to chew on his face and feel his beard in my mouth. A really deep emotional and physical attraction like I've never had for a guy before.

I ended my very unhappy marriage, got a new job, started really working on myself, and I started dating that guy.

A big part of my recovering from addiction is shrugging off labels. I didn't need to be anything, didn't have to fit into some box. I finally just gave myself permission to be me. And me liked guys!

So, I told a bunch of my gay AA friends I was dating a guy. I think they all think I was a deeply closeted gay man finally understanding myself. I would just say, ""I'm gay for now"" or ""I'm gay for my boyfriend"". And other quips like ""labels are for other people"".

Had sex with a guy for the first time. Felt the joys of being a bottom. Figured out I'm not interested in being a top. Learned about how damn complex gay culture is. Generally way more judgemental than I expected.

And through all of this, I was still looking at women! I was scanning rooms going ""hot guy, hot girl, hot guy, hot girl, hot straight couple, would do them both"".

I just wanted to say thanks to this subreddit. I finally feel comfortable saying I'm bisexual. My marriage ended because it was bad, not because it was with a woman. I'm dating my boyfriend because we have so much in common, not because he has a penis. 

My boyfriend had been great through all of this. He knows I'm not ready to jump into another commitment after my divorce, so we have an open relationship. Looking forward to having sex with men, women, and maybe both!

So questions:
- Why aren't there a poly unicorn that's a guy? No married bi-men looking for a guy to add to the mix?

- Any advice for being bi in an open relationship? Looking for a steady female FWB, but having mixed results. Trying to find a woman in open marriage.

- Bi-guys: tops, bottoms, even mix? I just feel like if I want to fuck something, it's a girl, and if I want to be fucked, I want a guy. 

Anyways, 9 months sober, life's amazing, and happy to finally call myself bisexual. And AMA if you want to know more.",bisexual
Kalamazoo Black openminded man wants to...,"socialize with Black or POC: Bi women, ftm transmen, or Bi Black men. I enjoy attending: Black arts events, art hop, arcus, and various social justice events.",bisexual
Could Use Some Input,"I've always considered my mom to be pretty liberal. My cousin is openly gay and my mom has always been supportive of her and her girlfriend and she says she's more of a spiritual Christian than like a strict one. Although conversely there's certain times she says that kinda rub me the wrong way and make me less likely to come out (not that I really am in a rush to), for one thing my cousin initially identified as a lesbian but then decided she was bi and my mom said ""Oh yeah she says she's bi but she's really just experimenting she's a lesbian, you can only end up with one person"" or sometimes when she says something defending gay rights she also mentions it's a sin but that it's no different than lying or any other sin in the eyes of God. I'm an atheist but it still kinda hurt that the way it sounded like she thought being gay was something bad in a way and then the whole bi erasure thing also hurt too. I'm just wondering what I should say to her or how I should approach this stuff.",bisexual
:(,,bisexual
Are relationships supposed to start with crushes or are they mutually exclusive? I DON'T KNOW HOW TO DATE WOMEN AHHH,"I have just come to terms with the fact that another person I have a crush on just thinks of me as a secondary friend, this time a woman and the first one I have pursued as an openly gay person. That hurts, obviously. But the thing that gets me is I am not entirely sure how any or all relationships even start. A lot of successful relationships seem to start with people being friends. But sometimes I hear of people just ""dating."" I HATE that. I hate dating strangers. It is so gross to me cause I'm not even very much a sexual being, I like people before I care about kissing them. So I literally find myself physically repulsed because it's like making out with a stranger you don't even give a shit about, doesn't matter if they're hot. I get crushes once or twice a year and for a couple months I get this image in my head that I have a shot with this person and then they just don't care in real life or someone else comes in with some cheesy but direct shit and swoops them away. I'm just so angry at myself for not understanding how to play the game. ",bisexual
I found our mascot!,,bisexual
"Minority in a minority: life as a bisexual Sufi, fighting prejudice from all sides",,bisexual
I ain’t gay but...,...if he cute he cute.,bisexual
I’m definitely a hoodie bisexual,,bisexual
Stigma,"Hear me out. My school has a GSA (I’m not a part of) and they have decided to hang up posters all around the school. The goal was to make people “discover” the celebrities who are part of LGBT. the only issue is that they have decided to choose people who, lets just say, are obviously not straight. Now I don’t have an issue with this, except that it’s doing pretty much the opposite of what their intention is. I personally believe that these posters have actually contributed to additional non-acceptance. I feel if they chose people who were not obviously gay/bi it would help people maybe realize that not every gay person is a “limp-wristed with a lisp”. 

Thoughts?

Also...they also aren’t really helping the stigma that everybody in the community is in the far-left. ",bisexual
21M talking to guys on tinder,I've recently come out and am wanting to explore my sexuality. I've met and talked with some cute guys on tinder but we always end up just talking like friends. Do you guys have any advice for taking to guys and getting to the point of dating them? I'm kind of wanting a boyfriend but am having a hard time,bisexual
bi_irl,,bisexual
today a customer told my gf that it was hot that we’re dating so that’s a thing that happened 🙃🤢,,bisexual
TFW photos in your phone guarantee your bi-ness,,bisexual
How Do You Even Come Out?,"The past couple weeks I have really wanted to come out to my best friend but I can never figure out when and how to do it or what to come out as (I know I like guys but not sure about girls).

I think I am just going to come out as Bi beacuse that is more socialy accepected at my school and also leaves my options open in case I do end up liking a girl. I only want to come out to him so it has to be alone but i feel weird just randomly walking up to him and saying ""hey btw I am Bi"" so how should I bring it up? I am going to see a movie with him this weekend so should I do it their? I am also just so scared that are relationship will change because we have been friends for 8 years so should I even risk the relationship and come out to him?

(I already posted this on LGBTeens but figured it would be worth getting more peoples opinion)",bisexual
"How can I come out to my friends so they know I care enough to tell them, but without making a big deal?","I'm finally planning on coming out to my friends. I only have two friends who I feel comfortable sitting down and telling, as that's how one of them came out to me. I do want to tell the rest of my close friends, but in a less formal way because I don't want to make it a big deal.

I've only had one person come out to me, so I don't really know of other ways besides a formal conversation or using social media.",bisexual
Anyone here been watching The Man in the High Castle? (spoiler inside),"What do we think of Nicole Dörmer, the LebensBorn woman? I'm just giving a goodfaith interpretation of her as bisexual, rather than just a sexually ambivalent TV bad girl. Given that, I'm wondering whether or not people think her good or bad representation.",bisexual
Is it real that there's a lot of bi phobia on the LGBT community?,,bisexual
My best friend/sort of one-time girlfriend recently said in passing that her boyfriend made her “un-gay”. I’m not sure if she was joking but I’m really bummed out. She’s about to break up with him and I was excited about having another chance with her but now I’m not so sure.,"So I made a throwaway for this because a lot of people follow my main account and I’m only out to like 2 people and I live in the Bible Belt. I didn’t think this fit into the relationships advice subreddits because I do want advice, but I also just need to get this off my chest and y’all would understand better than other advice subreddits. 

Anyway my friend, I’ll call her Kayla, oh my god I’m so in love with her she is my sun and my moon and all my stars and I would do anything for her. I’ve had this unrequited love for her for about 6 years now. We came out to each other when we were like 14 and we both wanted to be with each other. We were for a little bit but the timing was all wrong and it was just too hard having a relationship in the closet. Time goes on and the sexual tension is still VERY there, but we drift apart a little because we’ve grown up and gone our separate ways. I put her out of my mind and I’m able to get over her a little bit because she got a boyfriend and I felt like I needed to chill out. 

We’ve started to grab lunch together fairly often now and I’m head over heels again for her. She complains about her boyfriend all the time and how he’s so problematic and he doesn’t treat her right. Well internally I’m screaming because she deserves so much better and oh my god I just want her in my arms again. So like a good friend I just sit and listen because I don’t wanna be weird and thirsty. I’m over the moon excited because she’s going to break up with him soon and that means I’ll finally have another go at this now that we’re adults. 

Well last week, she was talking about how their relationship got started and she mentioned in passing about how being with him made her not be gay anymore. She said it so casually and kept on talking that I couldn’t even ask her if she was joking. I don’t know if she was referring to how if a bi person gets involved with someone of the opposite sex then everyone says they’re actually straight. Of course if she’s decided she’s straight then that’s her life and I’m not going to shame her over that. 

I’m just confused and bummed out. I turn into jelly when I’m around her and I just can’t muster up the courage to ask her if she’s still bi. And how would I ask her? That seems like a topic you can’t segue into casually. And it’s probably a bad time to ask since she’s dealing with the boyfriend and I’m afraid I’d look like a vulture capitalizing on her being weaker right now. 

Have any of y’all been in this sort of situation? And can anyone offer me any advice on how to ask her if she’s still bi and/or even still into me? I still feel like such an infant gay and I need some guidance. Thanks in advance you lovely folk. 

",bisexual
Folks I think I need some advice,"I recently found out I like both boys and girls. But here is the thing. I like a boy in my school, but Im afraid that what if he is straight so he begins to hate me. Then what if he told others I'm bi? Gosh I really like him but I just cannot tell him.
Can u give me any advice?",bisexual
"When you had a childhood crush on the keyboard ""girl"" from Hanson but weren't disappointed when you found out the truth",,bisexual
Saw our colors at a car show,,bisexual
Coming out to family when you're a female already married to a man,"I (27f) recently accepted that I am bisexual and have come out to my husband and brother. I've been thinking about coming out to other family members but I know they wont be accepting and I'm not honestly sure I see a point since I'm not going to be going on dates with girls and bringing them home to meet the family nor do I really think it's their business what turns me on. However, it would be pretty nice to not feel like I need to hide who I am anymore but I'm not sure if it's worth the trouble since I'm already loved and accepted by my husband and brother who mean the most to me. 

Any thoughts? I'm curious if anyone else was married to the opposite sex before accepting who they are and what they did. ",bisexual
Biphobic bisexuals,Do they exist?,bisexual
Had a Revelation,"I’m bi, and only really has imposter syndrome for the first few months of figuring myself out. I have come to terms with myself and I love it. I love not suffering from my brain saying I’m either straight or gay, and I wish everyone else here didn’t have to either.
But today the thoughts came back. Not in the way you’d expect though. I was having imposter syndrome about being bi, because all other bis had imposter syndrome, and I didn’t. Fucking mind blown.
Currently working through that, but it’s a bit too meta for me to handle sometimes. Just wanted to share this.",bisexual
Bi Twitter,"Does anyone know any good Bisexual people to follow on Twitter? I follow a lot of Trans (including Bi Trans people), Gay and Lesbian people but not as many Bi. Since I'm Bi, I wanna hear from more bisexual voices (activists, comedians, authors, personalities etc). There are a few Bi YouTubers I follow like MissFenderr or Rosie Spaughton but I need more! Let me know what ya got! Thanks everyone!",bisexual
"xposted from /r/jokes ""Had sex last night,""",,bisexual
I'm (probably irrationally) worried about the guy I like,"This is kinda an unusual post, but I have to talk about it somewhere because I'm being eaten up by worry for him. I'll give a small bit of background to explain what's going on.

A couple days ago, my crush left to go on vacation with his family for a week. He and his family go to Mexico every year, and he said it's a nice weekend to just relax and unwind with no schedule to worry about. I didn't think too much of this at first. I knew I was gonna miss him (and I was right, I've had a deep feeling of sadness since going back to school without him there), but I didn't think anything about where he was going. But, a story he just put out on Instagram today has made me very worried about him, and I hope my worry is unwarranted.

It was a picture of the path of Hurricane Willa, and he was saying that this was gonna be an interesting vacation. I had completely forgotten about Hurricane Willa until this point, so I frantically pulled up the texts where he told me where he was going and compared it to the path of the hurricane he posted, and I realized that it's projected to go right by where he's at, and I'm scared now. I'm scared for his safety. I'm scared that something could happen to him. I'm certain he and his family will take care of themselves, but I'm still worried. Supposedly the hurricane is supposed to be big (Category 4 it says), and this only makes me more worried. I don't like that he's so close to where this is happening, and I wish I could make sure that he'll be safe.

Is my worry unwarranted? Do I have good reason to be worried about him? I just don't like being powerless in all this, I need to talk to people about it. I don't really know what to do, and I don't know how to lessen my worry.",bisexual
I know y’all saw it.,,bisexual
A small hypothesis of mine,"So I haven't been around here since long. These last days I have had an idea on my head.

The first days after I acepted that sometimes I like guys I had... quite a lot of ""gay days"" for lack of a better name but when I felt atracted to women had no atraction to men at all.

Now after a few weeks I can easily find atractive even if I have no sexual interest in them when I am not in that mood.

My hypothesis is that, on one hand I am being more confortable with the idea of feeling atracted to guys (ok, this one is very common) and on the other, and here is what I find interesting, when you feel atracted to someone your mood improves, I am thinking in some kind of pavlov effect that makes you still relate even if you are not in the mood.

Just an idea, what do you think?",bisexual
Anyone want to chat,"I am a bisexual Male, I have only ever sucked before and want to try more. But I also want to just shoot the shit with anyone who wants to talk about anything.",bisexual
What does coming out really mean to you?,"What does coming out mean to you?

&amp;#x200B;

  When people say coming out, it sounds so sudden, so final. One minute I have a whole side to my sexuality which is hidden, just my own, or mine and a few people very close to me. The next, I have announced it to world?

&amp;#x200B;

  I have several circles of friends, some of whom know the intimate details of my and my wife's sexuality (and lifestyle), some of whom who may know I am bi (or at least make the odd comment about other men), and others who have no bearing on my sexuality other than I am a married man, so therefore, waving the heteronormative flag.

&amp;#x200B;

  I work as a manager in a professional environment, no one has ever asked about my sexual orientation so I have never mentioned it. I select the bisexual option from the drop-down on the HR form and complete the Stonewall survey every year. To me, my sexuality has no bearing on my work, so I have never said anything. 

&amp;#x200B;

  My family doesn't really know. I'm sure they suspect, but it's not a conversation we've had directly. If they were to ask, I would have no problem telling them.

&amp;#x200B;

  I have a strange mix of feeling about what I should say, who I should tell, why I would be telling them... Part of me thinks it's no ones business, part of me feels like it's part of who I am so I should tell everyone, or even that I am obligated to tell people... 

&amp;#x200B;

  Is coming out telling everyone, just a few people, or just admitting it to myself? What does coming out really mean to you?",bisexual
Bi showerthought: bisexuals get characterized as promiscuous or likely to cheat in relationships but most of us are socially awkward and aggressively single,rip 💀,bisexual
I’m so bad at this,"Every time I like a girl it’s harder to present myself as gay and I always fly under the radar, I don’t have much experience with them and as a result someone else always swoops in and takes them. I wish I was more outgoing and less in my head but I’m so bad with romantic feelings after two decades of being in the closet and it’s just a pretty hopeless and shitty feeling. The people I always date end up being freaking asshole straight men who I don’t even think I have much of an interest in anymore given their inability to change in today’s political climate. I’m so frustrated and afraid to make moves. This is the worst feeling ever. Like I’m watching my life inside a window and nothing I can do will affect it.",bisexual
It will probably be rubbish but it's nice to see anyway.,,bisexual
It's probably been mentioned before but I love how Brooklyn Nine-Nine's highlight video on LGBT themes includes Rosa's opposite-sex relationships as well as her same-sex relationships,,bisexual
"I've begun the journey to accepting myself, but I need some help","Tldr: I am scared to begin presenting as more queer, but I also think that I want to. I'm not yet to a point in my life where I have been able to fully accept myself yet.

Throwaway because I'm still working on the whole coming out thing and other people know my normal profile...
A while ago, I accepted to myself that I was bisexual. I am sure it is no suprise to anyone here that I have some imternalized hangups about not being straight and so it's been a slow process. I recently discovered this sub, and it has been wonderful reading about such an amazing and accepting community, so I hoped maybe I could bring my problems here...

Before I continue, I am aware that my current struggles are not nearly as dire as some shared on this sub. I am blessed to have the ability to live on my own, to live in a very progressive part of the world, and to have a friend group that I am confident would accept me we're they to find out I was Bi. Hopefully you all still wouldn't mind talking to me about it. And maybe I'm not the only one struggling with my particular internal issues.

Anyway, on to the most recent manifestation which convinced me to finally stop lurking and post something here.

While browsing this sub, I became familiar with the ""cuffed jeans"" meme. I know it's a joke, but it was something innocuous I could do to feel closer to other bisexuals, so I started cuffing my jeans. And wouldn't you know it, that one small, simple act, gave me more of a rush than I have felt in months! So I have been doing it every day that I can since. Well today I have another opportunity and choice to make that could give me that feeling. I live in a rather rural part of America and normally I can't get a haircut because the nearest places close before I can get to them after work and everything that I would normally do after work when I lived in my home state of NJ, can only be done on the weekend. So I hardly ever have time. But today I am getting out of work early, and so I have the chance for the first time in months to get it cut. As such, I have a blank canvas to express myself, but I am terrified to do so. Like I said, my journey to accepting myself is far from over and I'm not sure what to do.

 I don't think I can bring myself to come out to anyone, but at the same time I really want to, and I want to have the confidence to have something more than a #2 buzz cut. (I am cis male BTW. Not sure I mentioned it above). I don't know that my work would accept anything too out there (a 6in mowhawk for example, which I could actually pull off at this point it has been so long since my last cut, lol.) But I'm sure I can get away with something new.

I wish there was a more subtle way I could dip my toe in, but I haven't found one in my searches since I learned I'd leave early today. So I'm frozen. Unable to decide what to do.

 I know the hair is only a symptom of larger issues, but it is the most pressing thing in my life currently because if i dont do it now, then I won't be able to get any cut for a while, and it is to the point where I've gotten comments from people at work... (My hair is straight and super thick so it just kinda Poofs out like a bowl around my head when it gets long.)

 Any advice on my situation, hair or otherwise because Lord knows there's plenty to break down here, would be greatly appreciated.",bisexual
(I stole this shitpost). Me talking to other bisexuals,,bisexual
Andrew Dice Clay once said...,"Andrew Dice Clay once said ""There is no bisexual. You either suck dick , or you do not suck dick.""

I suck dick. :)",bisexual
Bisexual Books,"We get a lot of posts here about Bisexual representation in literature, so I thought I'd share some articles I found: 

[A New Kind of Bi Representation in Audrey Coulthurst's YA fantasy *Inkmistress*](https://bookriot.com/?p=175544)

[10 Must-Read 2018 Bisexual YA Books](https://bookriot.com/2018/05/29/bisexual-ya-books/)

[13 Awesome YA Books with Bisexual Boys](https://bookriot.com/2017/10/11/ya-books-bisexual-boys/)

[5 Books About Bisexual Women of Color](https://bookriot.com/2017/10/11/books-bisexual-women-color/)

[100 Must-Read Bisexual Books](https://bookriot.com/2017/09/21/100-must-read-bisexual-books/)

[and more...](https://bookriot.com/tag/bisexual/)

Sorry that most of these are YA, but hopefully some of these sound interesting enough to check out! 

**Feel free to share any suggestions/articles in the comments!**",bisexual
Basically bi,,bisexual
Newly out bisexual guy frustrated with dating... help?!,"I’ve[24m] recently accepted my bisexuality and I decided to put myself out there and try and start dating men. I signed up for Bumble and Tinder just to test the waters. Anyway, a lot of the men on there seem to be openly gay and sure of themselves. I’ve gotten a TON of likes and matches, more than I ever got from women, and I’ve had multiple conversations. I’m very upfront and honest about my situation. I explain that I’m completely new to this etc and then I never hear from them again and they usually unmatch with me. Is this normal? I completely understand why someone wouldn’t want to date someone like me but I’m beginning to get a bit frustrated and am wondering if this is even worth trying. Is being bisexual a turn off for gay people or do you think people just aren’t interested in someone who is completely new to it all? I live in the rural south so it’s not like there are a lot of LGBT places around me. Any advice?",bisexual
Advice? More of a rant,"Heya ^^

I (19F) have been having some issues lately with my sexuality. Like, I've known I'm bi for quite a long time now, but somehow I feel like me identifying as bi is not valid as I've never even kissed anyone. And that's also what I keep hearing from some people in my surroundings. That I cannot know for sure unless I've 'experimented'. And I just don't know what to do about it because my confidence is also sinking further.

So any of you got any advice on how to deal with it? ",bisexual
I may be slightly more attracted to men.,"I've been thinking a lot recently, and I am sexually attracted to both genders. But I've also come to the realization, I'm way more romantically attracted to men. This is very confusing.",bisexual
Tru life,,bisexual
In desperate need of some advice coming out to SO...,"28 F in a hetero relationship with my husband for over 11 years. We met in high school and have grown and developed so much over these years. It wasnt until this year that I finally accepted what I have always known, even before meeting my husband, that I am bisexual. I have yet to tell him this realization although I have been dropping hints here and there. 

Let's face it, I'm terrified of telling him. These past few months have been really rocky in our relationship. A family emergency has put a strain on our lives, and I started my teaching career which brings up so much stress in itself, but this big secret hanging on my shoulders is adding to the intense anxiety and depression. 

I have no clue how he will react. I worry that his insecurities will eat him alive and add to the wedge between us. I frequently go out with my friends to the gay bars in town, and I know that this will start to make him worry. Bottom line, I dont want to be with anyone else. I want to strengthen our relationship and rebuild what we once had. I hate this limbo stage, it is eating me up so much. 

I do have the urge to explore but at this time, I want to be with him and I made that commitment. I'm just so worried about his reaction. Will he want to leave me and be with someone who doesn't have those desires? Will his insecurities and his ego take over? Will it change the way he sees me? I'm just feeling at a loss right now, any advice is greatly appreciated &lt;3 I need help getting though this.",bisexual
Straight Boyfriend doesn’t understand visibility,"So basically, I’ve(20F) got a straight cis boyfriend(19M) and he definitely understands things like housing rights and employment rights and things like that, but he doesn’t understand the necessity for media representation of minorities and change in acceptable social behavior in order to accommodate minorities esp women.  For people out there who have been in similar circumstances (loving but ignorant s/o), how did you successfully explain to them the personal significance of such issues? I’ve got a lot of communication issues in general so I find it hard to express my true feelings and the reasons for those feelings, so it helps me to rehearse or note down in my journal the talking points of political discussions, otherwise I can be a very toxic person to talk(argue) with and that has already caused a little disconnect between us when it comes to political issues",bisexual
I Adopted this baby today at Pride,,bisexual
Resources for straight spouse/partner?,"Happy Monday, everyone.

I ebb and flow between getting really close to coming out to my wife to being a thousand miles away from it.  Either way, if/when I do get there I am hoping I can provide her with some resources about having a bisexual husband and just bisexuality in general.  It's not that she is so close-minded that she has never heard of it before, but I think it would be a good thing to offer that kind of support to her.  Do any of you know of any good books, websites, YouTube videos, etc. that I could provider her with that may help answer any questions she may have?  Thanks!",bisexual
Found out my mom thought I was a confused gay guy for the last two years. Tried to explain bisexuality and preference to her for about an hour to little effect.,"Like the title says, I've been out for a couple years and I just learned that my mom thought I was a confused gay. When I came out to her and my father I didn't use the word bisexual (or queer as I actually identify but I brought it up and could tell that was going nowhere) and I feel like that was a mistake. She interpreted me saying ""I like guys and girls, but I have a preference for guys,"" as me saying that I like girls as friends but I'm only romantically interested in men.

So I tried correcting that, and I tried over and over to explain that I was bi with a preference for men but it didn't matter how many times I explained it wasn't getting through. At a certain point I was literally using ice cream metaphors like ""I love chocolate ice cream, it's my favorite, but sometimes I also like to have vanilla ice cream,"" but nothing worked. 


She just keeps saying I'll figure it out when she's the one who can't figure me out. She said she was okay with me being gay but now she doesn't know, she thinks you either like men or women. Coming out went so well for me and now I feel like it's retroactively going poorly. My mom was the person I could talk to about my issues navigating life as a queer person before and I feel like I lost that and I am deeply hurt. She says she's trying her best and I want to believe her but I really don't feel like it's that difficult of a concept to grasp. I got biphobic vibes the whole conversation. I will give her the benefit of the doubt though, I don't think I want to give up.


I just don't know what to do. Has anyone had success explaining polysexuality to a family member? How can I work past this with her or should I just avoid the subject?",bisexual
Wait did Jaiden just come out?,,bisexual
Thanks Buzzfeed for always knowing the answers,,bisexual
For people who were curious,"Did anyone on here experiment with the same sex and find you didn’t like it? How did it go? What were your feelings before and after?

Trying to decide if my attraction to the same sex is only in fantasy or not and nervous about experimenting ",bisexual
I love being bi,Doubles the chances that I won't get laid,bisexual
The ultimate bi meme,,bisexual
Just a reminder...,"...That no matter what you are, what you identify as, and how other people see you, your sexuality is beautiful and something to be celebrated. Even if it seems like nobody is on your side, there are always people who will stand by your side, even at your lowest points. Love you all ❤️🧡💛💚💙💜",bisexual
She speaketh the truth,,bisexual
When and how did all of you come out,Not sure about it but am pretty sure an bi. As a guy I can say I’ve had a few male crushes but never done anything about it could use advise.,bisexual
What is bisexual culture,"I am fairly new to being out and I am literally the only person I know who is an out bisexual. All the queer people I know identify as gay or lesbian. Therefore I have never encountered bi culture. Do we have a strong one or is it less defined than other subcultures. 
I realise that being bisexual doesn’t mean I have to fit into any stereotypes, I was just wondering if any things I do intersect with what can be termed as bi culture. ",bisexual
"PSA: Bisexual means you're attracted to 🚲 and pansexual means you're attracted to 🍳, end of story",,bisexual
Windows Bicentennial Edition,,bisexual
I’m definitely a hoodie bisexual,,bisexual
When on a date with the same sex how do you deal with the fear of homophobia and threats?,"You may of saw my earlier post, me and this cute guy are going on a date to a local mall. Like I don’t want to go looking for trouble, we won’t French kiss in public or anything stupid but I think we have the right like anyone else to hug, give a peck on the cheek and hold hands, I want to show my affection like any other couple. What do we do if we have people being nasty to us, homophobic remarks and threats? Like what if we are eating dinner and we have people yelling shit at us? I live in a pretty okay city but I still bet we would encounter some homophobes. Any advice would be appreciated! ",bisexual
Came out to my husband of 4 years!,"Came out to my husband, we had a nice heart to heart about our feeling about it. He is totally cool with it and understands it doesn’t effect our marriage, that this is just part of who I am. It feels good to be out to someone because I doubt I will ever let my parents or siblings know. ",bisexual
"Guys I’m super excited, I’m going on my first date which is also my first same sex date!!!","I’m legit such an unsocial awkward 17yr guy, but I downloaded this app called Yubo which is basically Tinder for Teens where you can make “friends”, me and this guy started talking and now we are going to go on a date one Saturday!!! My awkward shy unsocial ass got a date and a gay one at that!!! I’m super excited OMG legit a reason to live dudes, Idk why I’m posting this here but like I’m super happy Lol. Is it weird to hold hands or kiss on the first date? Idk Lol any advice would be appreciated, I’M JUST SOOOO EXCITED!!! ",bisexual
The Real Bi Shirt Culture. &lt;3,,bisexual
"I get so much homophobia from this guy I know, I honestly feel so shitty!","This guy I know is honestly very homophobic to me, he sees me sending cute snaps to a guy that I’m going on a date to he then pretends to vomit and tells me that’s sooo fucking cringy. He says that all gays are just dirty and wrong. He tells me that is should get a sex change because I like men and I have long hair. He once compared my Bisexuality to Pedophillia. Once said if he had the power to he would wipe all filthy gays off the earth. He judges me for looking at gay porn on Reddit but looks at straight porn on Reddit. He says that Gay marriage is barely legal and shit, I feel so very crap inside now it just builds up making my sexuality feel more and more wrong and it hurts deep inside! I go to a Christian School so I honestly don’t think telling on him would have much an effect and all the other times he is a nice guy it’s just this homophobia that is brought up from time to time. Honestly what should I do, how should I feel? ",bisexual
I’m pretty sure Chandler was bi,"Okay.. I’m in my early thirties and have been binge watching Friends while perusing Reddit, which means this sub, often... and I’m seeing a lot of indications that Chandler is bi.
Now.. I don’t have the time to put all this out with episode numbers, etc. but I’ll recap:

Seasons 2-6 Chandler has been wearing many ties and dress shirts with blocked purple/pink colors together.
Three times, so far, Chandler has commented on how attractive men are, smell, look, etc when trying to set up Rachel on a few separate occasions in different episodes.
And going so far as to not discount that he would date them. 
Now... I also understand that there were blatant homophobic jokes, trans jokes, etc and they weren’t ahead of their time in that regard. But I do like to think that maybe they were trying to tell us something. And now I’m looking for any new clues. 

But, tonight.. this bi girl is kinda happy that maybe she caught some fun bi code.. even if I’m making it all up ❤️",bisexual
Boarding a shuttle van and faced with the ultimate bi dilemma:,Sit by the cute girl or the cute boy?,bisexual
Best bi couple in television history? I sure think so. 😁,,bisexual
Sincerely tired of crushing on my coworkers,Why did I have to work at the one doctor's office full of other bi chicks. 🤦🏾‍♀️,bisexual
Saw this bi-colored pinwheel at a church.,,bisexual
I'm a misanthropic bisexual.,I could hate fuck anyone.,bisexual
Bi erasure on TV,"I'm sure this has been complained about endlessly here, but I want to rant and this seems like the place to do it.

I've been watching a TV series with my husband lately where two male characters have a secret affair. One of them is scared to come out, and gets a woman pregnant, then marries her. The other guy keeps telling him he can't marry her, because he likes sex with men, and is therefore gay.

Not once is it considered that he might be bi. He has sex with men, therefore gay. No middle ground. And it made me shout at the TV, several times.

I don't tend to be vocal about my sexuality, but more and more lately, I've been correcting people when they assume I'm gay, and this sort of thing on TV is why people have these assumptions. Bi people don't exist on TV as they do in the real world. It's bollocks.",bisexual
Only recently fully realised that I am bi and I am torn about the idea of telling people,"On the one hand I kind of want to talk about it with friends and stuff 

On the other hand I don't want people to look at me differently and I don't want my friends making (good-heartes but still annoying) jokes about it. Also, cause I only see myself dating girls but sleeping with guys occasionally I don't really see it as their business so I'm pretty torn between saying and not saying. 

Even if I do, it will be a while from now cause it's all very new (but exciting).",bisexual
[M20] Fantasized about my male friend last night while high on weed.,"Smoked some weed last night and my thoughts just drifted towards men and my friend who I really respect even when I'm not high but just hopelessly crush on when I'm high. I though of knocking on his door and closing it behind me, making him sit on the bed while I go to work on him. I start with kissing his lips with all the passion in the world, continuing on to his neck while pulling on his hair. I remove his shirt while I go down on his body, ravaging his chest, sucking on his nipples as I fail to stop my hands from moving on to his cock. I just eat his toned body and just jump on his cock, taking it in my mouth in one swing.

  


I suck on it until I get tired of not having it inside me. I remove his pants, throw him on his back and jump on top of him, kissing his sexy face, I bury my face in his neck as he grabs my ass and pulls me towards him. I go down and suck on his cock for some more time with his precum floating in my mouth as he pulls me back and forces his tongue inside my mouth. He suddenly gets on top of me and without warning shoves his cock inside my ass, I reach the farthest reaches of heaven as I grab his neck and pull him towards my chest which he kisses all over. We keep going like this for a long time as I have his ass in my hands, his mouth on my neck and his cock thrusts just washing over me as he begins to moan in absolute pleasure, warning of cumming inside me which pushes me over the edge, right as I feel him biting on the side of my neck and his cock emptying inside my ass. We both moan with animalistic lust and he continues to plow inside me, my hands are buried deep inside his ass and his back. I grab on to his neck and pull him towards my mouth, I bite on his lower lip and then suck on it before I feel his tongue invading the privacy of my mouth and my soul. I embrace him with absolute pleasure as I prepare myself to bury myself in his warm sexy embrace for the whole night, my whole life.",bisexual
"People in relationships, how often do people tell you that you are straight/gay because of your pairing and does it bother you?",,bisexual
Does being bi mess with your ability to make friends?,Just kind of curious. I've had issues lately where I'll think I'm just making a new friend but I find myself falling for them. ,bisexual
Unique ways of dropping the news.,"Does anyone have tips, advice, or personal coming out stories other than just saying it flat out?",bisexual
"Recently made a coming out post on instagram, now I'm getting weird ads on all my social media.","I made a coming out post on instagram a few weeks ago for national coming out day. Since then all my social media has been filled with ads I've never seen before. Today on facebook I saw 2 different ads by different companies advertising PrEP. On instagram I saw a few ads for free HIV testing and one for a low testosterone treatment, and reddit is basically just advertising sex toys to me.

Anyone else experience this? I mean, it's no secret that these companies target ads to specific demographics. I guess I was just surprised that all the ads for the queer demographic are about HIV or hormone treatment. ",bisexual
Tinder?,"Yes; no?

I’m 18 and I’m in college. I can’t really think of any good ways to find a boyfriend. Or girlfriend, but that’s a different game. 

Lgbt groups have been suggested. But really, I’m not an LGBT kinda person. I’m bi, sure. But the LGBT community, the LGBT scene. We don’t jive. 

There aren’t any guys I’m close to that I have particular feelings toward. An I can’t just approach some guy on the street.

But I’m also kinda scared of using a dating app. Idk what to do.
",bisexual
I think im Bi-sexual (Probably the most typical post ever but yeah kind of need someone else view on this),"all my life I just figured I was straight as an arrow, never had any doubt, until like a year and a half ago when I bought a dildo because I felt attracted to it and wanted to experiment.

and so I started playing with the dildo and I just got so turned on it was insane... and it somehow felt so natural to me.

i am primarily attracted to women, but there is this urge towards men that I wasn't aware of until last year. But it isn't all men, its a specific type of man more to the feminin side of things.

I felt ashamed when I was experimenting with the dildo and even though my mother would support me either way, I was and still am kind of scared she would/will find out.

&amp;#x200B;

i don't think im really looking for advice or anything or have a question for that matter, I just wanted to get this off my chest:) what do you all think?

(not a troll post)",bisexual
Afraid my roommate will find out,"So I’m a freshman in college (18F) and go to a private, Christian liberal arts school. I think my roommate might not take well to the fact that I am bisexual, as I’ve heard her mention how “it’s a sin” to be gay. I am also struggling with some gender identity issues. So one time we we’re talking about past sexual experiences, and I kept using “they” pronouns to refer to my partners (all women). I’m afraid she is suspicious/feeling unsure about what exactly I’m saying and that she’s going to catch on. What do I do?",bisexual
I'm Confused,"Ran across this subreddit on r/all and thought it was a good place to ask. 

I'm 16, and I *think* I'm attracted to both men and women, but not in a sexual way -- mostly I just wanna have Denny's and hugs. Is it normal for someone my age to be fine with never having sex? I hear stories about crazy teens trying to get laid any chance they can, and I'm over in my corner just thinking ""But it's awkward, and such a hassle to try and figure out if the other person wants it, and then there's asking and I'm nervous, etc. etc."" 

I just feel really weird about all this and people here seem nice so I thought I could ask here. ",bisexual
Went on my first successful date with a woman!,"I've been on a few dates with women before. One was more of a platonic meetup, the other became platonic really fast, and the third she told me she used to be in a cult (I think she was trying to freak me out because it wasn't going well).

This time around, I was freaking out (and still kind of am), but managed to hang out with her for nearly three hours and had a good time. I'm not sure if it was on purpose or not, but her foot brushed against my leg and I started blushing so hard. That's never happened to me before, especially not with any man I've ever been with. 

All of my romantic interactions with women have been at clubs when I'm super drunk and I was kind of afraid my attraction to women was just caused by drinking. Nooope! Idek if I like men all that much lol. Idk if things will go anywhere real, but I'm happy with how things went :D",bisexual
I'm a girl and I'm in a wonderful relationship with a boy. I really miss kissing girls though.,"My boyfriend is awesome.  I love him to death. Recently though I've found myself wistfully thinking about making out with girls again, and I hate myself for it. I feel like I'm confirming a negative bi stereotype. :(  What should I do?",bisexual
"What do you call it when you like guys and girls, but are still single",Bi-yourself,bisexual
Selfie Sunday!,"New sunday new thread!

I hope the week had some laughs for you all :D [MFW I'm behind in class](https://imgur.com/a/nZyDAvM)",bisexual
Honestly not sure if I'm bi,"So right now i have a crush on a guy (im a girl) but i have found myself glancing at or making mental comments on how hot other women look. And if a girl came up to me and asked me out, I'd say yes. Does this mean i'm bisexual? I'm confused about myself.",bisexual
We need a community chat room,I always have small rants or stuff and dont really want to make a whole entire fucking essay just to get within the rules of the sub,bisexual
Lonelier since coming out,Does anyone besides me actually feel lonelier since coming out than you did before you were out to anyone?,bisexual
Boyfriend freaking out after I casually signaled I'd be down for a threesome,"I'm a bi female with a pretty limited sexual history - while I've been on dates with both men and women, I've only ever had sex with men: my ex-husband I was married to for 10 years (we got married super young), a guy on tinder who was pretty persistent (I consented but it was totally his idea, not mine), and my current boyfriend, who I've been dating for 18 months. Boyfriend has known I'm bi since pretty early on and has always been super cool about it (well, until now *cue foreshadowing music*)

Boyfriend also identifies as bi, but has said he is closer to the straight side of the spectrum than I am.  Compared to me he's had a super adventurous sexual past (50+ partners) and has had sex with a man and lots of women and a few gender non-conforming people. He has also participated in two wwm threesomes.  When he told me about the threesomes, he emphasized that they were super awkward and totally didn't turn out to be his thing.

About a week ago at dinner, after several drinks, I told my boyfriend I was a little sad that he hadn't enjoyed the threesomes and decided they weren't for him, because it's something I thought would be fun to try.  The conversation moved on pretty quickly to other topics and I didn't think much more about it.

The next day I went out of town for work and he kept calling every few hours. It was getting kind of tiresome because I'd be in a meeting or talking to a potential professional contact and have to excuse myself to take his calls but then he wouldn't have anything to say except that he missed me and would try to keep me on the phone even though I told him I was busy and would need to call him back later. When I got home and confronted him about it, he told me it was because he was spinning out in insecurity and irrational jealousy (his words) because of what I'd said at dinner the other night, and he was worried I would cheat on him with a woman. I reassured him that I'm great at monogamy (never cheated on my ex even when we were having lots of issues and I had the opportunity) and was not going to violate his trust.  Since then, though, he's been initiating sex a lot and obsessing over whether or not it's good for me. I'm also going out of town again for work soon (as the only childless person in my office I get those assignments all the time) and am worried about repeat clingyness. 

I'm hoping time will help but any advice for talking with him?  I don't want to lie and backtrack by saying that actually I'm not into the idea of a threesome and/or having sex with a woman but I'm not sure what else to say to reassure him.",bisexual
Confused sexuality (25 - M) has been rough. Thoughts/opinions/personal experiences?,"\*HONEST POST\*

In August 2017 I took LSD for the first time with my best friend's brother. I knew him distantly growing up, but the very first time I actually hung out with him was when I took acid. The rule of thumb for psychedlics is that you take them with individuals you trust in a setting you trust and I followed neither of those. It was me, him, and three other guys who were not tripping and, while sitting in a dark steam room, I uttered the words ""Guys...I'm gay."" When I said those words, I was honestly shocked. It was hard for me to process that they had come out of my mouth and more importantly *why* they had. I say this because before that night I had never been attracted to guys or wanted to date/have sex with them. I've always had girlfriends growing up and I am sexually and romantically attracted to women. It truly felt like someone else had said those words for me. One of the strangest moments for me was that right before I made the declaration that would utterly confuse my life until this day, my best friend's brother said, ""Say it, just say it!"" like he knew what I was going to say.  


The very next day (probably not the best idea?) I told my mom and my sister that I was gay. My sister didn't believe me at first, then cried and apologized for calling me gay as a little kid, and then gave me a big hug. My mom was very confused and basically sat in denial after I told her and asked me what had led to me ""realizing"" this. At the time I simply told her that I had realized it (didn't mention the LSD) and that it was something I was going to explore. After that I started my senior year of college and told a few friends about my experience and they were all pretty accepting. I had never done anything with a guy (still haven't a year later), but I did notice that I started noticing guys more. I dated two more girls for about a month each time but got so paranoid that I was just in denial that I broke things off and told them that I felt I should date guys before going forward with them. Basically for the past year I've thought constantly about whether I'm gay or straight or bi or if I'm just seriously losing my mind. Growing up I never watched gay porn or fantasized to men and though I was always comfortable being more physically intimate with my close guy friends and slept in the same bed with them, I never thought about having sex with them. So now I'm just like, ""What the fuck is even real anymore? Am I lying to myself?"" I don't like to see the guys that I did LSD with because I feel like they think I'm just pretending and they know ""**the truth**"" but for me it's just not that simple. I've identified as bisexual/bi-curious because I feel that it's the most accurate representation for where I'm at right now.  


I'm currently dating a girl that knows all of this and she is bisexual and very understanding about my confusion. So grateful for her. We have an active sex life and I enjoy being with her but I have this nagging doubt that tells me that I'm ""just in denial"" and that if I keep dating her, I'll never know if I truly like guys or not. I've told her my doubts and she even told me that she'd let me date guys if I wanted to explore it, but I guess I just don't have the desire to do it. So it's rough, my fellow bi-Redditers. This was just rambling on and on, but I hope some of it made sense to you and if you have any questions, please comment and I will respond. I appreciate you all so much.  


 Any ideas? ",bisexual
Nearly a year after coming out and I am still struggling with internalized homophobia,"What am I seeking here? Maybe advice and reassurance? 
I am the youngest of 5 brothers and was bullied by them with the term gay when I was little; I know because of this my brain attaches an almost sickly connotation to the word. So it’s nearly a year since I came out, I’ve slept with guys, dated, had therapy, went on anti depressants and became strong enough to wean off them. I’ve came out to friends and SOME family, my life should be perfect right? 
A guy I was dating once told me ‘I know you have a shell and that you don’t show yourself to the real world’ in a way he’s right, whilst I’m so much happier and whilst I’m beginning to enjoy life again and am more lively I just can’t get too close to guys I like because I know I still have internalized homophobia. Sometimes, the day after I’ve slept with a guy, I feel sick. I’m still struggling to accept and love myself and once I do that I know my social anxiety and depression will fully go and I’ll actually give guys a chance to see the real me. I just don’t know what the real me is yet because it’s buried under internalized homophobia. Has anyone experienced this? Do you they know steps to focus of overcoming it?",bisexual
Heteronormative talk,"I get the tiniest bit annoyed when it's from friends but lately I can't stand it when it's coming from a spouse who has known for almost 10 years.

It's been putting me in a really bad mood and he thinks I have postpartum depression when really what makes me cry is the fact that he automatically calls people in m/f relationships straight, though all the hormonal changes probably don't help either.

He realized it bothered me the other day and it happened again today and I don't have the energy and patience to have a dialogue about it. It's such a turnoff though. ",bisexual
Texas Masculine man age 40-60,"Hello there, I am a mid age masculine bi, white, and interesting in connecting with other masculine dudes. I dont go to bars so dont even know how to meet people. If you happen to live in Texas, or come to Tx, lets have a conversation.",bisexual
"Relationships are overrated anyway, right?",,bisexual
My Rocket League car! Did I do a good enough job for the colours?,,bisexual
Coping with socio-economic disparities in young same sex relationships,"My S/O (M/33) is making a shit ton of money in investment banking ($127k/yr).  I (M/27) am a full time student in undergrad and working in food service making ~$26k. We live in NYC. 

I can barely afford to live, but thankfully have family and of course, him. But I'm busy af holding down a nearly fully time job and taking classes. 

He's busy a lot too, but hates that I have to work nearly every weekend, plus nights and/or early mornings. And he won't say it but I know he kind of hates the idea of me working so hard for such low wages.  

We've been together roughly 1.5 years. Went through a lot both being closeted and both having never dated a man.  We're good now, but he's really losing his patience now that we're well into the semester again.  

He wants me cut down my hours and not be concerned with money as I can live with him and not worry about money.  But the problem is, I just can't give in and not work for my living as much as I'd like to not have to. 

I've been trying to find another job, but with my major and school hours finding one flexible enough outside the restaurant industry is difficult. 

Just kind of venting here. Anyone coping with similar circumstances? ",bisexual
"This popped up in my feed, thought it was from this sub at first.",,bisexual
Unable to get dates with straight women from online as a bisexual male,"Hi,

I am \*pansexual\*, non-monogamous, and possibly polyamorous.

&amp;#x200B;

In practice I would be called gay, as 100% of my relationships and dates have been with gay men.  This due to me usually having a stronger preference for males and also I have found it infinitely easier to get dates with gay men than straight women.

&amp;#x200B;

I believe I've been successful at gay dating online...first dates always want to see me again and I have been in a string of long term relationships--my boyfriend and I have been together for 3 years now.  And I mean actual dates, not hookups.

&amp;#x200B;

I don't know how to translate my skills at gay online dating into straight online dating.  The problem is I can't even get a first date on apps like Tinder or Coffee Meets Bagel when looking for women, because 99.9% of them swipe left on me.  On the other hand, my profile on gay Tinder gets matches daily and amazingly many of them have led to actual dates in real life.

&amp;#x200B;

I would think the same skills used in gay dating would transcend to straight dating, i.e. gender should not matter with regards to dating.

&amp;#x200B;

How could I approach straight dating online differently in order to at least get first dates?

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
I just got what the lyrics to Britney Spears “If You Seek Amy” means,Only that I wish all of the boys and all of the girls want to seek amy. I’m just all Bi-Myself :(,bisexual
being very subtle with my iPad background,,bisexual
First post here: I've been unsure for a long time about whether I am straight or bi and I just thought I'd post about a recent experience,"So to start I'm a 19 year old guy and so far I've made out with way more girls than I even remember and I've slept with two and had good fun doing it. I've been confused because I have found both men and women physically attractive but I've always been too nervous to act on it. To be honest I think I would only date women just cause I seem to form better emotional connections with them. Anyway back to my story, a few weeks back I got a new phone so I figured that I could make a tinder account on my old one that I could set to guys only (I have a regular tinder and the new one is a faceless photo). I really wasn't expecting much and didn't really intend to act on any of it but the other night a guy messaged me who was nearby and we talked a little. He was kinda in the same situation and he asked if we could meet up. I've been asked before and always said no but cause I've been kind of annoyed that I don't know my sexuality I just said fuck it and went for it. I almost backed out every second after I said yes but he came over and picked me up and we went somewhere secluded and messed around in his car (no sex just other stuff). 

Again, before this I had never done anything with a guy - not even a kiss or anything - but yeah I went for it and I enjoyed it. I thought after I tried it I would know if I was straight or bi but still I'm like fuck I don't know. Anyway yeah I definitely enjoy it more with girls but I can't deny that I had fun. 

Oh also is it normal to find yourself equally attracted to both at times and other times to one over the other?

Sorry for the long post and yeah, thanks for reading. ",bisexual
Headed to Honolulu Pride Parade!,,bisexual
haven’t been able to come out yet but this pin I got at my schools SOGI conference makes me happy :),,bisexual
When you like classy guys but also feminine gals,,bisexual
"Is there a mega thread or such to recommend/discuss bi-oriented books, movies, etc around these parts?",Asking for me. I’m the friend. ,bisexual
Going to an LGBTQ Halloween party. I have a rainbow earring in my conch. I'm going to dress up as a lesbian anime character. Still afraid of being too straight.,,bisexual
"Even though it's BuzzFeed, I think we're all in for a treat",,bisexual
Anyone from Finland with tips on where to find a woman who's into women?,I don't even know what dating apps work here. I don't know anyone who is LGBT. Any advice?,bisexual
My bf caught me staring at a girls boobs.,Can i get a yikes in chat?,bisexual
Do you ever just look at a picture and feel overwhelmed by your bisexuality,,bisexual
One button to rule them all,,bisexual
Egh...I love Gus and the video is pretty funny but... bi people don't exist i guess,,bisexual
Hey!,"Hello r/bisexual, i have a fucking idea. Make a reddit group chat, or a discord group! 

I want to tell people how fucking hot [Dennis Lloyd](https://imgur.com/gallery/5Gxmv8U) is without having to write 342 reasons why and decide which flair! 

Please. Mods. 

If not i may torment the soul of this sub to eternity.",bisexual
Bi anthem?,,bisexual
Bi Sky,,bisexual
Found our cereal,,bisexual
Hi....I brought LEMON BARS,"Hey just look for a couple more bi-cycle friends? PM if ya wanna be friends. Also drop your best joke in the comments. Spread some laughter :)
Make sure to take a bar for the road!",bisexual
Romantic v. Sexual,"Bi Female here. Does anyone find that they are attracted to one gender only sexual, not romantically? I am interested in women both romantically &amp; sexually but with men, only sexually. Just wanting to know if anyone has had similar feelings as myself? Thanks!",bisexual
enjoying this tonight and thought I’d share!,,bisexual
"I’m a little drunk but hear me out, Imagine if we all got together and hugged ate Lemon bars, cuffed our pants and did other Bi stuff... like we all wore purple and hugged and just had a lot of fun it would like be the best!!! I love this community, let’s all chill and be Bi besties!!!",,bisexual
Girls/girls/ boys by PATD should be our anthem,"https://youtu.be/Yk8jV7r6VMk   

all in favor? all opposed? ",bisexual
Went on my first date with a guy!,"I have dated girls before, and I have kissed boys, but never romantically. Was actually pretty nervous, but everything went very well. We’re still talking and I might see him again soon. 

Thank you for coming to my ted talk.",bisexual
The question for bi guys in relationship,"Being bi myself I have never missed relations with men while in a relation with a girl and vice versa. What about you, guys? Have you ever missed relationships or just sex with one gender while your current partner is of another gender?",bisexual
Riot!,"Am I the only one who saw Hayley Williams in the “Misery Business” video and thought “well...........gotdamn”

I heard that song again for the first time in years and that memory came out of nowhere lol",bisexual
Assignment on Bisexuality,"In my sociology of the family class we had to analyze an array of journal articles and specifically focus on and write about one. By chance, I ended up choosing the one about bisexuals and their coming out process (if they had one). I ended up getting a bit personal in my paper but it felt like a weight was being lifted off of me when I wrote it. Just for a second it felt like I was speaking my truth. ",bisexual
Girl but never got to experiment with girls. Just...a self-pitying ramble.,"For me, I'm certain I'm interested in girls. For a bit of backstory, I was raised Mormon (ugh) which is pretty toxic to queer members. I didn't even realize being gay was an option until late high school, and I didn't know being bi was a thing until college. In my twenties. When I realized I loved being around my roommate. A lot. Making food together, going shopping, watching anime while sitting close together with the same blanket wrapped tightly around our shoulders. At one of the BYU's. Where I couldn't talk about it with anyone. 

Now, as I'm also ace, it took me much longer to differentiate between ""she's just my best friend"" and ""I like her."" Speaking of being ace, I'm pretty sure I don't experience sexual attraction, but aesthetically, girls are just way more interesting to me... And guys, not. Do I actually feel something sexual to girls? I have no idea. It doesn't really matter.

I'm now in a very loving relationship with a guy. It's been a few years, and he's done everything for me--supported me through leaving my family, financially and emotionally supported me through trying to lessen a chronic illness, left our culty church with me. He's my best friend and I love him a lot. I laugh with him so much. He's funny, sweet, empathetic, caring, all the comfort and stability I've ever wanted. And he's helped me heal from things, a lot.

But my brain occasionally thinks of what could have been. What if I'd been able to experiment with my roommate, an also-exmormon who two years after the fact came out to me as bi? What if I hadn't been raised in a church that wouldn't let me experiment? Will I regret never kissing a girl? Never physically dating one? Never knowing what it's like?

Recently bf was listening to a podcast with a gay exmormon guest who had previously tried to marry a woman, who was his best friend and who he loved, but something was missing. He left her, the church, and embraced being gay, and he said that the first time he kissed and let himself be interested in a guy, it was totally different. My boyfriend tried talking to me about this and posed the question, what if you're lesbian and you just don't know it? (Being ace makes things hard, because romantically, gender doesn't matter, but girls are just undeniably cuter to me.) 

I think on some level my boyfriend realizes that it bothers me, as he's brought it up a few times and seemingly offered me a chance to experiment. But when I asked for clarification, it would require us breaking up, and I can't ever see myself doing that and then potentially coming back to him. It's not like I'm wanting to go date around anyway, I'm not big on that, I guess it's just realizing that I never got to? I told him that he wasn't worth giving up. I love him and don't want to give up that history and relationship, and yet my feelings of ""what if"" will not go away, for now. It happens maybe once a week, a passing thought, but realistically I know I love him a ton and never want to leave him.

I just feel like it's a ""the grass is always greener"" situation and in every way except the uncertainty, I'm happy. I'm content. It just...sucks, sometimes.

I just needed to ramble. See if anyone else can relate. Get my feelings out. Cry a little. Debate whether I should even post this in fear that my bf ever checks this sub, not that any of this would be a surprise. The hardest part is just knowing that I love my partner and occasionally feeling like this anyways--and then having it pointed out that maybe my love for him is somewhat limited because maybe, just maybe, I'm a closeted lesbian. Which he said out of love and concern, not rudely.

I know not experimenting doesn't make me less bi, but sometimes it feels like it does. ",bisexual
"I'm coming out soon, and I'm utterly terrified","I don't know how I'm going to do it, but I am coming out by the end of this year. I'm completely scared that I'm going to make enemies out of my family (super Cristian and all) but I cannot keep living the lie of heterosexuality. I feel so scared, because I have come out to everyone but my family, and I don't want to lose them while becoming my true self. Is there anything I can do? Any advice or experience you guys can pass on?

Edit 1: I'm thinking of doing it after the MLB world series. My parents are huge Red Sox fans, and if they win this might put them in just the right mood to be accepting.",bisexual
Dealing with straight relationship?,"Hey everyone I'm in a straight relationship of 7 years but lately I've been craving sex with men really badly. I don't want to cheat, and I don't think she would be ok with me hooking up with guys. So I was wondering if anyone has been in a similar situation and could offer any advice?",bisexual
When you’re bi and someone you like transitions....,"You’re “bi-winning”...

Get it cause, you still find them attractive? Just in a different way??😀

I’ll see myself out now 🚪 🏃‍♀️ ",bisexual
Want a MMF threesome with my girlfriend and best friend,"I am a bi man and so is my best friend who I'll call Bobby. We've been friends since highschool and have only come out to each other...our attraction to other guys is purely sexual/none romantic. Over the years we've jerked each other off and gave each other blowjob's. 

My girlfriend and I have been dating for almost a year and she's also been really good friends with Bobby for a couple years. I've told her about all my experiences with him and she's totally cool with it and even found it attractive. 

So the girlfriend and I have had a bunch of discussions about threesome's with other women and men. We're excited about the possibility of either, her leaning more towards wanting another girl and me leaning more towards wanting another guy lol. 

I want to have threesome with Bobby and my girlfriend. I'm really attracted to both of them and since we're all really good friends I think it'd be fun. The idea of enjoying and pleasing them both drives me crazy.

We're all comfortable with doing it but this is a really new idea so we'd need to all talk more before we make the leap. I have no experience in this kind of complex relationship so I'd like to hear from anyone who's done this kind of thing. Even just opinions from people outside of this situation would be good to hear. I feel pretty confident but it could just be me being horny lol... Who knows the consequences that could happen after doing this.",bisexual
I love my bf so much,"We’ve been dating for 4 months now 


I love him a lot ❤️


He’s also bi which is cool 



That’s all 😊",bisexual
"My [20F] girlfriend [22F] is so fucking gorgeous, guys. The world needs to know that I’m dating an angel. That’s all.",,bisexual
I have no one else to rant to.,"So most of my friends and select coworkers know. A few weeks ago I told a tight group of my male friends a few weeks ago that I am bi. It was so anticlimactic. Mostly just ""cool dude. Congrats."" or some other flavor of canned response. I expected more reaction. It threw me off. I just wanted someone to ask me questions. I wanted to be wondered about. 

I'm not even really sure how to articulate my feelings. What the hell is wrong with me?
",bisexual
"Hey y'all! This is my first post (: Do the terms ""bicurious"" and/or ""hetero/homo-flexible"" bother you?","I(21 F) am a college student in a very liberal city and everyone in my social circles is pretty open about their sexualities . I am proudly bisexual and I have many bisexual friends (which is absolutely lovely). I also have people in my life who label themselves as ""bicurious"" and ""homoflexible"". I realized that hearing my friends say that really bothered me. I want to respect everyone's identities, it just feels like the are trying so hard to not call themselves bisexual, because they don't want to be bisexual. It feels like they see something wrong with it

I don't ever say anything and I don't hold it against them, but I wish they would just call themselves bi if they are bi. We are invisible enough, we don't need to hide behind other labels.

Idk, it's not that big of a deal, it just grinds my gears. 

Does anyone else feel the same way? ",bisexual
Turned the tables.,"I'm out as Bi in my local pub.

Went in there the other day, and another regular shouted ""Hey, Gaz, do you do gay porn?""

I replied ""What, do you mean performing?""

Hilarity ensued.",bisexual
My exes got married today,"Some back story I (25F) was poly in my previous relationship. The girl who introduced my ex husband and I to poly who we both dated (our unicorn) is now married to an ex boyfriend I dated while poly. I am no longer poly and am in a monogamous relationship with my boyfriend who I was with when I divorced my husband. Sorry for any confusion, I’m trying to explain as best as possible without rambling. 

Basically it’s really weird for me to see two people I dated get married. I don’t even know how common this could be. For separate reasons than my prior relationship with both I don’t approve of the marriage and I’m not sure how to process. I’m not sure if I’m venting or looking for advice but anything would help. ",bisexual
Same-sex Ed.,"(22M) So I came to terms not to long ago with the fact that I'm bi. The thing is I went to a Catholic school for high school. Thus our sex ed program was not the best, as for sex ed on same-sex relationships that was non existent. So now that I've come to terms with being bi I was wondering if there was anything I needed to know in those areas (self care, safe sex, ect) Thanks!",bisexual
My first time making lemon bars did not go to plan,[https://i.imgur.com/UrQE1V5.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/UrQE1V5.jpg),bisexual
"I really want to come out to my mom, but I don't know how and I'm nervous","Lately I've been getting the urge to come out to my mom, but I'm really nervous about it and I don't know how to do it. I don't know what I hope to get out of this post, I guess I just wanted to make it. Any advice is appreciated, and I'll try to answer any questions if you need further explanation or elaboration on something.",bisexual
My favorite pastime,"My favorite pastime is judging people harshly on tinder with my other bi friends



We are helpless singles",bisexual
Is Venom bisexual?,"I finally watched the movie and loved it. I found it funny how I could very much relate to Venom who apparently got a taste for Tom Hardy and Michelle Williams. Let me hear your thoughts. xD
 ",bisexual
DAE feel super separate from THE GAY? I feel like I'm not gay enough.,"I feel like I'm not gay enough. 

That's basically it. I can't be alone in feeling this way. I'm stuck between too straight to be gay and too gay to be straight. 

But I don't wanna be straight. I wanna be gay(ish) lol. 

That's how I feel. Gay(ish). ",bisexual
Chickened out,"Yesterday I had finally psyched myself up to come out to my mom, but when I actually saw there and the moment presented itself I just couldn’t do it. It’s not that I don’t think she’ll be supportive, I know that she loves me and would support me in anything, I just couldn’t do it. Did any of you deal with something like this when you were trying to come out? How can I gain the courage to do it?",bisexual
I’m bisexual. (First time admitting it),"I’ve never told anyone either. 

This is a throw away account, because I’m not comfortable with anyone knowing. I’m 30 m and happily in a relationship with a beautiful girl. I’ve always been sexually attracted to both men and women but I’ve only ever been in straight relationships, never even attempted to be with a man before. But I have to be truthful to myself and I know that I’m going to be with my girlfriend forever because I love her dearly so why do I feel weird about never experiment with men etc? I don’t know I’m rambling. My family life makes it impossible to attempt to come out to them. And I feel like it would cause a rift between me and my girlfriend no matter how supportive she is. ",bisexual
yO yALL rEalIzE wE’rE gOnNa hAve 2 FiRst kIsSes???,,bisexual
This probably applies to a bunch of us here,,bisexual
So I just came out...,"I ended up having a person also from my school come out at the same time (this was over a discord text chat) and he ended up just having mine end up sorta ignored and not realized, is it weird for me to feel a bit annoyed?",bisexual
"Do you ever get sick of explaining to your friends why your sexual identity and the sexual identity of a potential partner matters, particularly in male-female partnerships?",Straight people frustrate me.,bisexual
"TIL Freddie Mercury wasn't gay, he was Bisexual.","I have always thought that Freddie Mercury was Gay because that's what I've always been told. Never really questioned it. Just from being bored and on the internet I came across [this article](https://www.out.com/music/2018/9/05/remembering-freddie-mercurys-bisexuality-his-birthday). 

To save you the time, the erasure of his sexual orientation is due to the exact reasoning you would expect. ""He's just gay and in denial/ has internalized homophobia etc."" Kinda crazy how me, a bi dude and a huge fan of Queen didn't realize Freddie was bi until 2018.",bisexual
My Dad says I'm confused! How should I deal with this?,,bisexual
Went to see the marmozets last night in London and these colours are just beautiful!,,bisexual
Some subtle bi today.,,bisexual
What is happening?,"I’ve(26f) only kissed one girl before, at least 6 years ago and it honestly changed my life. Thinking back, I feel like I’ve... reacted to certain girls in a certain way all my life but never really thought about it before. I always had a weird fixation on certain girls that was a bit jealous and a bit interested in them in a way I can’t explain. When I kissed that girl, I was super super drunk, but I think about it all the time. I loved it so much. It was so different than kissing men. I want to do it again, especially when I’m drunk, but I’ve been too chicken to ever try it with someone else.

I’ve questioned my sexuality ever since then. I notice women so much more now than I ever did. I think I’ve even identified my “type,” which I guess is good to know if the I ever get the chance to get close to a woman again. I liked kissing that girl so much, but I’m not sure if I’d ever want to go further than just kissing? Vaginas are kinda gross, and so are penises. I can deal with a penis, but could I deal with a vag? Who knows. 

Anyway, I guess I’m just looking for support or some sort of help here as to what’s going on...",bisexual
Am I the only one?,"So I've known I was Bi (Whether I accepted it at the time or not) since i had it first defined for me. I've ""experimented"" with other guys since a pretty young age. I never really pursued it though until i found Craigslist sometime after I turned 18. Between that website and porn, I came to realise that, in general, I don't find men attractive. Physical form wise, I completely am in to women. Except when it comes to dick/anal. Both are an extreme turn on. Yet, like I said earlier, men in general are not attractive. So, as the title asks, am I the only one like this?",bisexual
How do you like to be flirted with by members of the same sex?,"It seems like a common theme in this sub is that none of us no how to flirt with the same sex or flirt at all. 

I’m a pretty woman (30, single, bi and poly), so I’m used to guys pursuing me. I have no non sexual flirting skills. I’m socially awkward and introverted/shy unless I am drinking. 

How do you like to be flirted with by members of the same sex? I’m usually of the opinion that I spent two damn hours and countless products today to look this way before going out so I would draw your attention. You should make the first move. But that doesn’t really work with fem women who might have spent the same amount of time keeping up with their looks. 

I also have the tendency to friend zone women because I think they are probably not sexually interested in me. It’s hard to tell if a woman is being flirty with me or just feels comfy being touchy because I’m not a threat. I’ve also met a lot of women who like to make out when drunk but aren’t actually bi or gay. 

Halp. I’ve had plenty sex with women from doing porn and having casual sex but have only had one real Gf and she made that happen. I also have very little luck on OLD getting dates with girls but am inundated with messages from guys. ",bisexual
Happy Halloween,,bisexual
Anyone read My Lesbian Experience with Loneliness?,"It's really relatable to people with anxiety and awkward social skills. The main character is a lesbian with depression, social anxiety and never had sex! I'm asexual so the sex doesn't bother me. 

This is one of my favorite LGBT books and the main character is so damn cute! ",bisexual
Scared of coming out,"So right now I’m pretty sure I’m bisexual and I feel like I should tell my family, but I have this fear that after I come out I just turn out to be straight and that I made a big deal out of nothing, I’m not scared of how they will react, I know they’ll accept for who I am and I am incredibly great full for that. I don’t know if there is any point to this post I guess I just want to see if anyone else has the same problem. ",bisexual
Is coming out relieving?,"[m] realized I was bi about a year ago. It’s hard to bottle it up inside me. For people that have come out, is it relieving? I’m thinking of coming out to one of my friends and that’s it and she definitely won’t care but I still feel like it will change our friendship in some way even though it probably won’t. So basically in your experience, is it worth it?",bisexual
"Just wondering, anyone listen lil peep?","Love him, if anyone cares for Twitter,  Twitter.com/angeleslikela ",bisexual
I genuinely don't see a problem here,,bisexual
I am Bad at Math but I have a Question.,"So i hear often (on this Subreddit) that being Bi doubbles you're Chance of getting a Partner. But I think that is not true. I am Male and Bi btw and I think that there are a lot of Hetero Girls and a lot of Hetero Men's. So I can get into a Realtionship with a lot of Girls but i can get only a few Boys, cause a major of them are Straight.
I now it's Pointless and maybe I missed something but I had to say it. ",bisexual
Halloween 2018,God damn the couple that dressed up as Bonnie and Clyde but reversed had me fucking drooling in my seat thank you for coming to my TED talk,bisexual
Are cuffed pants really a thing?,"Jw cause I’m short and I’ve done that a lot, btw just realized I wouldn’t mind being with a woman and maybe I give off that vibe? Cause everyone kind of, bi women esp. hit on me a lot. ",bisexual
My version of this meme,,bisexual
"I am so unwell, I am mid complete psychological brack down. I need to know it will be okay",,bisexual
How do I meet women who are into other women?,"Hello! I’ve recently acknowledged and accepted that I’m not just bi-curious but bisexual AF. I’ve wanted to meet women and try flirting and everything else for a while now, but I’m rather introverted, don’t have much of a social life, and have some social anxiety. Tips for meeting people (especially women) and getting myself out there?",bisexual
"For the first time in my life, I chose “bisexual” in a form that asked about my orientation. I was anxious at first. But then relieved.",,bisexual
I think letterboxd knows...,,bisexual
Getting my pronouns mixed up,I just recently found out I was bi like three months ago when I started liking this girl. The thing that’s been bothering me is that I catch myself addressing her “he” even in front of her! I feel horrible because what if she thinks I don’t want to date a girl? Honestly I feel so bad because I know I like her but this whole sexuality thing has been confusing to me. Is this normal????? Am I actually straight? Lol,bisexual
Help!,I’m openly Bi but the fact that I might be faking it just to be queer haunts me and doesn’t fail to give me sleepless nights because I’ve only had a real crush on one girl and one guy and neither were serious. When I see a cute girl and I acknowledge her cuteness I can’t help but think “oh my god stop forcing yourself to say and think that you’re lying to yourself” uGHhH,bisexual
"With these two, I don't stay small. 😉",,bisexual
Is this too much?,"Hey guys, this isn’t my first post on this sub reddit. I’m looking for some observations and insight on this situation.

So I’ve been seeing this girl for a little bit. I’ve known her for about a year and a half because we work together, and at one point we were on the same team for a full year so we talked often. Late Aug-early sep i asked her to hang out and we finally did. Since then, we’ve seen movies together, had plenty of dinner dates. Now, she wants to go on a roadtrip vacation, about a 4 hour drive to another state for one weekend. I’m questioning whether or not its a little too soon and too much? We both have expressed we like each other, but we aren’t established. I’m afraid of moving too fast, but we’re both having fun. Am i thinking too hard? What do you guys think?",bisexual
Works out great when you're closeted,,bisexual
Finally Arrived,"So I finally fucked a guy today! He was awesome and we both (afaik) had a great time. Until now I claimed I was ""bicurious"" but it's confirmed - I just love sexy fun as long as it's with consenting adults. Nobody to talk to about it at the moment, I just had to get it out of my system.

Shout out to my amazingly understanding wife! Not that I haven't made sure she has had her fun along the way, this has been quite a journey ;)",bisexual
I've now officially come out to exactly 10 people IRL. I might leave it there for a while. Although I think I'm taking my family to pride tomorrow. Not ready to come out to the greater populous. Worried about losing my besties is that weird?,,bisexual
i can’t help but feel like there’s a word for that...,,bisexual
Is this bi representation?,,bisexual
"We were decorating halloween cookies, but these were the only sprinkles...",,bisexual
The flag of the lemon bar faction of the bi society,,bisexual
Bi culture is getting excited when you think you have a tinder message from a girl but being kinda disappointed when it's from a boy,:/ ,bisexual
"Hummingbird of Arica: Bird native to the north of Chile, in danger of extinction.",,bisexual
How queer do you present?,"Since coming out to some of my close friends and my parents, I've become extremely self-conscious of whether I'm giving off queer vibes. I've definitely become more experimental in my fashion choices, and I feel like even my voice and general mannerisms are getting less straight. At the same time, I'm not sure if I'm actually behaving any differently, or if I'm just more aware of it now. I feel conflicted because I don't want to think that I'm deliberately changing for attention, but I also kind of want to be noticed as not completely straight.

How do you guys present? Are you indistinguishable from a straight guy/girl, or do you go out of your way to appear queer? And how can you even tell if others pick up on it?",bisexual
Anxiety over past hook up,My instructor keeps mentioning this guy that we will be meeting with at the end of the term for our final project and it's a guy I hooked up with in the past. I'm worried what his reaction is going to be when he sees me. I'm not out so I'm worried what the vibe will be like in front of my classmates and if they will pick up on it.,bisexual
Has anyone seen Big Mouth season 2? A character comes out as bi!! (SPOILERS),"I just love this show so much, they got depression, shame, female sexuality and now Jay is bisexual?? AMAZING!!

Admittedly Jay is hypersexual (I mean c'mon he finds out with pillows) and that's a stereotype for being bi, (being more promiscuous not the pillows lol) but hopefully that wasn't intended. Seeing the way the show has dealt with Matthew's storyline I think it'll be okay. 

What are your thoughts??",bisexual
I’m a mostly closeted bi girl and yesterday one of my friends came out to me and said she liked me back and she wants to be something. I can’t even comprehend what’s happening right now.,"I’m 15. Last year about this time, I realized that I’m bi. I planned to keep the secret till I died(which I didn’t really plan on living that long), but I ended up telling my trans pansexual friend a few weeks ago. On the first day of school this year(I’m in grade 11 and I moved schools this year), my friend introduced me to 2 other girls. And I literally fell in love with one of them within the first few hours(I always fall in love really quickly but take forever to fall out lol). But I was sad and just accepted it as another straight girl who would never know or like me back. I have a huge preference for girl and I’ve actually only ever really fallen in love with guys in shows and books(it’s sad, I know).

Sometime after I came out to my friend, I started telling him about this girl, we’ll call her A. We talk a lot and that’s pretty much all I would talk about to him. Then I found her Instagram and I told him and he looked at it and said that she’s bi(because he has a good gaydar). I said that she’s told me she’s straight and he said A can’t be, she’s hiding something. My gaydar also said the same thing but since the world hates me, I still told myself A was straight, she had to be. And even if she actually wasn’t, and was closeted like me, there was no way I would be her type.

Fast forward to Wednesday. I went to school. And A came and when she saw me she grabbed my hand and kind of intertwined our fingers and dragged me upstairs to her locker. She said she needed to ask me something. I was kind of freaking out and I said I knew what she would ask me(I was right). A wrote it on a paper and gave the paper to me and it said something like “are you b”. And I didn’t actually answer. I actually started freaking out, but from that she knew that I had to be. And I was like, oh shit, A’s straight what if she figures out that I like her? She’ll probably leave me. 

But yesterday after school I was at my best friends house and A snap chatted me(we don’t have each other’s numbers), and she said she was in the “closet”, don’t tell anyone. I was in shock and I just said yea, and you don’t have to worry about me. And I think I said I was in the closet too. And A said she kinda had feelings for me. And I said me too. And she said that she wanted to be something and I was like idk maybe. She told me she really wants to be with me. And I told her I’ve never been with anyone before but yea, we could. And then we started talking more. Apparently I’m actually her type and I still don’t know how. I don’t understand how anyone can like me.

I’m kind of scared though. I mean, I’m really happy. But I’m completely new to this. No one has ever liked me before. I’ve never dated anyone in my life. I’ve never even kissed anyone, and I’m sure she’s kissed plenty of people. I know A has. She also says she likes to be pretty physical with who she’s with, and she asked me if I was ok with that. I said I don’t know. It’s scary because I’ve never experienced this before. I don’t know how to act. I’m scared that I’ll be boring or not enough and A won’t want me anymore. If you asked me even on Wednesday if I thought I’d ever date a girl, I’d have said no. I’m still in shock and I can’t really wrap my head around any of this, I never though anyone(any gender), would love me enough to date me. I still don’t think I believe it.

I’m sorry for the long post, I just really needed to get this out.

UPDATE:I’m going to meet her for a bit for the first time since she told me this yesterday. I’m nervous ah.

UPDATE 2:So we met up at the mall and just walked around holding hands and talking for an hour and a half then she had to leave. It was nice:). Thank you guys so much for all the encouragement and advice.",bisexual
Is it possible to find a match?,"I’m 43 y/o, new to being bi but kinky enough to try most things. I want to find a guy or girl who appreciates watching baseball and football. Likes active dates where we go do something fun or exciting. Climb a mountain, go bowling, play laser tag, go for a bike ride, go golfing. Relax after a long day with an adult beverage to bring out our goofy sides. Also, big into 80s music more specifically hair metal bands but most all 80s rocks. That’s my ultimate mate in life",bisexual
"Bi, F. Is being with a guy really that bad?","I should prob make a throwaway for this, but I'm too lazy.
I'm a bi girl who has only ever dated and fallen in love with girls. I know I prefer them and in my ideal future I would marry one. I grew up curious about guys as well and I have made out with them before and I liked it. So I'm not really questioning my sexuality.

I feel like I grew up on tumblr and there were so many ""look how horrible heterosexuality is"" posts. Which is fair, because a lot of straight culture is toxic. I use reddit a lot and lately I've noticed that sentiment really strongly on wlw posts, even to a point where people are being a bit disrespectful and condescending to straight girls, saying i'm glad they take it so we don't all have to etc. Highlighting how guys don't care about women, straight sex sucks, blah blah blah. I feel there is a bias there however, because, y'know, many wlw often prefer girls and aren't attracted to men at all. 

Also right now there are so many horror stories about dating, about relationships with men, all over the internet that flat out terrify me. 

Even my straight friend's stories are kinda disappointing. It doesn't sound like they cuddle a lot or anything like that. It doesn't seem like they get a lot of it their relationships sexually but they still seem happy and I know there's more to a relationship than sex.

Maybe I've been too spoiled in lesbian relationships but I'm also wondering if you can have a dynamic like that in a straight relationship, where you care about each other and you can cuddle or make out without sex and sex doesn't suck or hurt. Most people I talk to are either straight or lesbian  so I guess I'm wondering from people who have seen both sides. ",bisexual
"Monogamous Bi People, how do you manage feeling more gay or more straight in your relationship?","I’ve recently come out to my SO and I’m curious how other monogamous bi people manage feeling more gay or more straight in their relationships, especially if their SO isn’t bi and can’t relate to craving another gender.",bisexual
found an old pic I took in Hawaii and thought you guys might like it :),"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/8abur2ipz6t11.jpg",bisexual
So pink news did an article about me because of a post I made that went viral and they mention this subreddit. Had no idea someone reposted it here,,bisexual
I keep thinking “I’m probably not really gay” but all I do is 24/7 think about having sex with girls.,"I’m a woman if that wasn’t clear in the title. Basically I came out as bi a couple weeks ago and I feel free but weird. My gay friends somehow make me feel like I’m not gay enough since I’m not a lesbian. It got in my head. Plus living 24 years as a “straight woman” since I liked men from the get go has really made me question myself. I liked boys since elementary school but in middle school when puberty hit I only had crushes on women for like 4 years. Now as an adult woman that doubt is still in my head. 

But then I ask myself this question: what do you fantasize about before going to bed? And the answer is the gayest thing ever: starting a big gay family with a girl I’ve been crushing hard on for months. 

Then the cycle repeats and I say to myself: but oh, I like guys.",bisexual
"(27f) newlywed, bisexual and have one foot out of the closet. Husband doesn't like the fact that I also dig chicks. Oh, and another big issue.","We've been together for six years, married for less than one. He's always ""had a feeling"" that I was bisexual, but I wasn't officially kinda-out until the last 7 months or so. 

But he isn't happy about it.

Which really upsets me. Because, I feel that he married me, and he KNEW I was bisexual, even if I hadn't admitted it to even myself at the time. Me talking about my attraction to women, even celebrities, makes him super uncomfortable. He claims that he ""accepts"" it, but it doesn't mean that he likes to or should have to talk about it or acknowledge it. It makes me sad, like I have to hide this part of myself to him. It also makes me feel a great deal of shame because he's the one person who should make me feel...not ashamed? Free to express myself?

&amp;#x200B;

For some weird reason, I did a complete 180 as a person this year - career switch, dietary and weight loss changes, I'm more outgoing and sociable and not to mention also into women - and discovered that he's the only reason why I'm monogamous. I adore him and couldn't see my life without him in it, but if we weren't married I'd be just fine not having monogamy in my life, honestly, if he expressed interested in getting to know others and dating them I'd be pretty okay with it. This is definitely not something that I have not told him, since he's so squicked out by ""competing with women as well as men"" that I know him finding out about my more poly desires would just set off a bomb in our marriage. 

Idk. I feel like I cheated myself for not having these realizations before marriage. 

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
Bi-ish in a gay bar?,"I was considering going out tonight with a gay friend for a drag show in a local bar. In the end, despite feeling like it, I decided against not to do it. One of the main reasons was that I'm not really sure ""who"" I'd be there. 

I'm a woman and I feel bi-ish is probably a reasonably accurate term for my sexual orientation. I've never been too fazed about how I should call myself. I was raised in a liberal family, plus my mother is bi, so it was generally always a non issue. 
I'd go through phases of feeling I'm completely straight, only to later on figure maybe I'm more on a bi side, and so on. 

Up until recently the whole thing hasn't been an issue, but now I feel some pressure to somehow define myself.  
Of course, I know I don't have to if I don't want to, but from my experience people don't react well when they expect to be given a concrete information and instead get a verbal equivalent of a shrug.  

If that girl from the bookstore a couple of months ago asked me out instead of just giving me long looks and smiling, I would have most likely said yes. 
But then I'm definitely much more attracted to men than women, and I don't think I could see myself in a relationship with a woman. I'm also not sure how much of my attraction to women is a real sexual attraction and how much is a result of my flirty and open nature and a very strong dislike for labels.  I've had sex with a woman and it was meh, but so was a lot of my sex with men, so I don't feel it's too telling. Either way, if I am attracted to women, it's a pretty different type of attraction than what I feel towards men. Which I know is completely normal too. 

So back to the problem.  
Should I just say I'm bi and consider it a problem solved? What if I figure out I'm not really that bi after all? I have never said anything to the guys I was planning to go out since the subject never popped up, so it's not strictly gay bar related issue either. My mother always had problems with how many gay people wouldn't accept her, so I'm hesitant to say anything about my sexual orientation not just because of what I read on the Internet. ;) 
Should I maybe go alone once and see what happens? The idea of going out on my own freaks me out a bit. ",bisexual
Can’t we just agree that oppression sucks? Why do we have to make it a competition?,"I was over in a thread in /r/actuallesbians about transphobia, and there were a few comments that were tangentially talking about bisexuality. A bi person and a lesbian were arguing about, essentially, “who had it worse.” The bi person was implying that bisexuals do because they don’t really feel they fit in with heteros or homos, and that gay people have “more privledge” than bi-people (which I don’t agree with entirely.)

Naturally, the lesbian was pissed about this, and said that gays are much more discriminated against, because bisexuals can essentially “pass as straight.” 

Can we just agree that being gay/lesbian and being bi all come with their own unique challenges? Jesus. Why do one of us have to win the miserable oppression olympics? It’s so dumb to me. ",bisexual
Would not wanting to date bi people be biphobic?,"I'm bisexual myself, but I was wondering if it would be considered biphobic or homophobic? I don't think I would say so. Everyone has different dating preferences, and some people might just not want to be with a bi person but not be like ""bi people are only good for threesomes"" ""they're just confused"" and so on and so forth. ",bisexual
how do i come out?,"i’ve been in terms with my bisexuality for about one year now, and i’ve just came out to my friends, and want to come out to my family soon. but being in a family where opinions on the lgbtq community are strangely kept quiet, i don’t know how to.
i want to be more open with it. i even want to start an lgbtq club at my school, but i have to come out first, obviously. any tips on how to overcome the terror and awkwardness of coming out?",bisexual
Bi-candy in movies,Watching Desperado with a client right now and realized that it's perfect bi-candy (don't know if that's a thing but it needs to be!). Young Antonio Banderas? Hot! Salma Hayek? Super hot! Them together in a movie? One happy girl! Anyone have any other faves? ,bisexual
Invited to a gay club,"20f and my friend invited me out to a gay club.  Anyone had any experiences there? I’m in a relationship so it’s not like I’d be hooking up. But for the future, I’m afraid of bi-phobic people or people who’d discredit me for being bi. ",bisexual
"Getting past the internalized stigma of ""ew, that's gay""","I know that I am bisexual. I've come out as such to friends and at least a few family members. But I still find myself somewhat averse to expressing same-sex attraction because I think deep down I still have a dumb straight-guy mentality of going ""ew, no, I'm not gay, that's gay"".  Probably as a result of growing up in the Bible Belt I would imagine. Is this a common thing? I've only come to the realization that I was bisexual about a year ago and I'm not exactly involved in the LGBT community so please let me know. ",bisexual
"Bisexuals are the answer of ""mu"" to a yes or no question.","There's this idea of ""Mu"" in logic systems as an answer that's a rejection of a binary question, or as a way of claiming the question is flawed. It can be even translated as saying ""unask the question"".  This is inherently the Bisexual response to the often presented false dichotomy of herterosexual/homosexual. So when asked ""Are you gay or straight?"" your answer is simply ""mu"".",bisexual
How do you know if someone likes you or is being nice as a friend?,"I like my best friend, but I’m still coming to terms with my bi-ness. I don’t know if she’s being friendly or if she likes me more than a friend.

I’m nervous to ask because idk what she thinks of people who are LGBT. 

She gets a bit visibly “jealous” (more like anxious) when I talk to other people/friends she doesn’t know about. She seemed to be curious if my old crush is a guy or girl (she assumed a girl)).  There are other subtle things but I’m stupid dumb when it comes to cues. 

One time someone put their arms around me and I still wasn’t sure if it was a date.

Help.",bisexual
"My ""artistic"" contribution to the new art studio's chair","They had everyone help paint it at today's grand opening. First picture is what I added to it.

https://imgur.com/a/FrQrKmI",bisexual
bit cheeky but whats your favoute bisexual porn? ideally a dominating fema 25/f :),,bisexual
When you find that chick who loves bi dudes,,bisexual
"Is there a good, safe way to meet other LGBTQ people?","Hey all! I'm a male senior in high school in the middle of nowhere, and I'm the only LGBT guy I know. My school is absolutely tinnnnyyy. And it sucks because a) no community support, just me figuring out my feelings for other guys solo and b) NO GUYS TO HAVE FEELINGS FOR. I love my friends like family, and even though some of them are cute, I could never even picture getting with any of them. They're not gay/bi, so it would just be pain and suffering for everyone involved.

So how do I meet guys I could actually get with? Girls are great and all but I'm definitely feeling like I want to explore a bit. I've heard grindr is sketchy and while I'm a freshly minted 18 year old, I kind of hate the idea of dating apps. How do you guys find other LGBTQ people in your lives?",bisexual
I believe this can easily fit in here,,bisexual
Sexual attraction and objectification,"Been straight my whole life, finally coming to terms with my sexuality and trying to answer some questions instead of feeing insecure. I guess just seeing if anyone can relate here..
I’ve done Tinder (met my ex gf through that) and kinda started using Grindr but haven’t met up with anyone and not sure if I want to. But it’s way easier for me to sort of objectify guys when I’m horny and just see them as a potential dick. I’ve never felt comfortable asking girls for nudes or being disrespectful to them but I can ask a dude for a dick pic with no hesitation. Am I just an asshole? Or does this fall in line with heteroromantic bisexuality, because that’s pretty much how I feel but never really explored those feelings outside of porn. Again, just seeing if anyone can relate at all I guess",bisexual
Need some guidance and love,"I am an 18 year old man and until the last month, I used to think I was straight. I had had a few gay thoughts in the past but thought they were just because of puberty. I don't know why it happened all of a sudden, I started fantasizing about dicks all the fucking time. I had similar thoughts earlier as well, but limited to once in a few months may be. All of my crushes have been girls and I have always imagined spending my life with them. The last month has jeopardised all of that and I have started feeling lonely and depressed. I have contemplated suicide multiple times. I have stopped doing everything. I haven't moved out of my room, have stopped going to the uni and gym. I am basically screwing up my life. I have finals in 20 days but I just can not focus on studies.

I want to stop being depressed. But whenever I see a happy straight couple, I just can't stop thinking about my bisexuality. I don't want to have a relationship with a guy. I am not even attracted to them. Please dont get me wrong. I have always supported homosexual relationships and in fact, have written 3 papers on similar issues. I just can not imagine myself in such a relationship. I dont know why, but I am just attracted to the male sex organ, nothing else. Most people around me are also supportive of homosexuality. It is me who has started questioning everything. 

I understand I have to accept my sexuality, but it is extremely hard because of me thinking I might be straight and this is just a phase. I am still attracted to girls and it is only them who turn my head. 

Also, as to why I think this may be a phase? When I was a kid, an older teen guy used to like me a lot in a very romantic and sexual way. I was traumatised after learning that he was my good friend only because of his latent motives. This incident changed me completely. I became insecure, lost friends because no one would believe me and etc. Also, there is a person close to me who has always undermined me, mostly during the last three years, so much that I have body image issues now. Whenever I see a guy, I start comparing myself with him. Every fucking time, mostly online though. 

I have read quite a lot on internet about lgbt issues. But I have not found anything similar to my situation. I want to be happy. I want to start going to uni and working out. I want to move out of my bed and do something productive. Along all of these, want to stop feeling lonely, depressed and try to understand what is happening to me and why. 

Is there anyone here who has been or currently is in the same situation. How did you move past this and learn to be happy. My family has questioned me daily in the last few weeks as to why I look so depressed. No matter what I do, the loneliness just doesn't go away. I want to share this with someone and cry. 
I can't do that because of fear of attaching a label which may not be true. 

I know it is a big rant. Please do not be harsh. This is the only place where I feel I can express myself. I just really need some kind, helpful and honest words.
",bisexual
My experience at 40,"40f here... made out with a few girls when younger, never felt particularly aroused.  After my recent divorce, I had a threesome, realized I loooooooooved sex with the girl way more than the guy. I've been with a few women since and I've loved it.  So I guess I'm bi..? Maybe this is a common experience, thoughts?",bisexual
"I dunno what’s going on in my room, but I like it.",,bisexual
The bi-dodging in celebs coming out still stings quite a bit.,,bisexual
"Hi, decided I should stop lurking and be a little more active here. So heres my trainers in their bi colour glory, sorry about grime on em.",,bisexual
The joy of being that guy in the middle.,,bisexual
I suppose it’s only appropriate that my eye doctor says I need bifocals now.,,bisexual
When do the “normal” bi people come out,"I’m a pretty average normal guy Im not strange or weird like most of the other gay guys at my school I’m just a guy who happens to also like guys. Where are the rest of the people like me!! Why do I feel nothing for the gay guys at my school ... cause they’re just all sooo very clique and weird and think this world is a film where they’re there edgy in popular kids against the world. 

Like where are the people like me the people I have crushes on one of them one fit normal guy in my entire school must be gay/bi must I can’t be the only one who isn’t in the group of edgy were so extra and different like do you know what I mean. Where’s all the people in my social circle someone has to like guys for my sanity I need someone to put all my guy feelings into !!! I need this lol ",bisexual
"A friendly LGBTQA discord server for anime, gaming, and other hobbies!", [https://discord.gg/NhbJqDY](https://discord.gg/NhbJqDY) This is a new server I just created for everyone in the LGBTQA+ community! We have channels for all your interests even though we are anime and gaming focused. We also have trans specific channels and support/venting channels. We're growing steadily now! ,bisexual
Got her snap... what now,"So I like her and think I may have a shot, got her Snapchat and talked to her a bit irl but now what do I do?? I was considering a ""did you get home alright"" text but I've left it too long (an hour) so I need ideas on how to move forward now. 
It's weird but I feel like I should go about shooting my shot differently because she's a girl. First time talking to the same sex if it wasn't obvious lmao",bisexual
"[update] Libido all but gone. Girlfriend unhappy, but trying to be supportive. Going out of town with my attacker again twice at the end of the month.","[update to this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/bisexual/comments/97kih5/on_a_work_trip_violated_confused_feeling/)

Will be with a larger team whom I trust &amp; not rooming with attacker. 

Stress levels through the roof- no libido, and partner struggling with her own issues. 

Started therapy yesterday. Looking forward to vacations is the only thing keeping me going right now, but I'm feeling like I might break and bolt any moment (edited to not sound so dark).",bisexual
Yep,,bisexual
What do you all think of my idea for a tattoo?,,bisexual
I'm confused about my sexuality,"I'm bi, that's not the issue. Why the fuck am I attracted to Paul Ryan? Gross.",bisexual
Has anyone here read Alfie?,"If you don't know what it is: it is a porn/fantasy comic by the artist InCase  about a halfling girl who discovers her sexuality. I know its main intent is porn,but the story is written quite well and you actually care for the characters. I think it is a great comic for those in the bi community.",bisexual
Coming out as bi has made social life so much more full,"I talk to way more guys than girls. I’m not that good looking but some guys like my looks, whereas most women don’t. Its been far easier to talk to guys than girls. Wish I didn’t wait so long to explore this side of me. Its been awesome so far. 43 y/o",bisexual
NYC Pride 2019,Hey guys and gals! Who is planning on being at NYC pride next year? What events look good? I'm already so excited about it! ,bisexual
Other bi girls ever have trouble being comfortable around other women?,"I have always had an unconscious worry about accidentally making a woman feel uncomfortable. The truth is, deep down I am kind of a nympho, in that I can always imagine myself having sex with someone, or wondering what that random person's O face is, male or female. It's not a constant thing at all, it's not a problem, but sometimes I have trouble turning this 100% off and acting like a regular girl around other girls, straight or otherwise.

I don't know how to touch women in a non-sexual way without stiffening up and feeling like I'm being weird. Other women, especially straight women, have a way of being completely comfortable with physical contact that I just can't mimic. But maybe that's a good thing because I shouldn't touch people if I might take some kind of ulterior pleasure in that? Then again, most of the time, I just appreciate human contact innocently like anyone else. Does anyone else experience this conflict?",bisexual
I’m Pam,,bisexual
looking,Hi everyone new to this any advice 55 male,bisexual
"No I’m not hetero-flexible,",I’m bi-stubborn.,bisexual
Yoooo I ate a girl out for the first time a few nights ago and it rocked,"Ok so I’ve known I was bisexual since I was like 16 but I’ve always only dated guys and finally, a couple nights ago, as a 22 yr old woman, I had sex with another woman and ate her out and idk I just felt so fucking powerful and sensual and awesome. Yay. I’m drunk but this is completely sincere and I LOVE THIS SUBREDDIT ",bisexual
I don’t feel an urge to come out,"(18 M) I’m comfortable with being bi and I’m not insecure, but I just don’t really see the point of it. I was actually outed to a group of my close friends recently, and I’m okay with it. But it started me thinking about this. I know my parents would be ok with me being bisexual, my mum would probably be ecstatic even, but I just don’t feel an urge to come out to them or to the public in general. It’s just easier to not make a big hassle out of it ya’know?",bisexual
Apple logo of their upcoming event is so bi!,,bisexual
came across this on instagram and realised that i’m at least two for each. now i know why people say bisexuals are confused.,,bisexual
My mom found out I subscribe to a gay porn website??,"Storytime....’m a bisexual male age 21....Okay so I payed for Men.com cause I thought it was a trial thing but they ended up charging me annually for 3 months so I literally thought I payed for 1 month and got charged for 3 I canceled it today. It came on the my credit card bill and my mom called ,My mom tonight asked me was it a gay porn website I literally was cringing my ass off if I’m out as bisexual to my mom but my God it was so embarrassing she is like a fucking detective!!!! Anybody have any similar stories?",bisexual
Do I count?,"I'm a guy. I've only been in straight relationships and I only am interested in sexual relationships with women. But I find many guys very cute and attractive and join in on straight female gossip about it. 

I have kissed men and have enjoyed it very much but for whatever reason, I'm not interested in sex with a man. This I feel is common among straight women (to enjoy flirting and kissing women, but not being in a relationship) but it's a trickier subject with men. 

I want to identify openly as bisexual but I feel that not desiring sex with a man precludes me from it. Am I just overthinking it?",bisexual
Bisexual Battle Helmet?,,bisexual
Bi colors near my uni,,bisexual
It's been a year since I came out!,"Kind of hard to believe that year ago today, at the age of 39, I came out as bisexual. I told my therapist first, then my 2 closest friends in an email, and a few hours later my sister. I'm incredibly lucky and thankful that I got nothing but support and acceptance from all of them. Ditto with extended family. 

The one I was most nervous about was my Trump loving father. When I finally got the courage I told him that I had a date that weekend with a woman, and I'm bisexual. His response: I wish I had a date this weekend. Then proceed to spend 45 minutes talking about being lonely and bored. Way to make my coming out about you dad! Ha! 

I've changed in the past year, and more than one person has commented that this is the happiest they've ever seen me. It's all because I'm not weighted down with denying myself the chance to be fully authentic. I'm excited to see what year #2 brings! 💖💜💙",bisexual
How to signal availability to the same sex?,"Hey y'all - 26 year old guy here living in a lgbt-positive metro area, discovered over the past few years that I find some guys very attractive. Very sure of the attraction. However, I've never done anything sexual with a guy, and I'm inherently uncertain about anything I haven't tried. I'm especially hesitant about openly identifying as something I'm not sure about -- I'd hate to advertise ""Hey, I like both girls and guys"", then think ""Never mind"" and have to explain that socially. I'm interested in exploring that, though.

How would I go about (a) signalling to guys (at a party, bar, wherever) that I'm down and (b) navigating early-stage dating when I'm not even sure I'd enjoy sex with a guy (given that I've never really enjoyed hooking up with strangers)?

Regarding (a): I look, and suppose also act, very masculine. Flamboyance and broadcasting my sexuality, homo or hetero, isn't something I ever see myself doing. Phrased more precisely, I want to learn how to passively, non-aggressively broadcast or hint at sexuality.",bisexual
Seeking advice,"I [19F] believe my girlfriend [19F] may propose to me soon. We have been together 2 years &amp; we were best friends for years before. She is recently in the military &amp; I have a career. We are quite mature &amp; seem to be in a further along part of our lives than others our age. She has expressed interest in asking me to marry her, to which I would say yes. I believe some may think we are too young &amp; should wait. I know we will stay together no matter what but marriage would also help our living situation due to the military aspect. My parents married young due to my father being in the military &amp; are still together, so this may make me biased as well! Opinions?

*Asking advice because we are the only gay couple I even know! I would love to marry this woman, I would be so lucky! However, we are still quite young*",bisexual
The rare Cyanide &amp; Happiness wholesome comic,,bisexual
Desiree Akhavan’s *The Bisexual* finally gets my sexuality right,,bisexual
Polyamory For Bisexuals,"Hey beautiful people from the best subreddit :) 

I hope you are doing amazing!  
So i am quite into polyamory (yep,greedy), however the poly subreddit looks a little too straight for a bi-guy, therefore i would like to ask bipolys about their experiences, specially those in MFMF relationships (everybody together).",bisexual
Being over sexualized as a bisexual,"I recently broke up with a guy I had been dating for about one year (he ended up cheating on me with his ex), but the thing that irked me the most was that, in the duration of our relationship he always made the comments about how “great it would be to have a threesome” and how it’s “every guys dream”. Now, I know these are not factually correct and I also know how ignorant his comments come across, but it made me super uncomfortable how he showed a blatant disregard for respecting my sexuality and my preference towards monogamy.

My question is, has anyone had something similar happen? Regardless of gender/non-gender specific or sexuality? 

It made me feel uncomfortable to be compartmentalized like that and I’m wondering if anyone has had a similar issue where someone has tried to push their “conventional” ideas of bisexuality on you? ",bisexual
I have a crush on a friend and don't know what to do.,"She and I (both 18 F and bi) have very similar personalities and, when we do not have something in common, we tend to be opposites of each other (but in a way which complements the other: for example, I'm short and she's tall). She and I are both very affectionate people; we kiss each other on the forehead and cheek quite often and tell each other how much we adore each other, but she and I are both this affectionate with others, too. I don't want to ruin our friendship. Should I tell her I like her? We've only been friends for a few months - we are already this close because we both have extremely affectionate, open personalities. Should I tell her? I have never been in a healthy romantic relationship and don't know how they usually work. ",bisexual
Sitcom Crushes,"So I was watching Murphy Brown with my dad last night, and I think I realized that I’m crushing really hard on Nik Dodani. He only has a small part in the show but omg he is SO cute and he’s gay too so I have a chance

But really, anyone else have crushes from TV?",bisexual
Crush struggles,"So I see the potential for a relationship with most of my friends. Nah like all of them. Some of them, I linger on longer than others, not every possible relationship is great even to imagine, and that's all fine... but so rarely has there been an absolute no for me that I have trouble understanding how or why other people say they absolutely would never date someone because they aren't their type or something (I understand when the relationship would be abusive, I'm more confused for when you are already friends and therefore presumably have qualities that you like about them)

Do you guys have a type? How closely have your actual significant others aligned with that type?",bisexual
Just a thing,"Me and some friends were playing Cards Against Humanity and talking shit to each other and one (who knows I’m bi but doesn’t know that I’m real insecure about it) told me that I wasn’t gay enough to be near her. Obvious joke, and the kinda thing we just say all the time, but it still hit me way harder than it was meant to and I’ve got no one else to talk to about it so I’m gonna just use r/bisexual as a diary to vent I guess :/

QUICK EDIT: told her via text. She apologized and was cool about it. Wouldn’t have done it if not for the advice here, so thanks guys/gals/nb pals!",bisexual
This might be the most messed up situation ever...,"I think I just need to get this off my chest...

I'm a mid-thirties woman married to a man. I have never been with a woman, nor really desired one, and have never doubted my sexuality.

Over the last couple of years, though, I've fallen in love with a woman... who happens to be my boss' boss and is also married to a man. It's true we have become closer to each other than anyone else we work with, and frequently hang out outside of work. But I have no reason to believe she considers me anything than a friend and employee. 

I know I would never cheat on or leave my husband, so WHY am I creating this fantasy? I literally can't get her out of my head...",bisexual
To all the people who think Bi's are greedy...,Why are you so choosy?,bisexual
Such a good film | The leave | LGBT short film,,bisexual
"Married woman, maybe im bi",Maybe I'm just sexually frustrated or maybe I need something more. I have been thinking a lot about other women. I've had limited sex partners and got married youngish. So is craving a female partner more into the norm of things or def more of a bi thing. I would absolutely discuss it w my husband and make sure he's ok with it. But I'm just confused ,bisexual
First time feeling up a man!,Just hooked up with this god damn incredible man. I have yet to have an experience with a dude and it felt so good! Just really happy rn.,bisexual
I finally told a long time friend,"I realized about 3 years ago that I am Bi. And in that time I've only told a handful of people. While I know I will be accepted I just never got over that fear of people seeing me differently and I primarily date men so I ""pass"" as straight so I never felt like I HAD to. 

But seeing bisexual pride on reddit every day, and seeing it more and more in media (Rosa Diaz is my queen) has made me more aware than ever how important my identity is even if I still continue to date men
 
So I finally reached out to a long time friend, one who throughout most of our friendship was the more conservative, religious friend. I knew she wasnt anti-lgbt but I was still terrified. 

And all I got was love. So much love. Which of course made my cry in the middle of the grocery store (I picked a weird time to tell her...) but it just felt good to be honest with her and myself. It changed nothing between us but the weight of keeping it a secret from her was lifted. 

And on a related note: this is why I'm such an advocate for representation in media. All over the place there are stories of how one person in media helped another take that risk (in race and sexuality) and I genuinely believe seeing all yall on my reddit feed every day and seeing more Bi representation in media truly gave me strength to tell more people. I'm not the most out person but I'm proud to be part of this community. ",bisexual
I need some help,"(M, 15 BTW) I've been having just really confused thoughts lately and I just want to let it out to someone. I've always known I like girls, but there's been something at the back of my mind for maybe the past year that I like guys too. I think the more I think about it the more I seem to think its true, but like I don't find guys like, bangable, in the same way I see girls? I mean like the more time passes the more I see guys as cute and stuff and I don't know if it's kind of a thing that develops in you as like when you're just small and you see girls and go eww and kind of grow to like them? But I kind of feel guilty that I don't like guys like I like girls and feel like it must just be something I thought about and so maybe I've just manifested it in my mind I'm just dumb. I don't know, it just feels really bad and it hurts and I need somewhere to vent. Maybe someone has been in a similar situation and can help me out here? Plus I'm kind of worried that if I did come out I would ruin everything. I go to an all boys school and so everyone's a bit homophobic and there's not really anyone in my family who would be very supportive besides my sister. A lot of my relatives are very homophobic. Thanks, gentlehumans. ",bisexual
Bisexual in the church: A source of disruptive conversation,,bisexual
Evolution of the Bisexual,"👉🙂👉

👉🙂🕶️👌

👉😎👌

👉😎👉",bisexual
A collection of (almost entirely) spoiler-free impressions of *The Bisexual* by Desiree Akhavan &amp; Cecilia Frugiuele.,"*The Bisexual* is a drama (with comedic elements) about hip, way-too-cynical-for-their-own-good, Hackneyites (is that the term? — Hackney is a trendy, hip, and expensive-to-live-in London Borough), most of whom happen to be same-sex attracted women.

My time in this part of London is well out of date, but chunks of the show made me miss the city.

Also, if you cringe with involuntary empathy when people on screen do things that you really wish they wouldn’t, you’ll be stopping this show to take breaks pretty regularly. (This is a good thing, BTW.)

The sex scenes are not gratuitous. They are mostly all about the awkwardness of being naked and vulnerable with someone. There’s also proper time given to the silliness that lurks so close to the surface of passion or momentary desire. And the sex scenes always add to our knowledge of story or character. My favourite was a twinned set of scenes involving queefing. The two different coupling pairs in each scene revealed so much about themselves in how they responded to the respective queefs.

The title character — Leila, played by co-writer and director Desiree Akhavan — is regularly insightful on other people’s behalf but almost baffingly ignorant about her own heart. And she doesn’t treat the people in her life with anywhere near as much kindness as they need or deserve.

Which makes sense when you realise how deeply she’s internalised her biphobia. So deeply that you want to reach through the screen and hug her and say it’ll all be OK. Immediately after, of course, you want to smack her around the ears and tell her to stop being such a self-involved little shit.

Watching and hearing Leila not just go along with the noxious biphobia of her lesbian peer group but postively re-inforce it with her own statements about bisexuality not existing or bisexuality being a sign that ‘your genitals have no allegiance’ was not fun to watch. It was all too real, but that only made it even less comfortable to hear.

An [article about the show](https://radiotimes.com/news/tv/2018-10-10/the-bisexual-desiree-akhavan-interview-channel-4/), published in the RadioTimes on 2018-10-10, begins as follows:

&gt; Bedwetter Desiree Akhavan has created a new series for Channel 4
&gt; called *The Bisexual*.
&gt;  
&gt; As introductory lines go, that’s pretty embarrassing, isn’t it? But
&gt; for the acclaimed writer, director and actor, it’s all she could
&gt; think of when she read articles that introduced her as “bisexual”,
&gt; because she found the label so “shameful”.
&gt; 
&gt; “Every time I did anything it was like, ‘Bisexual Iranian-American
&gt; filmmaker.’ ‘Bisexual director.’ ‘Bisexual Lena Dunham,’” said
&gt; Akhavan at a screening of her new show. “Every single time I did
&gt; anything for press my introduction was always like, ‘And she’s
&gt; f\*\*\*ing women and men, too!’…
&gt; 
&gt; “It was deeply embarrassing and I wondered, well it’s technically
&gt; true, I am bisexual – why is it such an embarrassing thing? I think
&gt; if they had said, ‘Lesbian Desiree Akhavan,’ I would have been like,
&gt; ‘F*** yeah.’ But ‘bisexual’? I was like, ‘Euuughh.’”
&gt; 
&gt; This feeling of humiliation was the “thesis statement” of Akhavan’s
&gt; pioneering Channel 4 comedy-drama The Bisexual, in which she
&gt; explores why identifying as such makes her “so uncomfortable”.

That ‘feeling of humilation’ is thoroughly demonstrated in the series. I’m not so sure it’s dealt with, however. I didn’t come away with the sense that Leila had come to terms with her bisexuality.

In her Kinsey-6–centric world, bisexuality was still a bad thing. And Leila was all too aware of that. And in the larger Kinsey-0–centric world she slid into, if only for a little while, her bisexuality was an exoticism that kept being a defining character trait or uncomfortable conversation topic rather than just an unremarkable (albeit important) aspect of self.

Also: watching straight male characters be clueless and occasionally thoughtless (if never ill-intentioned) was both funny and **so** frustrating.

And Gabe’s story-arc — Gabe is Leila’s straight male flatmate — mostly reminded me of why story arcs about straight white men mostly frustrate me. All the elements are there for it to be a story I care about. But Gabe himself is so unaware of himself while simultaneously being so comfortably self-involved that I ended up simultaneously liking him (because he is reflexively kind, even when he’s clueless) and wanting to throw him into the Thames (because his cluelessness is destructive and mostly a consequence of him never having to question whether he is the centre of the universe).

My favourite scene was a tender and funny exchange between Leila and Jon-Criss (played by John Dagleish) in the bathroom of a crappy party they’ve both gone to.

With the both of them perched in the bath (fully-clothed), Jon-Criss almost casually notes that, although he’s never thought of himself as gay, he’s almost certain he fell in love with his (male) History teacher back in secondary shcool.

It’s not presented as a coming-out moment but the relationship that is played out between the two characters from that moment had an awkward charm that I thoroughly loved. It was the only relationship in the show that felt like the bisexuality-informed relationships I’m personally familiar with: relationships where gender and sex matter, because we have these lovely bodies that we want to hold against each other, but they don’t matter in the ways we’ve been taught by either the straight **or** gay narratives we’ve picked up along the way.

I liked the show. A lot. It’s well-made. And thoroughly steeped in a particular place and time (the shadowy lighting of so many shots screamed ‘London’, at least to me). It doesn’t spend a lot of time on them, but the ways that economic class and non-Anglophone culture intersect with people’s experience of not-heteronormative love and desire gives real emotional heft to characters and their choices (including one major character who’s class informs much more of why she does what she does than you realise until quite late in the game).

But I wish the series had a different name. It makes sense within the show’s own construction. Leila is **the bisexual** amongst all these (presumably) monosexual people.

But she’s not representative of all bisexual people, anymore than Will (from *Will and Grace*) is representative of all gay men. She’s not **the** bisexual; she’s **a** bisexual.

And it’s good to have another bisexual character around. Going forward, however, I’d love to see a few characters positively delighted at being bisexual (without also having to be predatory arseholes or ‘edgy’ sensation seekers).

&amp;nbsp;

&amp;nbsp;

&amp;nbsp;


To watch [*The Bisexual*](https://imdb.com/title/tt8050586/)

* in the UK: [ALL 4](https://channel4.com/programmes/the-bisexual)

* in the US: [hulu](https://hulu.com/press/show/the-bisexual/)

* in Australia: [stan](https://stan.com.au/watch/the-bisexual)

* in New Zealand: [sky tv](https://sky.co.nz) (Sorry: can’t find a direct link.)

* in France: [Canal +](https://www.mycanal.fr) (Sorry, again: can’t find a direct link here either.)",bisexual
I'm bisexual and proud- should I come out to my dad?,"Hey everyone! Long time lurker, first time poster here. 

I've pretty much always known I'm bisexual. There was never a defining eureka moment for me, or a doubt in my mind that I was attracted to both men and women. It's simply part of who I am. As such, I never really ever felt the need to come out to anyone. I was nonchalant about my sexuality around friends because, as far as I was concerned, it was a normal aspect of my life. Sure, some people had negative things to say about it but it didn't really bother me unlike the situation I find myself in now. 

My dad isn't particularly conservative, and not at all religious, but his casual dismissal and mocking of other gender identities and sexualities both annoys and saddens me. He's casually homophobic and biphobic, and downright ignorant. He has no idea how the things he says affect me and others who may not be so comfortable with their identities. 

I think I want to properly come out to him and let him know that it's absolutely not okay to be so ignorant. But being as this will be my first time ever officially coming out to someone, I wanted to ask for advice before I went ahead with it. And, if there was anything you wish you could have said when you came out to someone particularly bigoted?",bisexual
"One step forward, two steps back","I have been becoming more and more accepting and comfortable of my bisexuality and, in turn, was nearing a decision to come out to my wife. That was, until this morning.  My wife and I were getting ready for work and she told me she had the ""weirdest dream ever"" about me last night.  Basically, she had a dream she came home from work to find me making out with a college buddy of mine (who, by the way, I would totally make out with... but that's beside the point).  She reiterated how ""weird"" it was.  I just sort of awkwardly laughed and said how random that was, but a part of me wanted to blurt out, ""Well, guess what! I am bisexual, so it's not weird!""

My wife is typically a very accepting person, and I know it's just a stupid dream, but I am just pretty discouraged at this point based on her reaction.  I feel like I am back at square one in my own mind.",bisexual
I’m planning on coming out to my wife Friday after work,"Thats pretty much it. I’ve known for awhile that I was bisexual but this sub clarified some things about myself that I’d assumed were my personal quirks (bi-cycle? Yea, that tore me up for awhile)

So now that I feel I understand myself a little better I’m planning on coming out to my wife. I’m gonna hopefully give her space to be however casual or serious about it she wants to be. I think she might suspect but I’m not banking on that, I hope she can understand why I didn’t tell her sooner. 

But thanks guys, kudos on the confidence boost!
 
Edit: we’re both mid twenties and have been married two years now since I didn’t make that clear

Edit 2: So I told her and it went really perfect. I didn’t manage the confident, ready to comfort and reassure role at all. In fact there was a moment where I physically couldn’t form the words despite actual effort and she just smiled the whole time. I felt a little ridiculous at first for being so nervous but I know very well it could have ended up differently and she reaffirmed our marriage with real grace. 

Her only concern was that I was telling her this because I’d fallen in love with someone else. Once I assured her that that wasn’t the case she was all smiles. She also immediately affirmed that she believed that I was certain about my sexuality and said she believes it’s just who I am, though she didn’t suspect it. I ended by reassuring her that she has the right new feelings and to approach me with anything really, or her best friend if she felt the need. I hope everyone who replied suggesting they were in the same boat can take from my experience, if even only the example that there are understanding men and women out there. Everyone deserves validation, especially from their partners and that’s something I didn’t realize I was holding out for until it was given so freely

So Thank you all so much for your support because without it I may not have taken this step, you guys did me a real service :)
",bisexual
Me when a cute girl walks by,,bisexual
The only reason I’m not a lesbian,"Boys have big sweaters that I, tiny 5’3 girl can wear and be smol and cute and happy. Lol. I love big sweaters. ",bisexual
I’m 70% straight and 30% gay can I still call myself bi?,"I have only ever been with guys but I’m also really into girls i just haven’t built up enough courage to go for it is it still fair to call myself bi? 

Edit: i have just looked over some of the most popular posts on this sub and aparently this is a very common question so guess I’m bi thanks guys! Lol ",bisexual
i’m out!!!!! i’ve never felt better!!!!!,"longtime lurker here but i’m super excited to announce that i came out to my super conservative “religious” parents the other night!!!! it didn’t go too well, but it could have been worse. 

their reactions don’t matter though because i’ve never been so at peace with myself before. i am so happy!!!! 

i couldn’t have done it without the tips &amp; experiences i chatted about in this sub or the support of my amazing friends so thank you all!!!!!!! 





",bisexual
"Confessed to a girl, didn’t receive any response.","So I met this girl, which I am sure is either lesbian or bisexual. I’ve been straight all my life (or so I thought), and at one point I just felt that our ‘friendship’ is kinda different and I had this unexplainable feeling - then I realised I was attracted to her, and I believe she’s flirting too instead of just being friendly or nice.

The fact that I am attracted to a girl disturbed me for a while. Thanks to this community and my best friend, I quickly became comfortable with my newly-discovered identity. 

I didn’t want to let this pass by as there’s a great connection between this girl and I that I have never felt with anyone throughout my life. I am quite a coward when it comes to feelings, but this time round I mustered courage to send a long and thoughtful message to this girl, letting her know how I feel about her to ensure there’s no room of ambiguity from my end.

Usually she’s very responsive to my messages, and seems like someone who cares a lot. So it left me kinda dumbfounded when she didn’t bother to even respond to my message. I know I am not entitled to receive any response and it’s totally up to her, but damn does it hurt. I am not sure if she’s uninterested, not comfortable with her own identity, feeling disgusted, still thinking about it, and etc. But I figured if she’s uninterested, it’d be really easy to just type even a short message to clarify that.

I find that with guys, it’s easier, I will just assume they are not interested because that’s how they function, their signs of interest are quite clear-cut. This time, I learnt that it’s a whole different game when it comes to girls.

I didn’t really get any closure. It’s still a big what if to me. I guess not responding is also a form of response. So although it broke my heart, I have to move on - instead of downward spiralling into that unhealthy emotional state I once experienced before.

However I will always, always wonder what could have happened between us.",bisexual
Question about male to male stuff,"All ya'll here who have sucked dick, what's it like? I'm a dude in a hetero relationship (or is it? We're both bi so I don't know how to classify it) and haven't been with a guy. What's it like? ",bisexual
I kissed a girl for the first time (F18),I kissed a girl last night. It was my first kiss and I am feeling a lot of emotions right now. The kiss was great but it didn’t feel right. I’ve questioned if I’m even bi several times because I know I prefer guys more. We don’t know each other that well and I’m thinking that might be it. I don’t know help meee 😫😫😫.,bisexual
Questioning my sexuality and possibly liking a girl without realizing it,"I've always considered myself to be a PARTIALLY straight female, but lately I've been questioning my sexuality more than ever. I was thinking about it a lot and I think I used to have a crush on some girl a couple of years ago... but I'm still not completely sure. Maybe I'm confusing love with just admiration? I mean, I used to think about her almost everyday and I would imagine scenarios in my head of talking to her for hours on end. Just talking - I would never, ever have sexual fantasies about her and not even kissing, hand-holding or hugging. It was all extremely innocent. I remember always trying to be around her, always wanting to talk to her, always staring at her without realizing I was staring at her and wanting to be like her. I remember hating it when other people would talk to her and seeing her laughing and smiling with them. I especially remember absolutely DESPISING her best friend at the time for no rational reason except that she would take my 'crush' away from me. And to top it off, I vividly remember thinking that she was the most perfect, kind and beautiful human being on earth and that she possessed not a single flaw. So If I did have a crush on this girl, then it's the purest crush I've ever had on anyone before. I've had crushes on a lot of boys in the time I think I used to like her and there's usually sexual attraction plus sexual fantasies involved whenever I've crushed on boys. Does that mean I was solely romantically attracted to her? Could it be that I was subconsciously suppressing the fact that I liked her because I had the mindset of being straight? I have no idea. Was this love? By the way, I felt this way about her for around 2 years. ",bisexual
It’d be cool if this woman was our icon,,bisexual
Shocking,,bisexual
"I came out to my mother, I thought she knew, she didn't.","I (27f) came out to my mother today. It did not go as well as I hoped. I honestly thought she knew or suspected. She did not. Not at all. She was shocked and honestly looked a bit horrified. She did hug me and told me she loved me so that part was good. (And very important) But I can't help but feel hurt and honestly kind of embarrassed and uncomfortable around her now. I suspect my mother is going to be stressed about this now since she will not be able to talk to my father about it (my parents are hardcore catholics, and my father is the definition of bigotry when it comes to homosexuality). I guess I just wanted to talk to someone about this. So thank-you.",bisexual
I had the most bisexual moment ever last night....,"I was watching Hannibal (don’t worry, I won’t post any spoilers) and Richard Armitage was a guest star. 

At one point, he was doing yoga or some shit in just boxers and I hit rewind several times... He looked FIIIIIINE!

Then the lady I have a crush on popped into my head and I had a bit of a brain fart and forgot how to exist because the barrage of beautiful people made me go a bit wonky...

",bisexual
"Curious question for bi girls, how is dating girls in comparison to dating men?","I originally asked this question on a lesbian forum, but was told I'd be better off here, for more than obvious reasons. 

Now for the question(s):
If you happen to have experienced dating both genders, can you tell me an accurate comparison between the two? Can you give examples of the differences you've experienced in terms of emotional support, your overall relationship, behavioural differences, sex and other things that come to mind? Pros and cons to both and which you prefer more and why?

Thanks in advance, ",bisexual
I have a crush on my best friend and don’t know what to do,"So I made a post similar to this a few months ago but I think it’s time for an update. So the story is, me and my best friend are 14 and have been good friends since we were like 5 years old. I didn’t realize I was bi until about a year ago. It wasn’t until the beginning of the year or so that I had a crush on him. Now, it’s more intense then ever. We have almost our classes in school together, he lives right next to me, and we both play soccer. He is dating a girl right now, and I just got over a breakup with someone about 2 weeks ago. We are both horny as fuck and sex is a really open topic between us😂. He might suspect I am bi even though I behave like a normal straight guy does. At sleepovers, we have watched porn together and jacked off under our sleeping bags together to straight porn. He claims he is 100% straight, but has some traits that fit the gay stereotype, such as wearing tight pink clothes, shaves his legs, and into girly movies and music and overall acts a bit feminine. So I was talking to him about maybe jacking odd together again, and he seems like he would like to do it, but kinda doesn’t understand the point and wants to do it alone. He said maybe he will. So the other night, we legit talked about sex for 5 hours straight on text. All of it was completely straight, and we just made up sex stories and stuff and we were both saying how hard and horny we were. I really wanna jack off with him and maybe jack him off or something, but I don’t want to pressure him into doing something he doesn’t want to and make him feel uncomfortable. He said he would never touch another guys dick though. Just so you know, I want nothing more then a blowjob or handjob. No anal sex, we are way too young and there’s too many risks and I just don’t want to do it and he definitely doesn’t either.",bisexual
I feel like I can't come out IRL. Can I come out here?,"So... I think I'm bisexual. But I'm happily married in a monogamous, heterosexual relationship. The thing is, I never really explored my sexuality at all because I didn't want to consider whether or not a same sex relationship would be a ""sin"" (I'm a practicing Christian). It was so much more convenient to pursue hetero relationships, since the desire was definitely there. I was shocked and confused to learn, after talking to both straight and gay friends, that being gay was not a choice, as I had experienced. 


Fast forward a few years and I'm married to a wonderful man who I'm positive is my soulmate. But sometimes I just want to know what it would be like to be with a girl. I feel so ashamed to admit that, because it feels disloyal to my husband. I feel like I shouldn't be having these thoughts about anyone else, regardless of gender. I have a few bisexual friends, and I'm dying to discuss their experiences in identifying their sexuality with them, but I'm too embarrassed, and even that makes me feel like I'm somehow being unfaithful... 


I guess I just feel like I need someone else to know. I feel like I'm ""acting"" like the straight friend, like that's not honest to who I am. But that's all I know how to be... and all I need to be, since I'm married to a man. If you read this, thanks for listening. I feel like I needed another person to know how I felt, since I can't go to anyone irl to talk about this. If anyone has any questions, I'd be happy to talk more about this. It's kinda therapeutic typing everything out.
",bisexual
"Recently Came Out, now having Intimacy Issues","F34 came out last week to my husband of 10 years. He's been very accepting and supportive so far, but our bedroom activities are suffering. I know this is all very new stuff for us both, but the 2 times we've been intimate since I came out I haven't been able to really get there. He's been game, it's just me, which previously hasn't been a problem. 

Recently I've been way more attracted to the female form and was trying to encourage him to try something new (to be fair not new, just that he isn't good at it and I was trying to give feedback on how to be better) that felt more like same sex, not hetero sex to me. He's very resistant to that... I haven't been able to finish and he has been trying to wait for me, so when I can't he just won't. 

He's acting like it's not too big a deal, but it's been stressing me out. I want our marriage to work, I love him. I'm beginning to wonder if I'm just interested in him romantically now, not physically? As of a month ago this wasn't the case. Maybe it's all just so new to me, hot women are all I can think about.

I know this is early into the process, but still it's scary. 

Anyone have any experience here? What works? What doesn't? I don't want to push him, patience seems to be the goal here, but I'd love some input.",bisexual
Overcoming self doubt?,"I'm almost entirely certain i'm bi. I've liked women since as long as I can remember and only have had strong romantic interest in women always. My attraction to men is quite random and I can often go for several weeks without being attracted to any men then just like that i'll see a dude that I want to bang.

However i'm constantly doubting myself, and having this thought ""that what if im gay and in denial"" and then ""what if im straight and in denial"".

How do I overcome these doubts?",bisexual
"Gay bars, have you been to one, and did you like it?","I personally... not so much, and mostly because of the first impressions. So I was in my first year of uni, far away from parents, independent life and all that. So I decided to try and explore my gender so that everything'd be less confusing (still now lol, what am I doing with my life). I googled for nearby gay bars and went to the one farthest away from my dorm in case I met someone I know, and... well, it was pretty horrible, haunting even. The music was so loud that it was borderline earrape, and the whole buildings was filled with intense perfumes, smokes and well, other smells. And the people, they were... uh, overwhelming. I'm not judging, but I don't think walking around in thongs when you are over 280lbs and have hairs ALL over your body would be a great sight for anyone.
For the whole night, I just wasted my time at the bar on the cheapest beers I could buy with my measly allowances and wondering why I was there.",bisexual
Am I bi enough yet?,,bisexual
"So I’m a 40+ male and came out a few years ago. I’m more of a 2-2.5 in the Kinsey Scale, but every now and then I get super cock hungry. Like now. Is this normal to have phases of intense desire like this?",,bisexual
"At work, I’ve found life is easier if I claim to be 100% lesbian. Is this working against what the Bi community?","Being openly Bi since I was 13 (36 now) I’ve experienced my fair share of bias from all sides. We all know the common misconceptions from the straight and queer communities about not picking a side, or being unable to fully commit. I’ve dealt with that in stride and have prided myself on not shying away from my sexuality and being a decent representation of a proud Bi person. 

But at work it’s different. These are people I have to deal with on a daily basis, and are included in my daily life. Working in the bar and restaurant industry in particular, but also others, I’ve found it’s easier all around if I claim to be a lesbian. I don’t get hit on or harassed, and my relationship is taken more seriously. My long time partner and I are both fem, we’re both Bi, and without sounding conceded we’re both considered attractive. When I’ve been honest  about our sexuality the jokes never stop, the hinting of male coworkers or customers that they want to “join us”, or that they can make us straight are never ending. Though when I claim to be a lesbian they don’t even try and for the most part they keep their comments to themselves. 

My question is: am I hurting the cause the Bi community has gained any ground on over the last 20 years, or am I being smart in avoiding the misogynistic tendencies that our society hasn’t overcome yet? ",bisexual
You can text the Crisis Hotline - FYI,,bisexual
Hello,"I've been lurking on this sub for a while and greatly enjoyed reading other people's stories. I love the friendly and accepting nature of this sub and am super grateful to it because it gave me the courage to come out to myself. I thought that I might share my own story. So here goes I guess. 

I grew up pretty much assuming that I was straight. When I was around 15 I started to notice I was attracted to not quite straight stuff. But I just passed it off as nothing and for a while assumed that that was a normal thing for every person. I went back and forth on my feelings about my interests. I even tried conditioning myself to only be attracted to women. I struggled with the thought that I was gay and that scared me a lot at the time because I didn't want to be. This conflict went on for a while until the summer before I left for college. Around this time my best friend came out as bi on social media. This kinda shocked me but it did get me thinking about my own attractions in relation to bisexuality. The more I thought about it the more I realized that I would be open to relationships with men. However, I thought that I couldn't be bi because I didn't have a 50/50 attraction. I struggled with it for a while and one night after talking with said friend I searched for this sub on a whim. After reading the affirmation post I broke down and accepted it. I told my friend. It was a very cathartic experience and it almost didn't feel real. I still struggle with my feelings (as I see a lot of people do) but I think my inherent biphobia is fading. 

I still haven't came out to my family yet and it worries me. I was raised catholic but my family has always been fairly open and I have been surrounded by the lgbt community for all of my life. My biggest worry is that they will say that it is just a phase because I happen to go to an all guys school. Any advice with this is appreciated. 

Thanks again to this sub for being awesome and giving me courage!",bisexual
Still virgin,I am 26 still virgin don't know what I want yet ,bisexual
An amazing picture of unstirred paint,,bisexual
I (17F) need advice regarding a girl,"Hello, I’ve been meaning to ask y’all for some advice regarding someone I’ve seen at college. So she’s studying the same UG course as me but she’s a couple years older and will be graduating next year. Her sense of style and her haircut (!!) make me want to believe that she’s queer. If that doesn’t do it, I’ve always seen her hanging out with another girl and they’re pretty touchy and intimate in general. I have a hard time approaching people and starting a conversation on my own. Keeping this in mind, do you guys think I should approach her and initiate conversation because I’m running out of time since she has only one semester left? ",bisexual
When someone asks me if im gay or straight.,,bisexual
All bisexual reality dating show,"Maybe this is old news but I just saw an advert for an ""E!"" reality dating show called ""The Bi Life"" and though reality dating shows are not my thing and I rolled my eyes at all the love island hype with everyone else.. you know I am absolutely going to get watching this asap 😂",bisexual
"Even with health insurance, lesbian, gay and bisexual adults are more likely to delay medical care","[Lesbian, gay and bisexual adults](http://www.bisexualthreesome.org/) in California have rates of health insurance coverage on par with or better than that of straight men and women in the state, but they are more likely to wait to see the doctor when they need medical care, according to a new policy brief by the UCLA Center for Health Policy Research.

&amp;#x200B;

Why the delay? According to Susan Babey, a co-author of the study, one reason cited in other research is that sexual minorities sometimes experience discrimination when they seek health care.

&amp;#x200B;

""Sexual minorities who have had a bad experience with a medical provider because of their sexual orientation may try to avoid repeating it,"" said Babey, who is also co-director of the Chronic Disease Program at the center.

&amp;#x200B;

The UCLA study looks at differences in access to care, behaviors that negatively affect health (such as smoking or not exercising) and health problems that can result from those behaviors (such as developing hypertension or being overweight), based on people's sexual orientation. The findings show that 24 percent of [bisexual men](http://www.bisexualthreesome.org/) and 22 percent of straight men say they do not have a doctor they regularly see, compared with only 13 percent of gay men; but 20 percent of gay men and 21 percent of bisexual men delayed seeking health care in the past year, compared with 13 percent of straight men.

&amp;#x200B;

Thirteen percent of straight women and 15 percent of lesbians reported that they do not have a doctor they regularly see, while a higher percentage of [bisexual women](http://www.bisexualthreesome.org/), 22 percent, said they do not have one. However, 29 percent of lesbians and bisexual women said they delayed seeking medical care in the past year compared with just 18 percent of straight women.

&amp;#x200B;

The study uses data from the combined 2011 to 2014 California Health Interview Survey. (Data on transgender people is not included because the survey only began collecting transgender data in 2015-16.) More than 1 million California adults, 4.5 percent of the state's adult population, identify as lesbian, gay, homosexual or [bisexual](http://www.bisexualthreesome.org/), according to the survey.

&amp;#x200B;

Other key findings from the research:

&amp;#x200B;

Bisexuals have the worst overall access to a doctor they see on a regular basis and high rates of unhealthy behaviors. Among lesbian/gay, bisexual and straight adults, bisexual men and women are the least likely to have a regular source of care, are most likely to delay care and are mostly likely to seek care in an emergency room. Bisexual men have higher rates of unhealthy behaviors in four of the five categories analyzed in the study. Among women, bisexuals in the study have higher rates of smoking and binge drinking, and are more likely to eat fast food two or more times a week.

Gay men report better overall health and fewer behaviors that lead to obesity and hypertension than straight men. Sixty-one percent of gay men said they considered themselves to be in excellent or very good health, compared to 52 percent of straight men and 44 percent of bisexual men. Gay men are less likely to drink sugary beverages daily and were less likely to binge drink than straight and bisexual men. Twenty-seven percent of straight men in the study were obese, compared with 21 percent of gay men and 20 percent of bisexual men.

Straight women have the best access to a doctor they see on a regular basis, overall health and the lowest rates of unhealthy behaviors. Half of straight women said they were in excellent or very good health, versus 44 percent of lesbians and 45 percent of bisexual women. Twenty-seven percent said they had engaged in binge drinking within the previous year, compared to 50 percent of bisexual women. Ten percent of straight women were smokers, compared with 23 percent of bisexual and lesbian women. Lesbians had the highest rate of obesity, 35 percent, compared with 26 percent of bisexual women and 24 percent of straight women.

""Our study shows bisexuals have among the greatest need for regular health care, but are the least likely to get it,"" said Joelle Wolstein, a research scientist at the center and the study's lead author. ""Even if they have a high-quality insurance plan through an employer, health equity is far from a reality for many LGBTQ patients.""",bisexual
I don't mind telling anyone that I'm bi... Except for my parents.,"I'm a 20yo male who grew up in a religious community with religious parents. I'm still living with my parents, and they're still supporting me.

Ever since I was 8-10yo I knew I looked at guys differently from my friends, but I didn't understand those feelings. I repressed it so much that even now I kinda hate myself when I think about men. 

I've told a few people that I'm bisexual, and I really don't mind telling anyone that. Even the people that I train with at the gym. That has always been my biggest challenge, because the gym is where I distract myself from my problems. 

However, a few days ago I realized that there's is 99% chance that nothing bad would happen if I would come out to my friends at the gym. And if I can tell those people that I'm bisexual I can tell absolutely anyone.

(I'm not planning on coming out to them, however. I don't see a positive ending with that. If there is a 100% chance that nothing positive is going to come out of it, and a 1% chance of something negative I'd rather just stay in the closet to them.) 

Except for my parents. My parents are religious nuts. My mom thinks that gay people are awful, cursed, and will make everything and everyone around them gay. I am very sure my dad thinks the same even though he has never said anything directly. 

If they find out that I'm bisexual there is a huge chance that they will kick me out of the house, disown me, and never talk to me again. That's my biggest fear in life now. 

If y'all have got any advice on how to approach this I would love to hear it. 

Thank you, r/bisexual, Brooklyn 99, irl friends who I've come out to, and anyone who has been and/or will be supportive of me! ",bisexual
Bi Wallpaper,"Hey everyone,

Closeted bi here :) anyways, recently I've been pretty into subtle ways to show off my sexuality, and I decided to photoshop one of the default iPhone wallpapers to be the bi flag! I really like it so I figured I'd share it so anyone else on this subreddit can use it too — here is the [original](https://imgur.com/a/LvP1OC2) version. Let me know what you all think in the comments!

&amp;#x200B;

EDIT: Uploading the edited image to imgur seemed to degrade the quality, so I've attached the image to this post.

https://i.redd.it/q6zkuhqnfvs11.png",bisexual
Bisexual escapism. I keep thinking about women when relationships with men go south and vice versa.,"So this is my situation right now! Won't go into it but currently my partner (a man) and I have an unresolved conflict. It's really bad, and has recurred a couple of times. But I'm not here to ask for advice on this, I can handle this situation.  


What fascinates me is that I seem to follow a pattern. I can be really into a dude and spend lots of time with him. But when conflicts start to arise, my mind automatically shifts to women. I daydream about fantasy girlfriends, previous girlfriends, my sexual and romantic thoughts will be very gay. When things get better the gay thoughts are still there of course, but not in the same intensity. I've had two boyfriends before my current one, and when those relationship started to crumble I started thinking about girls, and after the relationships ended I exclusively dated girls for months.  


After the first time it happened, I thought I was gay and that my obsession was because I wanted to actually be with a woman. But I did get attracted to a few guys afterwards. So that's not it. I now think it's some form of bisexual escapism. When I dated women, and I got really nervous about them possibly rejecting me, I start thinking about the possibility of dating men to make myself feel less nervous and distance myself from the situation for a bit.  


Because when things do go south, I can focus on a inherently different aspect of my attraction that does not remind me of my (ex-)partner/date.   


Not sure where I am going with this, just wanted to share something that is very bi(TM).",bisexual
Sometimes I think I’m just gay,"I lean heavily towards guys more I like women of course idk I feel like I’m lying to myself that I’m really gay and not bi.


I am bi, I like men and women it’s just i don’t know how to explain it.",bisexual
A show that forces bisexuals to chose. Quel horreur! (But also really hot!),,bisexual
Best place for NSA fun,"What are the places you have found to be the best for finding no strings attached sexual experiences?

Was there somewhere you thought be totally vanilla, but ended up having a surprisingly good time?

Are there go-to places that you know you will find fun in?

I always find porn cinemas are places where gay/Bi men go to play. ",bisexual
Came all the way out tonight!,"I’ve told a few people over the past year or so but going on a date with another guy for the first time gave me a good reason to tell my parents! My sister is bi and has come out to them so it’s not anything new to them, but I’m just relieved. 

Sorry I know this probably gets posted pretty frequently I’m just glad it’s over ",bisexual
The r/bisexual Group Description is great!,"Primarily, I utilize reddit on my mobile device, so group descriptions and such are not often visible. However, upon reading the description we have on here I wanted to give an expression of gratitude for the inclusive and beautiful community and people that wrote this and continue to help that inclusivity and positivity thrive

&gt;This group is for discussion and support for those who fall in between, for the ""shades of gray"" in what is often assumed to be one or the other: \* bisexuals \* pansexuals \* omnisexuals \* queers \* non-straight individuals ... or anyone who doesn't quite fit the otherwise binary ""straight"" and ""gay"" pattern. If you can't work out if you're straight, gay, or anywhere in between... you should probably visit us.

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
When your BiFi is tuned properly,,bisexual
Spirit Day,"A lot of you probably know tomorrow is Spirit Day! For those who don’t, Spirit Day is a day to raise awareness of the bullying against LGBTQ+ people. Anyways, I was chosen by my homeroom teacher and the leader of our school’s social activists club to run the event! This is the firsts time my school has celebrated any LGBTQ+ related event (to my knowledge) so it’s really exciting!We’re teaching kids about multiple types of bullying over the course of the next six weeks, but tomorrow is just going to be homophobia. (The last lesson will be on gender identity and expression.) Part of the lesson will explain the harm of using “gay” or homophobic slurs as an insult which is really important because that is way too common at my school. Anyways, I just thought you guys might be interested in this!",bisexual
"Any Bi, occult loving, artsy people in this thread?","I’m bi, I love watching supernatural and witch shows and I love to paint.   I’d love to chat with someone on here who has similar interests.  Or just say hey. ",bisexual
Came out in person for the first time!,,bisexual
When did y'all figure out you were bi?,I knew when I was 13 and I really wanted to marry solid snake but I didn't come to terms with it till I was 18 and mentioned I would let teddy Roosevelt raw me and that's when everything kinda clicked.,bisexual
Asking for book recommendations,"Hi everyone. I was wondering if anyone in the community had any book recommendations about bisexuality? I'm looking for anything from nonfiction memoirs to fictional accounts. Something with themes of questioning, self-reflection, or anything you feel like you really connected to emotionally or gave you an interesting perspective, as the reader. Thank you so much!",bisexual
Safe Sex (oral question),"Hello everyone!
They didn't really cover safe sex with other women back in school and I was wondering whether you use dental dams?? Or just like, in general what are the safe practices for wlw and do the sex thing together. ",bisexual
Anyone here have a good bisexual Coming Out meme I can use to come out to my friends at school?,Feel like it would be the best way to tell them I’m bisexual ,bisexual
HELP! Newly Bi and scared to be with women,"Hey reddit fam! Just for knowledge I’m 25F

I have always dated men, but the idea of being with a woman has always been in the back of my mind. 

I just recently broke up with my ex-boyfriend and have started dating women (about 6 months now). This is my first real experience being with women and I’ve been on a few dates with some really great people! But, when it comes down to having confidence in the bedroom I get weird, awkward and question if I’m really Bi. 

With men I’m totally comfortable in the bedroom and confident but with women I get shy. 

Currently, Kind of upset because one girl who I was super into just told me “you’re great, but I just don’t think it is working with us sexually”... she’s not wrong but how do I get over this hurdle?

Am I really bi? Am I just interested in women mentally but not physically? ",bisexual
When you like 99.999% of girls and 0.0001% of guys and even then only sexually and even then certain experiences have severely put you off guys (mild irrational androphobia) but still feel like you're lieing if you say you're a lesbian,,bisexual
Do you think the term homoflexible/heteroflexible is bierasure?,,bisexual
I can't tell if I'm jealous of other girls or if I like them- is this a thing,"I'm a girl, who identifies as straight as of my whole life, and I'm 18 so that's pretty old to discover a new thing about my sexuality. But I have been realizing lately that I always stare at girls' bodies but never boys' bodies? I also stare at girls in general, like their faces. 

I have low self esteem and a bad comparing habit, with my body and looks in general vs. other girls. I also compare my personality, talents, smartness, everything- basically always had this thing where I would get really jealous of a girl in my class who seemed to ""have it all."" The girl would change sometimes, like one year I would wish I was Mary and then the next year Katie and so on. 

The thing is, in my mind I always equated it to me being jealous, and also, boys. I thought these girls were smart and pretty and kind and so they were my competition and all of the boys would like them instead of me. The thing that sticks out to me about this, though, is that I would always think ""how would any boy like me if *she* exists?"" I would stare at these girls and admire how beautiful they are, while at the same time wishing I was them and looked like them so that boys would like me.

I'm talking about this in the past but it still happens now. And I'm starting to wonder if this isn't jealousy but actual crushes on girls? The thing is though, it feels different than the crushes I've had on boys, which make my heart pound and make me nervous and stuff. I mean, I've only had a few crushes (and they were only boys) but each crush was super passionate and like ruined my life for months they didn't like me back. With girls its just like I can't take my eyes off of them. 

I can't really see myself in a relationship with a girl. I would much rather date a boy and the thought of me with a girl seems really awkward. But also, maybe this is because for 18 years I thought I was straight? I mean, picturing girls in underwear is a lot more attractive to me than boys. Picturing a boy naked kind of freaks me be honest. But don't girls just have nicer bodies? Like fuller and curvy and more put together or ""whole?"" it's a weird way to describe it but boys bodies sometimes seem awkward and pieced together? Idk.

One more thing- I've never had a boyfriend and I'm a virgin. And I think I'm thinking about this so much because thinking about guys and sex with them doesn't arouse me at all and I'm worried that I won't get turned on by a guy when I'm having sex and then I'll realize that I'm actually a lesbian and I'll have to break up with my boyfriend and everything.

Sorry this was long and weird. I don't really know if I even belong in this sub being that I'm most likely not bi (?) but I wanted to ask you guys if you ever confused being jealous of a person/staring at them with crushing on a person. Thanks so much!

TLDR: I am a girl who always stares at pretty girls and admires them and I often get jealous and wish I was as pretty and smart as them and I'm wondering if I have been having girl crushes this whole time and not realizing it. So I want to know if anyone ever has had similar experiences. 

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
When someone asks me how I’ve been since I came out as Bi...,,bisexual
Does anybody else wonder why bi women in TV have be edgy and 'badass'? I find it really hard to relate to them :/,"Brooklyn Nine Nine- Rosa Diaz
Riverdale- Toni
The O.C.- Alex Kelly
House- Thirteen

Just to name a few",bisexual
"Are we living in a Hologram? OK, this shirt won't tell you one way or the other, but I've been hearing scientists say that we are. Like we're in the matrix. What do YOU think?",,bisexual
Differences between dating a man v a woman?,"Long time lurker, first time poster here, so uh, I (21m) have done a little dating with women, years ago, but not proper adult dating, and this evening I have a kind of date with this guy I met at a nightclub, and have chatted with ever since, and I don't really know how to date as a proper adult, but more importantly with another guy.. Is there anything I ought to know, or are the fundamentals pretty much the same? (Sorry if this is a dumb/offensive question but I really don't want to screw this up as I fancy him quite a bit.) ",bisexual
I think you might need some queer wizards in space honey !!!,,bisexual
Rant about Bi-Cycle and Society,"So I (20 F) am in a loving relationship with my boyfriend. And everything is great. What screws me up though is society telling girls they have to be pretty and put together practically 24/7. Meaning that while walking around campus, I can find an occasional cute guy but like 80% of the girls are hot! Accepting my bisexuality is something new for me, but it drives me crazy when it’s like almost any girl you see will be cute. And it doesn’t help that the bi cycle starts flipping while your dating someone for over a year. 

Just a rant. ",bisexual
Just a little thing that made me happy today,"Hey r/bisexual, I'm just coming with more of a filler post today, but I just want to talk about it because it made me so happy and I can't stop thinking about it.

So I had band class at the end of the day, and since we had a concert tonight (it went well btw) we practiced our songs in the auditorium. Also because of the concert, so we wouldn't waste our lips for playing tonight, we got to have the last 30 minutes of band for study hall, and we got to have it in the auditorium. After we were done playing and we were packed up, I was going with my friends to find a seat. I was gonna sit with my guy crush and another friend, and so I was following the other friend and the guy crush was walking behind me. The other friend turned down a row of seats, and I followed him, but my guy crush didn't follow me, he had stopped in the aisle and was looking back. I decided, so I wouldn't seem weird, that I would just sit with my other friend and not sit by my guy crush. I was a little sad about this, but again, I didn't want to seem weird, so I decided I had to do it. But when I tried to follow my other friend, he told me to stop following him because he wanted to work alone, so I turned around and my guy crush was still waiting. I followed him up the aisle to the top row and sat by him, with none of our close friends sitting nearby to talk to. So I got to spend over 15 minutes sitting next to my guy crush without any of our close friends around, and it was amazing. I love every moment I get to spend alone with him (even though there were tons of other people in the auditorium, I consider alone to be without any close friends), and this time was no different. I still get a little apprehension and tightness in my chest just thinking about it.

Anyways, that was just my short little happy story that happened today. I know, as I said before, that this post is kinda filler, but I just wanted to share it because it makes me so happy.",bisexual
We don’t need gatekeepers; we do that on our own,,bisexual
"Here’s my song “II.I.X” aka second first kiss. So in this song, i depict the feeling of euphoria one can have after their First gay kiss 😘 if you like this snippet, check out my Bi-Fi mixtape on SoundCloud! All you gotta so is search: Yellow Eyes Bi-Fi 💖💜💙",,bisexual
I don’t know who I am anymore,"I am 15M. When I was growing up, I dated several girls, (elementary school stuff, doesn’t count in my book). I had always thought I would grow up and get married to a woman, but in 9th grade that changed. 

I had known of this guy for a while, but never actually talked to him. We went to different middle schools, but went to the same high school, and had two or three classes together. And then, it happened. Without realizing it, I fell for him and despite him being incredibly straight (he played lacrosse for God’s sake), still couldn’t help but gush over him. However, I still denied/deny being bisexual or gay, and I’m not sure why. Something about it feels off but I think that’s because it’s not what we’re conditioned to think of as “normal.” And believe me, I’ve had my fair share of girl crushes too, but this one seemed more intense. I still talk to him but I know I have no shot (mostly because he hangs out with fuckboys who would bully me if they found out. Help?? Am I bisexual for having a crush on him? Why am I feeling weird? Is it puberty? s.O.s!

Thanks for reading this, and I hope you have a wonderful day. ",bisexual
Advice about how to forgive biphobic people from my past (that I probably will have to see again soon),,bisexual
Close Family Came Out; Vent,"Recently my partner came out as Bi, which kind of hurt a little but I love him so it doesn’t mattter to me at all. Even a few days prior my little brother who is 16 going on 17 came out to the family he is bisexual which I still love him and glad my family is accepting. Its crazy in short amount of time closest people in my life came out but at the same time I feel more open and close to them. None the less I am a lady,22 yrs old, and I have a weird attraction to feminine women and breasts, but not vaginas, so basically I like boobs and dick lol. Either way I feel more open now about that cause I always thought it was just passing thoughts, well not really, I see it now. Anyways thanks guys! ",bisexual
"So, I’m older, late 50s, and never really considered myself to be “bi”. But lately I get really turned on to suck a cock. However, not attracted to a man. Thats actually a turn off. I just want to suck a cock. Not really sure where to go with that, or how to make it happen.Any advice?",,bisexual
"I've been doing a bunch better, but some doubt still remains, on both sides.","At this point I've somewhat accepted that I'm bi, on some level. I just haven't worked out the specifics of it yet, like my bi-cycle, if I have one, where exactly I am on the spectrum, what my male type is, if I have one, etc. 

Just, have some questions for myself, like why did this all appear now? Honestly, I've realized that I have been and may still be pressuring myself to be bi because my primary friend group is bi, but then again that serves as the catalyst to my questioning. And just because it only appears now doesn't mean it's false. If I do feel it in the first place. Which I probably do.

I've found guys to be cute (at least I think I have) but right now I feel very little attraction to guys, if any. Is it the bi-cycle? It doesn't feel like it. It feels too quick and even when I could be considered to be attracted to guys, I would still feel pretty apathetic towards most guys I see. Maybe I just have a really specific type of guy I'm attracted to, if at all.

One example is a guy I saw in the hallway of my school yesterday. He was tall, looked kinda dorky, had blonde short hair, etc. My first reaction to seeing him was *cute*, but somehow I don't know if I actually liked him, or if the feeling was legitimate. I'm suspecting I'm scared that I see a guy once, say they're cute, and never feel that way again. But I did notice that it wasn't like *forced* from me, it was natural, like it just popped up without me having to really think about it. Don't know why that in specific, there's probably more I'm not seeing. 

Same day, saw a picture of some guy that was pretty good looking, but I don't know what context I saw him in. 

It's less of a question of *do I like guys* and more of a question *do I like them enough* or *how much do i like them* although it could turn into the former at sometime. Like right now, I feel minimal attraction to guys.

Even with my previous boyfriend I had over the internet, I'm worried that I liked the relationship more then the person themselves. But at least I'm doing better, not constantly stressing out over this stuff.",bisexual
Idk what to think,Today out of the blue i started to have a crush on a guy and this is just so different ive never liked a guy before ive always liked girls. I just don't know what to think about this I get that at the age im at I am starting to learn about myslef but yesterday I knew i was straight now I dont know,bisexual
"How can you tell what kind of vibe you give off, sexuality wise?","I don't know if it's just me, but as a bi guy I seem to be;

1) recongised by gay men as definitely not straight, so they openly flirt with me and see me as a potential sex partner

2) have a lot of success with women - all of them assume I'm straight, because I'm attractive and masculine enough for them

3) some straight guys genuinely don't realise I'm not straight, but sometimes some other straight men look at me in disgust because they think I'm effeminate/not masculine. I dress and act fairly normal, and I'm 5'9 (so about average height) and a lean 150lbs which is a healthy BMI of 22.

What gives? It's so hard to view myself the way others see me. What kind of vibe am I likely giving off?",bisexual
It’s been a year since I “came out” online...,And I’m not bisexual lol. Well at least not completely. I found a label which is so lengthy to say but I think I’m a biromantic asexual or demisexual. I know people say you don’t need labels but the things is labels aren’t for yourself there for others and I just need to find a term that would be understood to others. Even though I’m too afraid to come out anyways...,bisexual
Alchemy at it's highest,,bisexual
Why have i staryed to like men so much,I have recently came to the fact I was bi a couple of weeks ago but now that I have I can't stop thinking about guys I find myself thinking lots of guys are hot and I have lots of feelings for guys but why so Mich this fast I hardly notice or have as much feelings for girls as I used to is this normal? ,bisexual
Crush on my coworker,"So I am 26 f bi and not have come out to family, but some friends.  I have a crush on my coworker.  I know there is 0 chance with her, she is straight and has a boyfriend.  

I don’t even attempt at anything or act different, just because I have accepted the fact there is no chance for us.  But my other coworker discovered on accident that I have feelings for my other coworker.  We were decorating our office and the coworker that I have a crush on was out for lunch and she made the statement, “if it were not for her, we would not be decorating our office.  I find it cute how she gets so excited.”  And she saw me blush big time and she then changed the subject when she noticed.      My other coworker is straight and happily married, so she was just using cute in the general term.

So I don’t know if my other coworker will keep it a secret or tell her or what.  I don’t want to make things awkward at work.  ",bisexual
This sub in a nutshell,,bisexual
I really need help,I'm 18M and like a guy right now. its been months. i also feel like he's bi and get bi vibes from him. I have many reasons to support this. recently out of the blue he complimented my new haircut(this is probably wishful thinking in my part that he might be interested). So he's in my grade but i was never friends with him. Recently I started talking to him more often. ummm today i asked him through chat if he was bi and i used the friend excuse. He said no. So that it doesn't remain awkward I'm thinking of telling him that I'm bi and i like him. He doesnt seem like the guy to spread it and isn't homophobic. Am I taking the right steps? Someone help me. I feel like he's actually bi but we arent close so he wudnt tell me and it makes sense. What do i do going forward?,bisexual
We_birl,,bisexual
I just came out and I have very homophobic parents. Honestly posting just to get some support cause it's tougher than I thought,"Hi guys. [A post](https://old.reddit.com/r/bisexual/comments/9o5f44/being_honest_with_women_is_like_shooting_myself/e7rplba/) here a while ago made me realise that I should come out not only for myself, but for the battle that we're all fighting in this world. I live in Brazil and things are getting very intolerant and violent here, so I decided I had to give more visibility to bisexuality and LGBT+ in general.  

I posted on my Facebook a huge text explaining this and coming out. I'm getting tons of supportive messages from friends, from people I didn't even know saying that they can relate so much, that it helped them figure their bisexuality out and stuff. This makes me so proud and happy, I feel like it was worth it!  

My parents, however, are very homophobic. I didn't tell them before posting because I know they don't like it. Honestly I didn't even know how to tell them straight away, they'd think I was joking or something, seriously. They'd be like 'oh here he comes with his jokes again' or something like that. I do feel kind of bad for them knowing through the Facebook post, though. :(  

Did I do the wrong thing here? Maybe I should've told them before right... But when they found out about my sister (she's gay), they were sooo pissed and sad, my Dad cried and didn't even talk to her for a few days. I don't know if he cried today because I don't live with them anymore, but he didn't talk to me over the phone, just my Mom saying he was very sad and then she was asking me to remove the post, calling me crazy, etc, etc.  

It sucks so much, I didn't know it was this bad. I have so much respect for people that do this now. It sucks a bit more because I do feel bad for not telling them beforehand, but because of the reaction I knew they'd have, I had no idea how to approach it.  

Anyway, guys and gals... Hug your supportive parents, they're a treasure!",bisexual
Right after coming out to my friends,,bisexual
Keep an eye out for the next Bi character!,,bisexual
Question,How do you know when to tell a friend about being bi?,bisexual
If I make and sell something....,"Would it be a bi-product?

I’m sorry but I love bi dad jokes",bisexual
Queer positive music video about wizards in space.,,bisexual
Used the make your own expansion of the Voting Game to come out to a group of friends last weekend.,,bisexual
New here- I've been repressing things,"I always knew I liked women more than men- but I like men too. I am a 20 year old female who is only just recently coming to terms that I am bisexual. 
A bit of context- I live in Georgia where people aren't always ""tolerable"" with these things. In High School it was an unspoken thing to like the same sex- it was more like used as a tool against you. 
Anyways.. I feel as though I've been repressing this for all of my life. I don't let myself fantasize and I have been pushing away any new woman that comes into my life. I feel as though I have so many guy friends because I rarely ever have to worry about being attracted to them in any way. Very rarely I become physically attracted to a guy- but it has happened a few times before. I just haven't ever tried to explore this huge part of me for so long.. every time I did I made sure I stopped immediately. And I try to act to my friends that I am totally chill and accepting of me being bisexual, but I am honestly terrified of anyone who I don't trust finding out. I am terrified of becoming close to a woman in that way. Filled with doubts and worries like, ""would I be good enough?"", ""what would people think?"", ""what if I kissed a girl in public- would someone attack us?"", ""would my life ever be the same- and is that a good thing?"". 
I want to go to this pride gala this month at my college. I want to go with my best friend to ""get her a date"" or ""get her a girl"" but really I am just afraid to admit that I want to go and see if I meet anyone. To see if I ""fit in"". 
All of this is just really confusing to me- and I just needed a place to say this. Thank you if you read any of this! Sorry that it was a bit long. ",bisexual
Lemon cheesecake?,Can it be lemon cheesecake? ...I never liked lemon bars... should I hide...,bisexual
Explaining bisexuality to a lesbian special needs girl,"I work as a special education aide where I follow a special needs girl around her middle school classes all day. She is very open about being attracted to girls and having crushes on them. I have been trying to build a good, trusting relationship with her, so I came out to her. 

Me: “ you know, I like girls too.”

Her: “But you have a boyfriend.”

Me: “yup!”

Her: “How do you like both? You’re not a lesbian and you’re not straight?”

Me: “Right. When you like both it is called bisexual.”

And then later in the day after she had been thinking about it for a while she said:

Her: “But if you have a boyfriend why are you still bisexual?”

I thought for a second about how I could explain to her in a simple way that even though I have a boyfriend and am in a monogamous relationship I am still bisexual. 

Me: “Because if I didn’t have a boyfriend, maybe I’d have a girlfriend instead.”

She raised her eyebrows at me, smiled, and then continued eating her lunch. 

I just thought I’d share my little interaction. It warmed my heart how easily and openly she accepted my sexuality. Open minded kids give my heart hope. That’s why if I have children I want to expose them to all the different sexualities and genders at a young age. 🏳️‍🌈

Do any of you guys have an similar stories? Would you have explained being bi in a different way than I had?

Edit: my phone autocorrected “bi” to “no” 🙄 I switched it",bisexual
How has this sub impacted you?,"This sub is so important to me as someone who struggles with labels. As such I’m doing a case study about this sub’s positive effects.

I’ve been able to come out to a friend and my boyfriend about it because of this sub. Share your stories with me ☺️

EDIT:  Yes this is a research post. I’m studying a BA in Adelaide. This research is for a class called Power and Resistance. Happy to send anyone who asks my research proposal. 

I hope to be able to answer my research question: 
How does bisexuality resist the power of binary sexuality, and how does that affect agency within hetero- and homo-centric spaces?

If anyone has any concerns or issues feel free to inbox me (no personal messages or stories will be used without consent and I will be posting the end product to this sub)",bisexual
Finally accepted being Bi is ok,So just kinda wanted to share this with peeps so said where else is better than this! I (21M) knew I was into guys and girls since I was 13 but was involved in rugby and lad culture for most of my teens and so really suppressed the fact that I was Bi and hated that part of myself for all of my adolescence. So it took a good 7 years to finally say aloud to someone (therapist) that Im Bi and it was one of the most terrifying and amazing moments of my life! Since then over the past 10 months I have slowly been coming out to my close friends who have all been incredibly nice and not bothered about it most react with ‘cool so want a cup of tea? ‘.  Am building up to mentioning it to the family I know they will be completely ok with it. Just slowly mentioning it to friends at the moment so going at my own pace but I’ve never been happier and for the first time in 7 years I don’t feel ashamed of who I am and have started to understand why it’s called pride! Wish I’d realized it was ok before this but that’s life looking onward and upward! Just wanted to share this hope that’s ok ! ,bisexual
"A poem I wrote of my personal experiences feeling alienated in the queer community, and coming to terms with my sexuality","Belong

Are you, so to say, not nearly enough gay

to partake in the unity

of love, in this community?

Are you here and queer,

or there and square?

Seems you don't belong anywhere.

The shape of man and woman, and all those in between,

you find so charismatic, though with one you're more keen.

If you're more straight you must be fake,

Your queerness doesn't count.

Do you meet the Kinsey quota?

Is there a right amount?

They all say hot, you think he's not,

so does that make you wrong?

You still can't help but feel you don't belong.

No, that can't be true, and yet you feel like such a freak,

but everyone loves differently, each person's love, unique.

You try so hard to prove yourself,

to validate each feeling,

this energy is wasted,

when it could be used for healing.

You don't have to prove yourself,

or anything to anyone.

If your love makes you happy, well,

then you've already won.

Love is love, no matter what,

no one can say you're wrong,

so embrace love on your own terms,

you already belong.",bisexual
"A familiar, beloved color scheme to an artwork piece on the Poly Artbook app. 💗💜💙🦋",,bisexual
Should I bother coming out?,"I know, it’s a personal preference and follow my gut blah blah but I want to see what other people think. 
I’m still coming to terms with my sexuality. I’m 25M, and am like 90% straight. I have only ever been with girls, but I get turned on by dicks sometimes and fantasize about being with a guy. I don’t know if I would ever actually enjoy that or just enjoy thinking about it. I’m also fairly confident that I could never be with a guy romantically. It feels like it’s more of a fetish than an identity - I’m very sorry if that offends anyone, I’m only speaking personally- .But I still feel very guilty keeping it from girlfriends and have never told my family or anything. I just “came out” to a couple close friends the other day and it didn’t really feel like that huge weight off my chest that I thought it would. Idk, I’m still confused and wonder if anyone can relate. ",bisexual
Who are you out to?,"F16 I'm out to my good friend, who is also bi, and a dude who I know is super accepting. 

I'm considering coming out to a few more of my close friends, sometimes I really want to, cause I want to trust people more (I hate exposing myself to people) but then sometimes I'm too scared that they'll react badly.

Whenever I think about it I start to panic A LOT. Ugh why is coming out so hard...",bisexual
me irl when im talking to a gay friend and im tired of bierasure,,bisexual
"They say we don't know how to sit | One foot on the couch, the other leg on my backpack",,bisexual
Jay representing on Big Mouth!,,bisexual
"I was worried I'd missed out on Drawfee's Pride shirt, but their newest Merch Squad episode spawned this beauty.",,bisexual
"When do you tell a person you're dating, that you're bi?","I have second date rule for females, and I'm just up front with gay guys because most find it attractive. ",bisexual
I wish I was asexual,Was just broken up with last week. To spare an incredibly long story we were on and off for the past year and the past few months I really thought we loved each other and had a chance. But then she left me for her ex out of the blue. I'm a guy for clarification and we were both bi. I don't think I will ever find someone that I click with on such a level emotionally and sexually ever again in my life. She screwed me over so much over the past year but I never stopped loving her and I'm having a hard time getting over it again. Even though I'm never going back it still really sucks. And now I can't even masturbate without her coming into my mind and throwing me into a deep depression. It's affecting every aspect of my life. I wish I didn't feel any attraction towards anyone ever again. It's not worth it. I have so many other things going for me and so many other things to worry about but romantic feelings always ruin me on such a deep level. I just don't ever want to have those feelings again because they always go completely wrong and I'm just done. Sorry for the rant I just needed to say this somewhere. If anyone else has felt this way please share. I'm so close to the edge and I really need to get some perspective. ,bisexual
"Bisexual vs. Pansexual? (Differences, not a battle)","What is the real difference between being bisexual and pansexual? When I googled it, it specified that pansexual implies there are more than two genders. I believe gender isn't always binary, but I still identify as bi. I guess I don't really see the difference between the two, does that mean bi people have to believe in a binary gender system? Do pan people like all genders equally? Like for pan people it doesn't matter at all? Because that's not me either, I usually have preferences.

I would date people who identify as something other than M/F including trans people. But I don't get why that would require a distinction, I mean a MtoF person is really just female when it comes to gender. Does that mean I'm pan? Would it be pan erasure if I called myself bi because I didn't want to explain my sexuality to everyone who didn't know what pan meant?

Sorry if this is vague and confusing, I hope you guys get me.",bisexual
Labels are hard,"I'm struggling to find the label that fits me.  I know the answer is ""Yes, you're bi"", but if I'm honest, I simply don't feel bi.  I'm a middle aged trans woman, and until recently, I was exclusively attracted to men.  Then I fell emotionally and romantically for my best friend, and discovered she felt the same (She is bi, but mostly attracted to men).  I've never connected with anyone like this before, and I knew the chance of me ever finding someone like her again was nil, so we talked and decided to explore it.  We're head over heels in love, and to my great surprise, I've found that things are sparking in the bedroom too! Even the sound of her voice does bad bad things to me!  The attraction is real!

So, with a single exception, I'm exclusively attracted to men.  I feel like calling myself bi is misleading, because I'm not attracted to women in general.  Maybe I'm demi sexual to women?  I don't know, because I've never felt like this for another woman before.  Queer fits me, but I feel like it's too broad!

What label fits me?  Do I call myself bi, even though I don't feel like it fits?  It's weird, but I want a label :)",bisexual
Gay keeping,,bisexual
me irl,,bisexual
I really want to kiss a girl...,"Okay guys, don't judge, I'm not usually this open on internet haha

I am slowly getting this excruciating urge to kiss a girl. I realised I'm bisexual about 6 months ago, and since then this urge has grown and no I'm basically horny and full of hormones all the fucking time (sorry for the language guys, gotta be honest). I don't want to use some girl on Tinder just to experiment though, but I'm also not looking for something long term, because I am just too hormonal to not have crushes on everyone (guys and girls both). I just haven't ever kissed a girl, and it makes me so much more curious about how different it would be.. 

Does anyone (I'm an 18 year old girl by the way) recognize this feeling? 

I mean, I love guys too, and they are hot af, but girls are kinda irrestistable, I mean, a woman's body is simply beautiful, don't you agree? 

:)",bisexual
Thanks google...,,bisexual
Im not sure if im bi or not,"So up until about 2 months ago I thought I was straight but then I started getting into traps (guys dressed as girls getting fucked by guys) and eventually I started watching gay porn but I kept saying I was straight because the men were ""feminine"" and one day I started thinking, damn I wanna suck that guys dick when I was watching some vidoes. But I've never had an attraction to men in my everyday life, but then again I haven't for many women in the last year or so either. So yeah any answers on what you guys think is going on would be much appreciated",bisexual
My husband brought me a mid morning snack! He gets it.,,bisexual
Idk whether to come out or not...,I (M17) have just recently began to accept myself as being bisexual after years of repression and assuming it’s just a phase. It feels great and all to finally accept myself for who I am but idk how or even if I should tell my parents and friends. Half of me feels like I’m lying to them if I don’t tell them and the other half feels like I’d be wasting their time and only making things weird because I’m just bi and not “all the way gay” or something. Any advice would help because I have no idea how to go about this.,bisexual
Bi-vent,"I am a bi female, I'm 30 years old, and I came out about 2-3 years ago. Ever since I hit puberty in my tweens, I liked boys, of course, but I also was intrigued by females. I drew a lot, and I hardly ever drew guys. The female shape was beautiful, with the curves, hips, boobs, etc. I really didn't think much of it until I was in my 20s, many years later. I had what I thought was a ""girl crush"" on my best friend (just a straight girls way of convincing herself she isn't queer). Also in my 20s, I went to a house party that a friend and her husband were throwing. We all had been drinking and she asked if I wanted to kiss her (her husband was okay with it). Uhhh I guess? So I did and it didn't really shock me, but it felt different than kissing a guy (guys are kind of sloppy lol).

Fast forward to about a year-ish ago, I was working a full time job (I won't make any mentions where for privacy purposes). There was a lesbian coworker that I began to develop a crush on. I hung out with her a couple of times, but then I told her I was bisexual, and she was completely turned off. ""I don't date bi girls because they're just confused...will cheat...selfish...."" etc. Ummmmmm.....no? I also had never had a full sexual and/or dating experience with a woman....got judged for that, too. The online dating scene was also a joke because I got the same responses from lesbians, but also got a ton of messages inquiring for ""threesomes"" or ""my husband said I could have a girlfriend."" 

This was incredibly discouraging. We, as bi people, catch flack from every corner. I honestly get more hate from the LGBTQ community than the straight people. I am now in a relationship with a straight male (almost 1 year, yay) and he treats me like a queen. It's still a catch 22, though, because I am not gay enough for the LGBTQ community, and not straight enough for the straight community. I honestly feel like it's the LGTQ community. Now, unless someone asks, I don't even tell them my sexual orientation.

BUT I believe all of you and you are valid &lt;3

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
"Ok, I (17M) still don't know if I'm straight or bi","So, I always dated girls, but felt a little weird about guys too. Until yesterday I only had sex with girls, and thought that maybe if I slept with a dude I'd finally know about my sexuality.

Today a made with a guy. It was okay, I think (?), like, it wasn't either bad or good, just fine, you know? But my first time with a girl was also like that so I don't know... 

It might be just because of who I had sex with, or not............................................

I DON'T KNOW

Am I just a confused straight guy or am I actually Bi??? What do you think r/bissexual ?",bisexual
bi_irl,,bisexual
What's your fashion sense like?,I was just wondering...I've been looking to make my style a bit more interesting and maybe attractive to women who like women. I know this is very subjective. But was also wondering if you are attracted to the style that you yourself wear or if it's totally different.,bisexual
PSA: You are valid,"Hi! Just wanted to remind everyone that you and your bisexuality are valid! It doesn’t matter if someone from the lgbt community tells you that you can’t have the same experiences as them because of the fact that you may sometimes have opposite-sex relationships or with cis people, or if someone outside of the community thinks that you’re “experimenting” or in a “phase.” You are you and that is real.

Have a great day! 😀",bisexual
MRW i watched a movie about a gay guy faling in love with a girl and they didn't mention bisexuality even once,,bisexual
Older married men - some input please,"I am 44 years old and married for a little over 18 of those years.  I have for many years struggled with my sexuality and have only recently come to terms with the fact that I like what I like, and that's the way it is.

This has understandably led to some tension in the bedroom as I came to accept myself, and as I result I pushed my wife to do things that she isn't really comfortable doing.  For the most part she has been accommodating to a degree, but a week ago I pushed it too far.  This lead to an in depth discussion of what I want, what is going on, and all that stuff.

The end result is I have come out to my wife, and while she has taken it quite well (and with little surprise on her end) I now have a new struggle.

So, my question for the other men in a similar situation.  How do you satisfy your needs and urges while at the same time keeping your marriage and partner happy in meeting her needs without pushing her outside her comfort zone?

Edit: As this has come up a couple of times.  An affair is not at all of interest or an item that is even up for discussion.  I am happy with the relationship and it's not worth ruining over just a few moments of carnal pleasure.  My greater concern is how do I meet and fulfill my urges while still meeting hers.",bisexual
Attraction,Are you easily attracted to other people? I find myself being very easily attracted to both male and female. A bit difficult to navigate at work settings for myself to keep a poker face sometimes.,bisexual
How bad of an idea is this? I swear I just want some closure,"My first gay crush was on this one girl for two years. She was my friend, I’m two years younger than her, and now she might be coming back from college for an XC event a mutual friend and I invited her to. At this event, I’d like to come out to her and maybe admit that I had a crush on her. I know that she is supportive of gay rights and will definitely support me coming out, but I don’t know about me admitting my old crush. I would feel bad if she was negatively affected by this for whatever reason, so I don’t really want to admit my crush. But I want closure. I really want to tell her, even just to find out her reaction. I don’t know how to go forward with this. Anyone have any ideas? ",bisexual
Shirt I made for my first Pride out,,bisexual
Learning more about myself but more scared than ever (21M),"I’ve been confused for awhile.

Messed around with a friend of mine (M) when we were in middle school, thought nothing of it but over time this carnal urge grew inside of me. Started secretly watching gay porn, then transgender porn, etc.

I’ve never spoken about this to anyone because of my reputation; growing up being a ladies man in a southern rural community, it seemed completely out of the realm of possibility for me to be anything else but what people expected.

Anyways, fast forward to right now, my senior year of uni. I was really fucked up the other night and expressed these feelings to a close gay friend of mine. He congratulated and supported me, which I am honestly so thankful for; it felt crazy to acknowledge those thoughts out loud. I decided to say fuck it, and we hooked up. 

I discovered that’s not necessarily for me (at least not right now); I didn’t quite enjoy it really, and it left a strange taste in my mouth. In fact, hooking up with a guy pushed me towards girls more, in hindsight. I don’t think I’ll pursue men like that; I can’t speak for myself in the future, but now, I think I know for sure.

I’m surrounded by fraternity culture, and although my friends are more progressive than most in that scene, I still feel absolutely alienated now that I know myself in that way. The guy I hooked up with would never speak a word of it unless I felt comfortable, and while I do think I should tell someone else to avoid lying to myself further, I’m not quite emotionally to show that side of me to the world. Frankly it terrifies me how everybody would treat me should they discover this. 

If you’ve made it this far in my post, I appreciate you. I’ve been swimming in my head more than ever the past few days and this was the only place I felt I could come to. I feel...relieved in a sense but like more of an outsider than ever. I’m trying to move forward and recognize the strength it took for me to explore my sexuality, but my age group has implanted a toxic stigma in my brain and I can’t escape it. 

Any advice on how to come to terms with yourself? Anyone have a similar situation? Just trying to make sense of things.

TL:DR - been essentially the epitome of the Herero community my whole life, decided to say fuck it and hook up with a friend of mine instead of denying my curiosity, now feel like more of an outsider but also relieved at the same time. 
",bisexual
Forgetful friend,"I was walking with my guy best friend/ex-bf after school and he said something about a girl on Insta being cute. My response: ""Really? I mean, yes, but really? That's what you're doing right now?"" I just told him yesterday that we're not getting back together. He seemed a little upset. His response to what I said was confusion. He forgot I swing both ways.",bisexual
new to reddit and exploring lgbt pakistan,i am muslim lesbian and new to reddit so dont know much stuff here. I am from Pakistan and wondering if there are any lgbt communities here? if anyone of you know any please do share. I have a religious muslim family so coming out to them is a death of me so just trying to find some fellow lgbts to talk or help.,bisexual
Is this a sufficiently queer look,,bisexual
This is why being bisexual is hard,"Hey everyone, this is going to be a fairly long post so please bear with me as I’m getting the details to you. And I’m on mobile...

So I’m in love with two people at once
One is a girl, one is a guy.

Now I’m going to break down the personalities (including me) of these two individuals, just so you can understand why I’m having this internal conflict of who to choose. They are both wonderful and would contribute great things to my life.

Me: I’m a laid back person. The kind of don’t-give-a-shit-about-much kind of person. But I can be passionate if I’m comfortable. I’m a dedicated person and its hard for me to say no to people or turn them down. My humor is pretty dark, I’m witty mostly when I’m high, but overall I’m super chill. I’m not super active and I don’t get out a whole lot, but if I really wanna do something I’ll do it.

Girl: The girl I like is SUPER adventerous. Shes traveled hella places, goes on hikes, skates, she does a lot of shit. I like her a lot because she brings out my adventerous side. It helps that she is more dominant because I do have some troubles making my own decisions just based on my upbringing. Shes super thoughtful and seems to always have a plan. Sex isn’t a huge concern, but eventually it will come up if we’re honest. I have never been with a woman before so this would be new territory. She has a larger build which I’m 100% okay with, but I’d only be concerned as to how we’d...y’know. Again its the least of my concerns. My other concerns of course if the fact my parents are religious, which she is not which is another ‘issue’ for my family. My parents are major homophobes. Lastly, we are complete opposites which is funny and quirky I guess. Its adds flavor to our friendship.

Guy: He is a lot like me, but in a male form. We are of colored skin, so we can relate as far as skin deep. Being with him is like automatically having a best friend. We could talk for so long and literally about anything. We do tend to bond through smoking (cannabis) so we just have extra fun. Issue is, he is currently a dealer. There are a lot cons when it comes to being a dealer which would involve getting arrested. Unless cannabis is legalized in the next few months then it’d be fine, but its still risky. But by his vibe I can tell he’d be so good to me. We’re both secretly adventerous and want to do things, but we want to do those things with the right person. I’d say I relate to him better and feel slightly more comfortable. And my parents wouldn’t be on my ass. Plus..y’know...sex...

Anyway thats what I’m going through. I did recently let the girl crush know I was into her, by way of floréts. But a piece of me is leaning to the guy. Any advice would be great.",bisexual
not liking me,,bisexual
Esperanza Spalding’s video for “I Can’t Help It” —captures the emotional life of a female bisexual in a hetero relationship,,bisexual
Walmart low key killing it with the bi pride socks.,,bisexual
I wanna get a,"Bi flag but I can’t 😔



I wanna hang one up in my room maybe when I’m older ",bisexual
feeling insecure and want to feel better,"My husband told me he was bisexual in January, we have been together for 12 years and married for 10 years.  When he told me, i was really really shocked...he just blurted it out without any real idea about the stress (of non-disclosure for 12yrs) it would cause me.  We are working through it as best as we can.  I sometimes feel insecure that maybe in 10 years time he might come out 'fully' and say that he is gay and only attracted to men.  We watched a programme (First Dates Hotel) last week and it had a man on it who was gay when he married (he had told his dad about it) and he had been married for 20yrs with 2 children, i said to my husband where he stood morally on the fact that the man had known he was gay before he married and yet hadn't come out to anyone for 20yrs...my husband said it was a really sad situation for everyone involved...but i can't help thinking that it was particularly sad for his wife as she had no idea he was gay for over 20yrs.  I don't trust my husband to be brave enough to tell me any difficult news..",bisexual
OHHHH NOOOOOOOOOOOO (rant/rave/wtf),"( 18F here)So I matched with a girl I’ve seen around my university on OkCupid. Now what? (She liked me before I liked her back)
I’ve never talked to her but I’ve seen her around a lot and goshdarn what have I done???? I’m a fool, and absolute BAFOON. ",bisexual
She ended things because I'm bisexual.,"I met the most amazing girl last week. I had a rare bout of courage and just introduced myself at an event and we skipped all small talk. We ended up walking campus that night after the event just to keep talking about life. I somehow didn't get her number. The next day of classes I saw her and we picked up right where we had ended a few nights before. We finally exchanged phone numbers and just kept talking. We went to a show on saturday night, and before the show while we were hanging out I casually mentioned that I am bisexual. She didn't seem to mind much until today. She told me today that she thinks the world of me and that our week was better than any of her long term relationships, but that my sexuality heavily conflicted with her faith. I've never experienced any sort of negative reaction from somebody my age regarding my sexuality and so I'm honestly just devastated. I haven't had good luck with relationships in the past and thought I had finally gotten past that and I might have a chance at something successful. I don't know how to deal with this  :(",bisexual
This reminded me of this subreddit 😂,,bisexual
"So, what's up with this?","I always loved cocks and sex overall, i was crazy for guys. I am still only crazy for guys. But things are changing and i am not sure in which direction, so it kind of scares me what will result from the situation. All started with my obssesion with a man's body. I was soo attracted to it, I gradually started watching gay porn -  i found it incredibly appealing. I loved seing a man's butt getting fucked with the balls and cock swinging down, hearing his moans, cumming to his face expressions... Not because he was submissive, NO, thats a turn off for me! I was attracted to men so much i wanted them just to enjoy MORE, to get every bit of pleasure he can. That is my sex kredo: ITS ALL ABOUT THE PLEASURE. And one day i discovered pegging. I was watching a version of sex in which i could finally express my attraction fully! I started dreaming, and wanting. I started thinking i could actually fuck a guy someday. I just tried playing with 1 my boyfriend, we got to rimming, and barely any fingers ---&gt; he was kinky alright, but i saw he isnt truly feeling it, so we quit with playing. Then we come to today. I am now fucking a guy with a strap on, i finger him and rimm him and he.... Not only does he love it, he adores it. He moans like a little naughty slut, begging for more. Except, he is doing it bcs of submission wishes and he \*wants\* to be my slut - he's not quite manly. So its slightly different from what i was hoping for, but.... ;)

I am starting to feel a different flow of enegry trough me. Sometimes, its like i have feelings between my legs, where dick is supossed to be.. Are they real, or am i just imagining? I swer, sometimes it felt so real.. My body and mind lose themselves when i enter the role of being \*the man\*. I cant stop fucking, as if someone injected me with testosterone. I feel like a... like a man. I guess this is how it feels like..?

I am starting to see its reflecting on my behaviour towards girls and guys, people in general. Its changing my personality. This new power, some kind of determination.. I was never physically attracted to girls, but now, when i talk to them.... if i find them pretty i imidatelly feel a shot of testosterone going trough my veins. im not attracted to them. **i just want to fuck, give, have a cock and fuck someone with it until they scream.**

WHat am i turning into?",bisexual
Stupid question,I'm sorry if this is a stupid question but Im 14 and I think I'm bi. The thing is a lot of people have been telling me its hormones and puberty and I'll grow out of it. An older friend told me he thought he was gay/bi during puberty but then it ended. My question is is it true? Are people right when saying this or no? It's really confusing me especially when your own mom tells you this and you always trust her with everything and take her advice. Sorry if I wasted your time with this.,bisexual
glowy clickity-clacks i got from my niblings,,bisexual
If only,,bisexual
"Have been exploring, found a few interesting things about my bycicle, someone like that?","Well, I have taken some time to explore this last weeks as hell, I am not even sure what things atract me of some men as I have never though of that before and on the way I have found some interesting things about my cicle. (Heteroflexible here)

1) I can still have romantic fantasies with men when I am sexually into women, same the other way arround.

2) I can stop feeling someone atractive even if I felt them atractive before when I am not in that mood.

3) I can get aroused by men when I am not in that mood (huh anyway my arousal comes from somewhere else more than just being atractive so...) but it is way lesser intensity and doesn't move the mood slider too much.

4) I can get aroused by women when I am not in that mood and can shift my mood to ""don't care wich one"" or sometimes even to just women

5) I can shift my current mood by conversation topics and the people I am arround with but there are some hard limits (""gay day"" I can't cross ""the don't care"" just by that). For example, arround my friends (that are hetero) my mood usually moves to women.

6) Atractive people on the street can shift my mood

7) When... horny enought my current mood becomes way stronger whatever it is men, women or don't care.

8) I can't find people atractive in some places(changing rooms for example), may be my brain blocking it out of respect? Not important but an anecdote.

9) Trying to or thinking to shift my mood to what I am not currently into makes me a little sad? I tried a few times and decided on just pasive research for now, I admit I got a bit excited with learning about myself and overdid.


Edit: The captcha just asked me to mark bycicles, had a good laught.",bisexual
A friend gave me a pin. I love it.,,bisexual
I accidentally came out to my mom,"So I’m applying to college and I selected “another gender identity.” Forgetting this, i asked my mom to look it all over for me. She got to this line and she was confused and, in the ensuing short back and forth, we moved from gender to sexuality in my panic, and I said, “Have I mentioned that I’m bi?”

She said (about both), “That seems like it should’ve come up,” and I told her, “It never seemed relavent.”

Things seem ok, but my dad still doesn’t know, and we only talked a little. We’re about to fill out the FAFSA, so I guess this is the first test.

Oopsie.

Edit: I do not feel liberated. The air weighs heavy in my lungs. It is heavy with silence. I think everything is going to be ok, but I’m more worried than I thought it would be. I’m just venting here. Also, the FAFSA isn’t working, so my distraction is gone. 

Also I fixed some grammar.",bisexual
Biphobia from my SO : I'm hurt and angry,"Hey people, recently I've had my share of thinking about my sexuality and my sexual orientation. I'm definitely NOT exclusively heterosexual. I've been thinking about bi-curiosity and my sensual/sexual attractions to some women. I've open up about my questioning to my partner of 7 years. He's open about sexual and gender orientation. I'm in a field that studies humans' sexuality and its diversity. But he reacted really poorly. He laughed a little bit. He said that :  1) I was thinking about it because I have a couple of good friends that identify as bi or pan AND that my best friend came out recently to me as bi, 2) that it was like a '' college white girl experience ''. I told him I REALLY DID NOT appreciated his reaction and that it hurt me. He apologized. But he still made a couple of remarks, as jokes, in the next days. Example, I cut my hair in a pixie because i really like it, and he told me out of nowhere someday something like : '' my lesbian haircut''.

I'm hurt and I'm angry.",bisexual
i put the bi in bitter,,bisexual
Im a spiteful guy.,"So I'm not afraid of coming out, my family is very accepting, my dad's side is the more worrisome but my cousin has already came out and everyone is very accepting of her, so I'm really not worried. My main situation is I've been told I'm homosexual my whole life, it's just the vibe I give off I guess.
I'm unsure why most of my life I've mostly had female friends but I'm originally from a small town with a 1:2 male female ratio, and I'm the oldest of 4 with older 2 being female, so it's kinda just what I grew up with. I might be slightly more feminine because of it, but in all honesty I'm friends with everyone so it's definitely not sex exclusive.
However I am bi, I know it, but I don't want anyone to know out spite, because I don't want the people (both heterosexual and homosexual) to get the satisfaction of being right when assuming I'm homosexual (well 50% the right I guess) is this a thing people have dealt with before, did you stay spiteful and stubborn, or did you just let anyone know? ",bisexual
After About Five Years,I have finally accepted that I am a Bisexual man... So now what? ,bisexual
not sure if we allow shitposts so I'm just gonna,,bisexual
I think I’m bi!?,So I’ve always identified as lesbian always liked girls and all that but okay so I’m really good friends with a guy like really close and love hanging around him but like never thought I liked him but I get super mega jealous every time he mentions another girls looks or talks to other girls and I just saw a video of him and a girl dancing and got crazy jealous wishing I was the one he was dancing with so like do I like him or what ? ,bisexual
As is tradition...,,bisexual
Fantasising...,"I love getting naked in the gym changing rooms. I often fantasise about a muscly guy, noticing me, making eye contact, leading me to the shower and fucking me there.

In a relationship with a girl atm though so it's going to remain a fantasy... For now anyway 😂

I think if such a guy approached me and I knew what was going on I'd get hard as fuck instantly. so maybe it wouldn't work out the same as I think it'd blow our cover 😂

Anyone got any stories of gym sex for me to envy over but enjoy? Lol",bisexual
Bisexuals Are Indecisive ™,,bisexual
Help in a Time of Need,"I'm posting this out here out of part critical depression and part reaching for help. I have been sober for the last year and a half but recently found myself justifying drinking again. It has quickly spiraled out of control. I've been lying to my wife about the level, and rapidly destroying my life again. I returned home from work tonight having had a few drinks with a coworker and didn't feel like lying any more. I told my wife the truth, and now I find myself on the couch. I understand her rage and reaction, but what i dont understand is myself in this situation. I had remedied my life, or so i thought. I thought I had come to terms with me and was wanting to move forward. What is the problem with me? Am I a clinical alcoholic? Am I depressed and seeking help? am I suicidal? I don't know, please help if you have the time.",bisexual
Confused and need some advice.,"So I am confused about my thoughts and want some advice from people on this sub, please hear me out before you judge.

About me , I am 40’s male , married 3 children , always seen myself as straight, I have had many relationships with women, never with a man. However I have always had this fantasy of giving another guy a BJ, I have had this fantasy for a while but have never acted on it, as of today I am so intrigued by it I have been searching on the likes of DL for someone to make my fantasy a reality. 

However, there are certain things that turn me off, for example I don’t think I could ever kiss another guy or be emotionally attached in a “loving” way, 

Although I enjoy playing with dildos and butt plugs and my wife taking me with her strap on , the idea of another man putting himself in me does nothing for me, the same for the reverse. 

So my question, Is there such a thing as just being orally bisexual, or is it likely that once I experience my fantasy the other things will come into play ?


",bisexual
"28 Years Ago, Brandon Walsh appeared on screens and made me realise my bisexuality.",,bisexual
Being harassed where I live.,"Any time I walk by this guy's window he screams faggot at me. Legit aggesive enough that I feel like if he was outside he would try to beat the shit out of me.

I phoned the office of the building and reported it.

I'm kind of scared now that if they talk to him about it that he will actively seeking me out to kick the shit out of me. And I believe in this situation it's a valid concern.

How the fuck does someone get so homophobic that they want to beat the shit out of someone for the way they look, just because I am in the vicinity of where he can see.

Should I also tell the office I am legit scared of the dude so perhaps they will kick him out?

",bisexual
I'm back baby!,"Well that was fast.

I don't know if anyone remembers my post from last night, but basically I was very down on myself about being bi (again) and I just wanted it to go away. I had plans to try to eliminate my attraction to the guy I like by avoiding him at all times. I did this for the entire school day today. I saw him four times I believe, but each time I never talked to him and I kept my distance. I made sure to never make eye contact with him so as to never allow words to be exchanged.

I ended up leaving school early for a flu shot, but I came back after it was over and I walked down the halls a little bit. I was secretly hoping to see him so I could break my conviction to avoid him, so I walked down the hall where the cross country people are always at, but they were all in the library so I didn't see him. I got to the end of the hall, and upon seeing a big group down the next one, I decided to turn around and walk back to my locker the way I had come instead of trying to awkwardly get through them, and in the process I would get another chance to see him. A few people had left the library to get something from their backpacks in the hall, but I looked through these people and he wasn't there. So, I gave up on my chance of seeing him and breaking my conviction to avoid him, and I walked back towards my locker. There was no one ahead of me, and I didn't see him in the hall as I was walking down it, so I knew I wouldn't find him.

Then, as I was walking past the library that all the cross country people were in, I heard someone say my name behind me. I looked back, and there he was. He was jogging back into the library just as I was walking past it, so he decided to say hi as he went past. I have no idea where he came from, as I saw him nowhere in the halls when I was walking through them. Maybe he was in a classroom or a bathroom, I don't know. All I know is he saw me at the last second before I was gonna leave and continue avoiding him the next day. All he did was say hi, but that was enough for me. It broke my conviction completely. I quit caring about whether I like him or not, because he's just great and I can't just avoid him to try to stop it. Maybe I don't like the fact that I'm attracted to him, but there's nothing I can do about it. All I can do is keep living my life with him and all my other friends. Whatever happens, happens.

I know I'm not done having sad and down thoughts like the ones I had last night. At this point, they seem to be a biweekly thing (pun half-intended). But, all I can do is get over them as they come. I just got over the ones from last night earlier today. I've gotten over all the ones I've had before. I can hopefully get over all the ones still to come. I guess I just have to take them as they come.

I want to thank you all real quick for being there for me when these sad and down thoughts come over me. Last night's post wasn't the first post I've made about them, and it definitely won't be the last. You all have come to help me every time I'm feeling down, and I cannot express how much I appreciate it. I don't know where I'd be without you all here to help me, certainly not in as good of a place as I am. You're all the best, thank you for always being there for me.",bisexual
Is Salt Lake bi culture? Different mineral levels on each side of a railroad make it into a natural bi flag,,bisexual
Channel Four’s ‘The Bisexual’,"I’m not sure if anyone’s already said this but there’s a new series on channel four called The Bisexual and it’s friggin amazing !! It’s pretty much the first time I’ve ever actually seen proper bi representation and I think it manages to capture perfectly the unique struggles of bisexuality, whilst still being funny and dramatic and heartbreaking all at the same time. It’s only 6 episodes long but they’re all on All 4 if anyone else wants to give it a go! :) ",bisexual
Why Are Straight Women So Biphobic?,"Not to generalize, but every time I’ve told a girl about my sexuality they never react in a way that’s supporting or helpful. And it’s not that these particular girls weren’t supportive, hell one of them was someone I could come to about everything without expecting judgement. It’s just this specific situation where they get really hurt or rude over it.",bisexual
In a pickle.,"Male, late 20's, married for a while now. Wife and I grew up Christian and I was particularly hardcore super duper right wing until I got to college. It opened my mind, to the point where I was interested in tasting a soft cock, but never acted on my desire. I found a very small percentage of the male population handsome, and have made small comments to my wife in situations where I think she's paying just enough attention to maybe register what I said but not take it seriously. Like, ""babe, I wish we could swap bodies for a day just so I could feel what you feel. Feel my tongue on your dick, yours on my pussy"" etc etc. It made her horny, but I don't think it registered that I was actually wanting to suck some dick.

I guess I've been bi-curious for maybe 10ish years. I've told exactly one person, one of our closest friends. He's gay, and it totally trustworthy of such a secret. He has said that it's okay to be where I'm at. What made me feel more comfortable is that he's heard that a couple of times. 

I don't ever want to feel that I regret not cuddling and fucking a sexy man with a beautiful dick, but at the same time I have no idea how my wife would react to my curiosity. I'm a man's man in the definition of the 50's. Bearded, strong, muscular, just enough fat to make me a cuddly grizzly bear according to my wife. 

Don't get me wrong, I love my wife. Id never leave her or ever think of leaving her. Making love to her is amazingly mind-blowing. 

Do I even tell her? If so, how would I even approach such a subject? ",bisexual
Bi-five,"Instead of waving goodbye to people, we should high five them as we leave; it's just fun... and also we can make it own thing!",bisexual
"I just got started cross stitching, this is the first thing I tried that actually turned out well",,bisexual
October,Ah yes the time of year has come for my bi ass to lust after Columbia and Rocky the entire goddamn movie,bisexual
I need a nap!!!,,bisexual
are you also afraid what people think of you,"as a bi i am sometimes afraid what people think of me i can not be the only one who has that feeling
😕",bisexual
Came out talking to a friend. Feel I should talk again. Also maybe I should get out of the closet to all but I am scared.,"It is only a few days since I came out, some things are still confusing as I haven't ever really expressed that part of myself.

I think there were some misconceptions when I talked to him and I will like to clarify them. While he was supportative... you know, there are some stereotypes of what you have to say when someone comes out that... are not really apropiate.

I have started to feel a bit scared about coming out to my friends as a whole as I think it may change how they treat me. Today there was specially a moment in a changing room in wich one of them make a joke about me staring (wasn't) and it really made me realize, how much would it change if I told them? I... hell I don't know what I should do.

There are also a very few people arround that... well, when by themselves ... sigh I don't want to say homophobes but probably they are I am not completly sure except for one. I mean, they don't really act in front of other people but it is self evident. That can really fuck up big way things. I am their friend but they can be (or in one case are) assholes... I know this is toxic but I really won't like losing them as friends.

Of the few of them like that with one exception they don't even notice, I think they will change eventually if I came out or they will just keep like that but as now when they are not in front of anybody.",bisexual
Last night I expeeimented with a guy for the first time,"I went over to his lab and we made some sick chemical reactions.

Terrible jokes aside: I have been with my girlfriend for two years. I realized I was bi about a year ago. since then my gf has been encouraging me to try something with another guy, which I finally did last night.

It ended up not being super amazing, but I don't regret it, and I learned some valuable lessons.

I felt like I needed to try to have sex with a guy to validate my sexuality, not to others, but to myself. I thought last night would be this amazing revelatory experience where I realized what it's like to be with a man and what being bisexual truly feels like. I now know that I'm comfortable enough with my sexuality that one day maybe I will have mind blowing sex with another man, but that was not what happened last night. I thought that I didn't truly know what it felt like to be bisexual because I hadn't been with both guys and girls yet. But I already knew what it felt like to be bisexual. I've known what it feels like to be bi all along, because always felt bi, and I've always been bi, even if I only realized what it meant a year ago. Bisexual is me. I am bisexual.

Thank you to everyone on this amazing community. This subreddit really helped make me comfortable enough to try the things I wanted to try.

Also shout-out to Jonathan Van Ness from Queer Eye. As a bisexual man his entire personality makes me feel empowered because he expresses and balances his femininity and masculinity in such a beautiful way.

Edit: Read this over like 10 times and still fucked up the title 😔",bisexual
Public Service Announcement,"I am frustrated constantly in this day and age that when I see an attractive woman (and in a few cases with me, a guy), I cannot tell her (and again, sometimes him) so without coming off as creepy. I hate it. I don't want to be a weirdo, but I want to give some people a boost when I see them and they legitimately look fan-fucking-tastic, and/or, I see them and they look even more ravishing than usual, but I don't know them, or don't know them well, so I can't say it without being a creepy weirdo.

So, being as how r/bisexual is the community that I'm most active in (except for posting memes), and it is the largest community that I feel I have the most influence in, I'm going to say this once, to all of you.

Every day someone sees you and has to swallow the compliment they want to give you about how amazing you look. It might be the pool attendant/life guard working at the hotel you're staying at when you decide to slip into your swim suit and go for a dip (happens almost every day I work at the hotel), and it might be the co-worker you see but never talk to, or the other kid in school that you're not really close-enough acquaintances with, or the cab driver, or the guy in the elevator, or the person walking past you on the sidewalk.

So I'm going to say it for them, and I'm going to say the things I wish the people I see could hear.

""Damn, especially for a woman with three kids, you have a smoking body, and you should be crazy proud of it.""

""Wow, dude, that shirt REALLY makes your eyes pop.""

""Damn, you look hot in that polo. Have you been working out?""

""Wherever you got those pants from, invest in some more, because your ass is killing it in them.""

""I don't know what exactly you did to your hair this morning, but it looks gorgeous.""

""You should really smile more often, because you look absolutely beautiful when you do.""

""Your eyes are absolutely captivating, and every time I see you, I have to try so hard not to look for too long, because I don't want you to catch me staring, but damn.""

""Whenever you walk by, I can't pay attention to what I'm doing because the scent of your perfume is intoxicating.""

""I'm sorry, but every time I'm behind you, I have to look away, because it is SO hard to not think thoughts that I know I shouldn't.""

""Whatever you have been doing lately, it's working, and you should be damn proud. Your body looks incredible.""

""I hate it when you wear a skirt, because it is SO distracting trying not to catch a glimpse of your legs, but I want you to know that you look amazing every time you do.""

That's all I got for now, but seriously, read these and take at least one of them to heart, because someone somewhere is thinking it when they see  you and keeping it to themselves so as not to offend or creep you out. 

Edit: I know some of these might seem overly-sexual in nature to some people, and so I'm sorry if that triggers or offends anyone. I was just reflecting some of the thoughts that sprint through my head sometimes, and I wanted to be as honest as possible. You're beautiful people, and I love all of you (Okay, that's not entirely true, I don't know you all, but the ones that I do are gorgeous, and I like to imagine all of the ones I haven't met are still beautiful too, and I want them to know that.)",bisexual
"My (straight male) girlfriend (bisexual female) is currently and has previously struggled with her ""bi-cycle,"" I'm feeling selfish for continuing to want monogamy. Any advice?","Hi all, I hope it's alright that I'm invading your space. I'm in a wonderful relationship with a fantastic, bisexual woman. I'm totally okay with this except for the insecurity it creates on my part-I hate the thought that I am limiting something as fundamental and important as her sexuality. I know she goes back and forth on how ""gay"" she feels, but it's also something she doesn't readily share with me (only when she feels particularly one way or the other) because she knows how much it hurts me. Just last night, she confessed a great number of stressors that are currently bringing her down, one of which being that she feels more gay right now, though she insists that she loves me. After a lot of tears and cuddling, we had very intimate, meaningful sex, which has now left me totally confused.

On the one hand, I love this woman more than anyone I can imagine. The thought of leaving her to see other people breaks my heart. But on the other, I feel selfish for preventing her from exploring a whole half of her sexuality. I only just learned about the bi-cycle this morning and the posts here have helped reassure me that monogamy is possible, but I'm at a loss for how to proceed. Last night, my mind raced through various options of open relationships, polyamory, etc., but I'm really not sure what to do. While theoretically I'd be okay with opening the relationship if it made her happier, I would also be devastated should she find someone she wanted to leave me for (again, how selfish am I being?)

If you could shed any light on how I should move forward, especially what questions I should ask in a conversation with her, or boundaries I can legitimately create in a relationship without stifling my girlfriend's self expression, please let me know. I really appreciate any and all advice or insight you can provide. Thanks so much!

Tl;dr: My girlfriend's bisexual and currently feeling ""quite gay"" (though we're still intimate and loving towards one another). Please give me any advice on how to navigate these waters. Thanks!


Edit: Thank you all for your responses, I really appreciate your insight! Just to be clear, my girlfriend has been been totally faithful and not brought up any of the polyamory or sleeping with other people that I have. I'm just clueless as to whether that's what she desires deep down or not. I guess my assumption is that, when she's feeling more gay, she doesn't want to be with me, but I may be wrong, hence this post and my need for an informed conversation with her asap. Anyway, you have all been extremely helpful and I very much appreciate your broadening my understanding of a sexuality I do not share. Thank you!!",bisexual
Awkward situations of a bi male...,"So I met this guy who was cute as hell. Found out he was unsure of his sexuality and one thing led to another on a night out and we ended up hooking up. He was a bit younger so I had to show him a couple of things. But he was fun. Anyway I cut ties after about 2 or 3 times because I think he was getting attached.

A Few months later: I started sleeping with this older woman as it was an eruption of timely sexual tension. 
Found out this woman was the mother of the guy I slept with.
How did I know... when I went to her apartment. There was a photo of her and and her two sons. 

I felt kinda proud in the way of sleeping with both of them sense. But then I felt bad. As I have been seeing this woman for a long period of time now... EEP. 

Best kept secret I think.

Glad that’s off my chest ",bisexual
"I hate being the ""typical"" gay guy","Fuck I'm tired of being called ""typical"". I just kind of live my everyday life just being me and then people just manage to apply stereotypes to me. I'm a bisexual dude and it gets so annoying sometimes. I was on a cruise for a week and one of my gay ""friends"" kept on doubting my bisexuality and pointing out my mannerisms. It has gotten to the point where I'm trying to act straight just to not have people say those things. It's weird because straight people think I'm straight but lgbt/allies call me the typical gay guy I'm so confused. Anyways thanks for listening to my rant. ",bisexual
Bisexual Flag Tracksuit,"I saw you walk past and I immediately noticed the vibrant colors. I wanted to at say hi or compliment you, but I was too nervous. The only thing I could think about was what if you didn't know you were wearing the bi colors.

It made my day to see it.",bisexual
[confession] I'm afraid to come out to my parents,"So last Friday I came out to my sister, who goes to college at the same school I did, and it went very well, if oddly (she swore I'd already told her and I never had). However, I'm dreading the eventuality of coming out to my parents and seriously considering just never telling them.

My relationship with my parents has never been good; while they weren't consistently abusive, they believed in corporal punishment and my mom would sometimes fly off the handle and overdo it. Couple this with their authoritarian parenting style and my then-undiagnosed autism, it was just a recipe for disaster. And while I know they do actually want the best for me, I'm not convinced they have a clue what it is.

Couple that with the knowledge that they voted yes on Prop 8 when we lived in California, I'm just picturing a disaster if they find out. My dad might take it well or he might take the ""love the sinner, hate the sin"" approach, and my mom will probably blame her parenting in some way or another, and I just don't want any of it. Since I'm lucky enough to be able to pass for straight overall, I'm probably just going to continue passing until the relationship dynamic changes.",bisexual
Has anyone had bad experiences with the opposite sex regarding their bisexuality?,"This happened about a month ago and it keeps coming to mind so I wondered if anyone else had had similar experiences.

I'm 20f and had been friendly with a guy for a while now and we eventually started being more intimate. Now, in the past I've only ever been with girls and this guy knew that. The first (and only) time we went further than kissing, he blurted out 'I'm so glad I turned you straight'. 

Well, obviously I was a bit miffed and explained that I was still, y'know, bisexual being with a guy. He then proceeded to make fun and tell me how I was wrong. To which I kicked him out and haven't spoken to him since nor to I intend to.

Maybe I should just stick to girls in the future xD",bisexual
Found on r/dankmemes,,bisexual
"I have a lot of disdain for anything related to homosexuality, despite being bisexual and accepting","This has confused me for a long time. Basically anything even remotely related to homosexuality between men disgusts me. Like I'll watch a video or see a photo of it and absolutely appalled and disgusted. Even thinking about the concept; two men together, bothers me. Whenever I hear the word ""gay"" or ""homosexual"" or ""queer"" it makes me uneasy and bothered. It seems like I find men very unappealing in the broader sense, as the thought of seeing another guy as attractive disturbs me, but upon being a recipient to a guy that excites me. A guys appearance and personality don't do anything for me. I feel like I'm forcing my attraction to men but its the only thing that really excites me. I know its not right but I almost see men as objects sexually. I don't see a person I see a penis.

I want to clarify I'm not homophobic. This is purely a personal thing I struggle with.",bisexual
"I got guilted into coming out to my mom and, SURPRISE, it didn't go well. (LONG)","Quick backstory:

In June 2017 (Pride Month!), I had an epiphany about my past feelings towards women and, weeks short of my 28th birthday, I finally realized I was bisexual. Yay me!

&amp;#x200B;

The only place I've openly talked about it is on my Twitter page, partially because I'm scared of the real-life reactions, and partially because I'm stubborn (""Why do I HAVE to come out?""). Why on Twitter? It's like I'm out without the pressure and criticism and rejection. I can be myself with other queer people! My youngest brother (who's gay and out) and my mom follow me and interact with me on my page all the time. I haven't explictly told them about my sexuality, but they read my tweets, so they definitely know. We just haven't talked about it (see the previous mentioned reasons/excuses).

&amp;#x200B;

Now... I don't have many friends, and even fewer friends that I'm really close to. But I'm trying. I was hanging out with some new friends recently, and we were drinking and laughing and having a great time. We were talking about sexuality being on a spectrum, and I decided to tell them that I was bi. They were encouraging and inquistive, but not in that creepy, skeazy way, and it just made me feel really, really happy that I decided to share this side of me with them. I felt so free!!! I even said as much on my Twitter page, and my mom commented ""Ummm...""

&amp;#x200B;

Cut to a few days later: I call her to catch up on life, and she asks me about my night out with my new friends. I tell her I had a great time, and she said ""And..."" I knew from her tone that she wanted me to tell her about me coming out to people, so reluctantly, I did.

&amp;#x200B;

OMFG. I couldn't believe the things I heard next. ""Are you sure?"" ""Is this just a phase?"" ""Are you gay or straight?"" ""How do you know?"" ""Have you even been with a woman?"" ""Don't you want children?"" ""What if you being bisexual makes your future partner feel insecure?"" ""Are you sure you're not confusing things because you've been an ally to the LGBTQ community?"" ""What if you alienate people because you identify that way?""

&amp;#x200B;

Then she criticized my introversion, reminded me that I'm friendless, and tried to discourage my hobbies because she thought it was interfering with my socialization. Mind you, depression and anxiety have kept me from having hobbies of my own for years, and I'm finally starting to feel like my happy old self again, so you can imagine how hurt I was. She wanted me to promise her that I would be social 3 times a week from now on, because she's afraid that I'm hiding my awesomeness from people and she just wants me to be happy and not end up alone.

&amp;#x200B;

I just... I overestimated how progressive my parents were. I tried to explain my journey of self-discovery to her, and what bisexuality and being queer meant to me, but it just didn't seem to sink in. I know that if my mom was that unsupportive and ignorant, my dad is gonna be even more difficult to talk to. This is why I never wanted to say anything in the first place. I wanted to hang up the phone and immediately come out to more friends in the hopes that it would negate the sadness I felt, but I was afraid of being rejected even more. So now I'm just bummed about it all, and I just wanted to vent somewhere.

&amp;#x200B;

Also, this happened ON National Coming Out Day.

&amp;#x200B;

TL;DR: My mom guilted me into coming out as bisexual, and then criticized my identity and my introversion.",bisexual
LGBT Story | Struggling to come out | Inspiration story,,bisexual
The Stages of Acknowledgement,"So my wife and I have recently been discussing our desires and she says ""I think you are bi.""

I don't really like labeling very much as I like what I like and don't try to categorize it for anyone's benefit, so I would say I don't really identify with the idea of ""coming out"" nor do I care to engage in any sort of ""pride"" activity. It's all very personal and I don't make it anyone else's business.

Eventually this sort of morphed into ""no, I just like dicks and pussies!"" And that was ok for a while. Ultimately I have just sort of relented and now accept the 'bi' label, mainly because it is convenient, though imperfect.

Does anyone else understand this? It seems less like ""this is who I am"" and more like ""if that's what you need to call me"" than anything else.",bisexual
I’m still Bi if I only really like Twinks and Twunks right?,,bisexual
When you’re watching porn and can’t decide between focusing on the guy or girl,,bisexual
"Tips for me (31F) on how to flirt with women, because my flirting-with-dudes playbook isn't cutting it","Hey bi crew,

I'm trying to level up my game on flirting with other women. I'm a 31 year old bisexual woman, but I've mostly been with men in my life so far because 1) I had some hangups about PIV sex being the one true sex, which I am happily working through, and 2) honestly bagging the dudes is pretty easy. I'm realizing that I'd really like to start exploring dating women, but so far the two times I've tried to flirt with women it has totally failed. 

The most recent case study:

I was at a wedding this weekend and there was a totally hot couple in attendance. I got the vibe from them that they might be open to experimenting, so I attempted to flirt with each of them to test the waters. I felt like I was giving them the same level of attention: compliments on outfits, curious questions about their hobbies and interests, light arm touch, etc. I danced each of them on the dance floor and I thought we were really hitting it off. Apparently, though, while he got the flirting message, she thought I was being fake nice to her with the intention of trying to get with him! They had a fight when he asked her if she was interested in having a threesome and this issue was the crux. I hashed it out with her in the morning and told her I was interested in them both, but she said the approach was bad and now she's not into it. Clearly there's more to this dynamic, but I can't help but feel like if I were better at lady flirting this could have gone better.


It probably doesn't help that I'm a very touchy person in the first place; I like to hug and play with hair even with my platonic female friends, so it's hard to differentiate with trying to make romantic gestures instead. 

So from those that swing both ways, how do you do it? Ladies, how do you flirt with other ladies, and how does it compare with flirting with dudes? I think I need to be more direct, but I'm not sure how much is too much or where to start.",bisexual
I'm afraid,"Hey guys and girls 
i am BI but little scared i have once had a boyfriend in my life but only one  any tips for me ask another boy out 

sorry for the bad english
aim from Belgium so it is not so good
and this page is very good
it helps me a lot 


am glad that there is a place that we can talk about this  


thanks to all of you 😊

",bisexual
Observations on Being Bi While in the Military,"Howdy.  I'm a 30-something year-old bisexual male who is married to an incredible woman while serving in the US military (US Coast Guard).  I've come across a couple of stray observations for any interested.  But for the most part, I'm just writing this as a bit of a thought exercise for myself.

-To start, I cannot express how thankful I am that I am not serving in the military of 20 or 30 years ago. Overall, people are pretty accepting these days.  The prevailing perspective is ""all we care about is if you can do the job.""  Of course there will always be the outwardly bigoted pieces of shit, but I've only encountered them as isolated cases and even then the rest of the crew gives them little or no social capital.  The culture of overt homophobia isn't as strong anymore thanks to younger folk making up the lower enlisted and officer ranks.  The mentality changes.

-However, this does not mean that the military has suddenly become a progressive paradise.  The words ""fag"", ""gay"", ""homo"", and ""queer"" are still used casually and in jest quite commonly.  The military is an overwhelmingly male workspace.  As a result of this, the male-centric tradition of jockeying for pecking order via friendly inter-group rivalry is alive and well.  The above words are used very commonly without malicious intent.  

Navigating this can prove tricky. I usually won't engage and confront the usage of that lexicon when in a group setting.  But when one-on-one, I try to find a thought provoking yet non-confrontational way to bring up the usage.  Surprisingly, the same chuckleheads that give in to mindless machismo in a group setting have the capacity to be incredibly thoughtful and considerate when discussing things one-on-one.  And this discussion becomes necessary as I will find my shipmates are very dismissive or deriding of LGBTQIA+ issues.  They will altch on to the more radical element and take their actions to be a representative of the community in it's entirety.  This gets pretty damn exhausting to listen to. Of course, other branches are more likely to have this issue in greater magnitude.

-One of the most complex aspects of serving while bi is the subject of invisibility.  I think this is probably the most ""your mileage may vary"" part of my post, but factors such a whether or not you're out, your relationship status, and the identity of your partner(s) can lead to how the day-to-day function of sexuality as part of identity in the military workplace goes. For me, I am not out due to various reasons.  This proves complex because while I do not want to out myself publicly, I would like some ally present who understands the unique nuances of LGBTQIA+ in the military. What makes this more difficult is that part of being in the military is moving every few years. This means new workplace, new crew, and new social circles to understand.  It is crucial to keep in contact with the strong allies one makes in each workplace.

-Being deployed or underway also can cause a drastic change in a service member's mental state, regardless of their sexuality.  Colloquially, this is known in my branch as ""cutter brain"".  Being out to sea for months at a time is an environment unlike any other, presenting very unique challenges.  For instance, married personnel sometimes try and find (consciously or subconsciously) a coworker to act as a stand-in for their spouse.  The stand-in can act as a substitute for emotional or physical aspects of a relationship (or both).  In the pursuit of this surrogate, the decision-making process of a member can be very compromised. Otherwise simple exchanges are drastically over-analyzed.  Add being bisexual to the mix, and well, you get the picture.  Due to this weakened mental state, it becomes necessary to really develop strong mental defense mechanisms and exercises.  The need for an external support system via email or other communication becomes essential as well.

-Lastly, the funniest observation is how quickly self-professed straight dudes take to some really homo-erotic bonding.  It has been written before that there is a human need for touch, equivalent to the need for any tier of Maslow's hierarchy.  On a boat (and I would imagine on a deployment for our land-lubber kin), this takes the form of impromptu wrestling matches.  Watching a buncha dudes wrestle is one thing, but they also recognize the subtext of what they are doing, so to play it off they usually end up making a lot of homoerotic jokes.  I think part of being bisexual is being prone to having a very solid and confident understanding of one's sexuality.  Having this confidence makes watching a buncha straight dudes gay wrestle for fun all the more, well, hilarious.

Overall, I have found that my life in the military has been beneficial in ways I cannot even describe.  At least in my branch, the quality of life is higher than I have ever had on the civilian side.  There is still a lot of progress that can be made, but I feel that the military is at a place where that progress is going to come at an exponentially faster rate than it did in decades past.  Policy under heads of state might change, but the culture seems to be on a solid trend upwards.",bisexual
The latest chapter of the fan made doawk sequel has an awesome revelation.,,bisexual
interesting (ffm) NSFW,"yesterday i had my first threesome with two friends whom i have some huge crushes on

so in this one moment i was kissing the girl and started going down to her chest but then the guy came on top to kiss her too

and i end up in this weird place between both chests where i could see them sweetly making out from under their chins and listen to both of their decreasing heartbeats, one in each ear

and i was baked as fuk

and maybe it was the dim blue light or the way they communicated or the fundamental idea of man and woman but i lost it

i legitimately recall firecrackers mentally popping in my head",bisexual
Discussing our bisexuality on Discord 👌🏻,,bisexual
HOW DO GIRLS FLIRTTTTTTT,"IM a girl also

Im just lost w girls

Boys are easy they too easy lol

But GIRLS WTF",bisexual
no ur gay,,bisexual
Our New Anthem?: Torrey Mercer- Boys/Girls,,bisexual
My sister (13 F) was just outed as bi to our “progressive” father and stepmother. Guess how that went.,"I’ve known I was bi since I was 13. My father didn’t know until I was in college and dating a girl, whom he did NOT approve of. Now I’m 22 and dating a guy, and that’s totally fine. I’m pretty sure they think I’m “straight now.”

Now my sister just recently came out to me and our mother, and all was well. She was super excited about this new part of her identity, wore lots of bi-themed makeup and colors to school, started an anonymous Instagram to post bi memes. Innocent stuff, some of it a little PG-13, but I know my sister. She’s very innocent and prefers a day under the covers to a day out and about, so the raunchy jokes are just that: jokes.

Enter my stalker stepmother. She finds my sister’s Insta, and immediately screenshots the jokes with sex and harasses her to the point of crying. My sister is terrified and calls me from a city away.

My stepmother apparently shouted her down for at least an hour, saying that she was doing this for attention, that you can’t know you’re bisexual unless you’re having sex, that she’s “insulting” “real LGBT people,” which is so infuriating because I know a bunch of lesbians and gay guys who would beat up ANYONE talking to a fucking 13-year-old bi kid this way. Plus she talked shit about me “throwing away my college” to date a girl. Newsflash - I failed college because I was suicidally depressed and hospitalized afterwards, and now I’m back in school and doing fine, so... what the fuck? And my dad just stands there doing nothing.

This, from two people who are anti-Trump, “pro-LGBT,” whatever. It pisses me off.

Best of all? They haven’t even attempted to talk to my mother about it. This isn’t about her personal safety or possible sexual activity. This is about CONTROL. And I don’t know what to do. I get help with my car from them. I’ve repressed my own feelings towards the biphobia I’ve experienced but seeing it happen to my sister is just... infuriating.

I don’t know what to do. ",bisexual
I’m rewatching some old Doctor Who... Captain Jack Harkness was a bit of a bisexual awakening for me. Anyone feel the same way?,,bisexual
"Being honest with women is like shooting myself in the foot, so I stopped","It seems like many straight women nowadays say they’re “open” to dating a bi guy in order to seem tolerant or progressive, but in reality I’ve found the exact opposite is true. 

I used to be honest about my sexuality with potential partners, but quickly realized that women who would likely date or have sex with me were friendzoning / ghosting me just for being bi.

So naturally I switched up my strategy and didn’t tell them about my bisexuality until we had sex for the first time. 

The reactions (from over 10 women) were basically 80% negative and 20% positive. One of them in particular was fuming mad, accusing me of “lying” to her. Well, she never asked if I liked dudes too did she?  

Basically, these same women who were so attracted to me being my normal straight acting self are all of a sudden mad that I didn’t give them the opportunity to reject me for something I cannot change about myself. Something that I was born with. 

But they were totally happy to date &amp; fuck me as long as I didn’t expose my other side. Not to mention these are the same types of girls who love to show off their gay friends as social proof of their “acceptance” for LGBT people. 

That said, a couple of them were totally cool with it. But from talking with other bi guys it seems like about 75-85% of straight women are biphobic. 

I would rather be honest about this type of stuff because I see my bisexuality as nothing to be ashamed of, but I’m also a realistic person who wants to get laid. The struggle is real. ",bisexual
I feel like it’s easier to date guys,"I a guy and I feel like because of all the social norms around guys flirting and getting with women, it almost seems easier to just have a simpler connection with men without a giant inescapable gender difference.",bisexual
Being bi is confusing,I keep changing my attractions one day I could like men and the next I like woman. It's a pain in the ass because it keeps changing I am worried about being in a relationship and I want to sleep around with the other sex. Is this normal? I am considering becoming polyamorous,bisexual
"""Lesbian friend'","So I (female) used to live with this girl as house mates in my early 20s after I broke up from a two and half year relationship with this guy.

Me and her were work friend when I was with him and came out to her one night as bi. I came to work the next day to everyone thinking I was a lesbian. Well I let them know I was a bit miffed about being outed, corrected them and move on.

Well after I broke up with him I moved in with her as friends and I started dating this other girl. My friend continues at this time introducing me to everyone as her ""lesbian friend"", even to her old irish granny! I confronted her on it a few time, but she'd just laugh it off. She told me it was easier for others to understand and would keep leachy guys away.

Well after I broke up with the gf after one year and a half this girl's boyfriend asks me if I'd date a man or woman. I respond with, IDK depends who I meet. He comes back at me with some bulls**t about sitting on the fence and this girl does actually defend me. I think at least she does get it, maybe all the ""lesbian friend"" stuff was just for other people.

We would stopped living together after this as she had kids with her bf. I found a nice F2M guy who I've been in a happy relationship with since.

I went to her 30th birthday party and got introduced as her ""lesbian friend"" again she was already off her face so I let it pass and we hadn't seen each other in a long time. One of her new friends who I met before was a bit confused as she knew I had a boyfriend and had dated men. I explained and she just said ""oh"" and had a bit of I'm sorry you have to put with her introducing you like that face.

Well 10 years down the line from when we lived together, as I said we barley get to meet up but they're on holiday near where we live. So I call to find out time for the meet up and think I can try and nip this in the but finally plus where I live now people aren't quiet as LGBT friendly.

Well I ask her if she cannot screem ""lesbian friend"" (which she has a habbit of doing) and why (biggots) just to get the response that I'm being silly. I explain further thats its not even correct in the first place and get back a ""but you are?"" I point out that I have been dating a guy for ten years! She just goes ohhh so you are staight!

Head desk.

So doesn't care for our safty or seem to comprehend that liking both genders does not disapear when I date someone.

As she was also a friend who would do nothing for you but expect the world in return I don't know why I gave her so much time. Never did house work, would spend her rent, food and bill money on cloths and she couldn't be bothered to wash the ones she owned, then expect me to pay for what she couldn't aford.

I expect it was because my previous two relationships were rather abusive in different ways and needed a friend as she wasn't as bad as them.

She also asked me out a point we were living together which I said no too and she got rather upset. I think sometime this confusion may stem from her own confusion.

Well what ever I'm done with this cr*py friend.

Sorry for spelly/grammer dyslexic, don't normally write online but just needed to rant.",bisexual
Weird confession/get this of my chest moment,"Sometimes I hate myself for being bi, don't get me wrong I'm proud of the fact I like both boys and girls and I'm in no way trying to suppress it. I just find myself slightly envious of straight people for seemingly having it so much easier. 
Straight girls seem to find the idea of a male bisexual fairly gross (I also came out to my previous girlfriend and it resulted in the messiest soul crushing break up I've experienced), and whenever I've come out to make friends they seem scared I'm attracted to them and that's why I'm friends with them.
I just wish it were all simpler
And on top of this I recently discovered a love for cross dressing and while I enjoy it immensely and I feel more comfortable than I ever have before I'm very aware that I've essentially made myself undatable as very few people will be comfortable with it.
Sorry for the ramble and if it doesn't belong here delete it I just needed to get this of my chest to someone and this was the only place that came to mind ",bisexual
Sydney Bi+ Network,"Just sharing a great resource for those of you who may be based in Australia - or for those of you who are looking to expand your social media to include bi groups from around the world! The Sydney Bi+ Network was recently launched and seeks to improve the wellbeing of bi+ folks across Sydney.  Check them out on facebook here: [https://www.facebook.com/sydney.bi.network](https://www.facebook.com/sydney.bi.network). 

&amp;#x200B;

PS they are also on twitter and instagram! ",bisexual
Brain why... just why,"Hey everyone, 

So just struggling with some stuff so wanted to vent and see if anyone has felt similarly and managed to overcome it.

I met my boyfriend (I’m female) over 2 years ago and about 4 months after dating I started freaking out that I’m gay.. I kept having this thought over and over that I’m gay (except I’m not based on my past and current attractions to males and females). 

I’m getting such bad anxiety that I can’t be intimate with my boyfriend much of the time :( 
I don’t even like the thought of having sex or being touched a lot of the time. 

My psychologist thinks it’s happening because of trauma I’ve experienced, ptsd and ocd. I’ve tried meds and seeing a psychologist but still struggling with this confusion/obsession over sexuality. 

Sometimes I think maybe I should just break up with bf and be with a woman.. maybe then it would stop and I would be happy but that doesn’t make sense either because I know who I’m attracted to. 

TLDR confusion/obsessive thoughts over sexuality making life and relationships difficult. Any advice? 


",bisexual
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! 
The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 
Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 
Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org
Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

",bisexual
"""Gay"" as umbrella term","I identify as bi. I recently met someone who says he identifies as bi, but then also frequently refers to himself as gay. I get ""queer"" as synonymous with ""not straight"" and therefore a sort of umbrella term, but up until now my interpretation of ""gay"" is ""attracted to the same sex."" To me, using ""gay"" as an umbrella term for ""not straight"" seems to encourage the old ""bisexuals don't exist"" idea, i.e., ""You're not bi: you're really gay and just don't want to admit it."" What are your thoughts on this usage, and do you encounter it often?",bisexual
"As a 22 y/o bi female, attraction to older, heterosexual women has been the bane of my existence for at least a decade now.",Just wanted to put this into words.,bisexual
dreams,"I run away from something. That's what I always dreamt about. It was the same topic for several years. Whether it's a person or a monster or a fire changed from night to night. 

I read about it online. It meant I was avoiding a problem in life. For a long time, I thought it meant I was avoiding my weight problems. I lost the weight. Disappointment came when the dreams persisted.

It was just my best friend Kate and I. Kate asked me who my crush was in the past. It was an innocent question. Yet it made me think about this shameful part of myself.

I could trust her. I felt my best kept lie unravel in one word, ""Emma"".

Tears welled in my eyes. Kate drew me in for a hug. I felt the panic and shame slowly subside.

It's been months since then. I always dream - but never about running.

Thanks for reading, sorry if it's bad. Just had to get it out of my head lol",bisexual
A Coming Out Story,"I’m (F) mid-30s, and I came out as bi this past Thursday to myself, my husband and a few friends. It was confusing, terrifying and amazing all at once. 

After decades of self-induced repression and mad un-packing over the last few months I’m out and getting used to being and celebrating the full me. Even sporting the Pride face on my Apple Watch.

I’ve never been that into men. As I look back over my life, the 1st time I ever felt attracted to someone, it was a female. I’ve had multiple experiences making out with women at parties (and it was great). The only time I’ve had instant attraction to someone, she was female (but she was straight so we were just friends). I’ve only ever had 2 boyfriends (1 is now my husband) mostly because that’s what “you” do. I somehow excused/reasoned away all the times I was attracted to women.

When I met my husband I fell in love with him as a person, how he cared for and respected me. Then the attraction came after that. I love him dearly.

Today while at work I ran into several really attractive women and it all got to be a little too much for me. Uncorking over 20 years of sexual frustration and introducing gorgeous women kinda just had me reeling. “I got the vapors!” Lol. It really made feel exhilarated but also feel kind of guilty. I don’t really know why. I spoke to a really supportive friend on lunch and she gave me some really good advice. She said that I have to give myself space to sort of grieve the time I lost out on to explore my sexuality with women. Which makes a lot of sense. I’ve seen some posts on here where supportive spouses, etc encourage their partners to explore that with another. I don’t think I could be okay with that, but I’m not sure if that just more self-repression or if it’s how I feel. 

My friend also asked me how I handled it when I saw another really attractive man while I was married, I thought about it... that has never happened, not once in over 10 years. Why is it I’m suddenly overwhelmed by primal desire...?

I guess my questions are:
For those that came out (to yourself) later in life did you have a sudden onslaught of feelings for the same sex?
If so, did they kind of subside over time? Or did you have to do more about it?
Any suggestions of things that were helpful to those that came out to a spouse to work through any awkward moments?

I’ve read so much on this subreddit before I came out and, your words and stories inspired me to push myself through this. Thank you! This little community has already made a huge impact in my life.",bisexual
I tried this lemon bar recipe yesterday and HAD to share it.. THEY’RE SO GOOD!,,bisexual
I'm developing major feelings for my straight best friend and I don't know what I should do,"I'd really appreciate anything anyone has to say :)

&amp;#x200B;

I'm a guy. I've never dealt with anything like this before. Not just feelings for a friend, but genuine feelings for *anyone*. It's so scary. He's been my best friend for over 5 years, but only in the last year or so have I really started thinking about him this way. I think I've been much more aware of my sexuality in the last year in general. I'm in my early twenties but I really don't have any experience with anyone. I've had major self-esteem issues that I've only just begun tackling and I feel like now I'm really heading into a period of discovery. 

&amp;#x200B;

I don't know if I should tell him I like him or not. I really want to, but I'm worried about what it will do to our friendship. I don't even know why I want to, but I do. I think it's just me wanting to get it off my chest. I'd be deluding myself to think that telling him would result in a relationship with him. That being said, he has told me that although he's straight, he keeps an open mind and would never say that he could never be with a guy.

&amp;#x200B;

It's so confusing for me. It feels like I go back and forth. But I think the 'back' portion is just my mind subconsciously trying to repress these feelings because I know it will only complicate things. One time I'll see him, and he's just my friend; he's just someone that I want to hang out with and talk to and have a good time with. Then the next time I see him...I just wanna grab him and kiss him, touch him, hold him--literally anything to just be close to him. But the biggest source of confusion for me is the fact that my brain keeps flip-flopping between seeing him as just a friend and seeing him as someone that I'm sexually attracted to and fantasize about. Yet even though I have those times where I see him as just a friend, I know that if he walked up to me and said ""hey I like you too, be my boyfriend"", I'd say yes in a heartbeat. And I know I shouldn't be thinking this way, but if there's even a 0.1% chance of being with him in any sort of way--that would never happen by not telling him, right?. I'm not banking on it though. I know it would be unhealthy to do that.

&amp;#x200B;

I've only recently came out to him and a couple of other close friends as bi. There have also been so many other things I've been struggling with and am still struggling with for which I've relied on my friends' help and support. I feel like adding this would be such an overload. He's already dealt with so much of my personal crap. My relationship with him didn't change from telling him I was bi. He was totally cool with it. But this would be another level obviously.

&amp;#x200B;

I don't want to ruin my friendship with him. He means so much to me. Even if I can't have him this way, I need him as a friend in my life. I can't lose him. While I don't think this would make him run away after years of friendship--who knows? It's a risk. There's always the what ifs. We've always hung out a lot just the two of us--what if he'll only want to spend time with me in a group, where he doesn't have to be alone with me? What if it's too awkward or uncomfortable for him to be around me at all? What if he's too weirded out by it to be my friend anymore? Should I just not bother telling him? But it eats me alive some nights keeping it all in.

&amp;#x200B;

Has anyone dealt with this before? Did you tell him or not? Girls, did you tell her or not? What happened when you did tell them? How do you manage ongoing feelings if you didn't tell them? If you did tell them, how did you balance the feelings with friendship assuming you couldn't be with them the way you desired? 

&amp;#x200B;

I know every situation is different but it would just help to hear other people's stories who have dealt with the same thing I'm going through. With the way I feel right now, as into him as I am and as good as it feels to imagine being with him, I almost wish I could erase all these feelings from my head. I don't want to be ashamed of how I feel but right now I'm just so scared of the consequences. Bless anyone who read all that.",bisexual
I AM BISEXUAL!!!,After months of questioning myself I can finally say with certainty that I am bisexual! ,bisexual
Heteroromantic Bi guy,"I have always had a sexual attraction for men but didn't really consider myself bi because I had no romantic interest in men. Heteroromantic bisexual seems to be a good description of how I feel. A few months ago I decided to finally try and find a guy to explore my interest in MM sex. I thought it would be fairly easy to find someone like myself who wanted more than a random hookup, but less than a relationship. But I was very wrong! Am I that unusual? It seems like there must be more guys out there like me, but I have not found them. Are you out there or am I looking for a different type of unicorn. I am feeling discouraged so if you are out there, let me know, so I don't give up.",bisexual
"So, I outed myself a little today...","I was at a birthday party with my daughter and I was talking to someone else there.  Just to give important background here, my daughter is autistic and a good percentage of the guests, including the birthday girl, have special needs.  Anyway, the woman is a one-on-one for another girl at the party.  I forget how we got into the discussion, but she mentioned a girlfriend.  I had figured she was gay, and I was right.  I mentioned my husband, but threw in a ""but I like girls too.""  I don't remember my exact words, but it was something like that.  I've never admitted that out loud to anyone in real life except my husband.  I survived and am only mildly flipping out internally.  I think it may have had something to do with the wine there and the fact that I'm about 99% sure the DJ was a lesbian too.  I swear my brain short-circuited.  I'm probably staying in the closet, at least for the most part, but admitting it out loud wasn't as scary as I thought.",bisexual
Desiree Akhavan’s new show is the bisexual TV drama we needed. Five bi and queer writers discuss what Channel 4’s (in the UK: it will be on Hulu in the US) *The Bisexual* means to them.,,bisexual
For those that have come out to their spouse...,"How did you do it? I’ve pretty much come to terms that I’m going to come tell my wife I’m bi but I’m struggling with the logistics of it. I would just like to hear your stories. Did you do it over a dinner? Did you get away for a weekend? Did you say if just randomly one evening while in bed? After sex? 

I’m just struggling with the how and when of it all. Help!",bisexual
My friends. I don't think I'll come out to them anytime soon. My last post was exactly about being bi but dating the opposite gender.,,bisexual
THIS bisexual is definitely confused.,"Hi, I'm bisexual. I'm going on 3/4 months identifying that way. 

I've been trans my whole life (AMAB, binary trans female), but I've spent years in total denial about it. During that time, I was repulsed by the idea of being attracted to men. I was open to the possibility (or at least I thought I was) but looking at men did nothing for me. On the other hand, it was very easy to experience arousal by looking at women. I'm still working out how much of that was repression. 

About six or seven months ago, I finally accepted to myself that I wasn't cis. My attraction to men opened up pretty much overnight. 

My sexuality right now is confusing. When I watch porn, it's either gay men, solo women, or MF. 

If I'm attracted to someone in public, it's probably 99.9% of the time a woman. 

I don't really find male faces attractive. All the rest of men I'm totally into, but /r/LadyBoners, for example, mostly does very little for me. I honestly don't get what's appealing about a strong jawline or whatever, but this might have something to do with the decade and a half I spent hating my own. Lol.

At the same time, I don't really have any active interest in sex with women. I can't really imagine dating women. It just doesn't seem right to me. 

Has anyone else had any experiences similar to mine? ",bisexual
I’m heteroflexible,"I’m bi for balls and I might suck a dick. But I’m also hella into girls. Wish I was more okay with experimenting, but my taste in guys is so specific. Can anyone relate?",bisexual
A letter to the man who kissed me last night,"MY SEXUALITY IS NOT FOR YOUR FUCKING ENTERTAINMENT. 

I was in love with my ex. What we did sexually is none of your fucking business. Me being attractive to you should have absolutely zero to do with what I did with her, or any other girl, or any other GUY for that matter. How dare you explicitly tell me that you’ve never been with a bi girl before but want to “learn some things” from me. 

I did not CHOOSE to “go that way”. It wasn’t like I was 100% straight and one day decided that I liked vaginas because I wasn’t getting enough dick. I’ve been bi for as long as you’ve been straight.

My sexuality is not some sort of novelty. How dare you.
",bisexual
Are there any reddit bi chat rooms?,,bisexual
"Since I came out to myself, I've noticed my daydreams change.","A month or so ago, I finally accepted that I was bisexual. I don't find guys romantically attractive, but I do occasionally get in the mood to sleep with one. My feelings for guys have always been either friendship or sexual, with nothing inbetween. 

Recently though I've been daydreaming about guys, non sexually. Like, just falling asleep in a guys arms. I don't know if it's my tastes shifting, my mood, or some internalised biphobia fading away, but it's nice. ",bisexual
"I'm done being ""just curious""","Okay so here I am (14 m) and my weeaboo ass over here would fuck sakura any day of the week but you know what? naruto and sasuke are pretty damn hot too. My point is I realized naruto and sasuke were actually hot this entire time lmao. But in all seriousness I have a question, I'm officially coming out right now but is it normal to still like girls more than boys even though I like both?",bisexual
Just attended my first pride event yesterday!," Granted it was a trans-pride march (existrans, Paris) and I was there as an ally; but after living for 18 years in the middle East it just felt so overwhelming that I can't put how I  into words. 

 It's been a nearly month since I moved to Paris (1st year college, hopefully never turning back ever) and I slowly started to feel more and more at home; meeting other bi/gay people, being accepted as I am, etc. Not saying there is no homophobia these days in Europe, but at least people wanting you dead are a fringe group instead of your government. Yesterday was really the big event for me, it made me realise how lucky I am compared to some of my friends back home. Seeing all these thousands of people being unapologetically gay af really brought a tear to my eye.  

",bisexual
I lowkey wish I was asexual and aromantic,"I just feel like having no feelings at all would be so much easier for me than being attracted to anyone. I'd gladly give up the happy moments to get rid of the feelings of sadness and being down about the way I feel. If you can't tell, I'm feeling that right now.

I just kinda need somewhere to rant. I'm having my biweekly feelings of deep sadness and self-loathing about my attraction to the guy I like. I kinda wish I could just end the attraction, then I'd be so much happier and I'd be free of my worry and sadness. I kinda just want to pour chemicals into my eyes to blind myself so I can never see this guy again (sorry for the graphic image, I probably won't actually do that, I was just thinking about it in the car). I hate these feelings. Why am I like this?",bisexual
"Being bisexual: your stories. A video by Canadian Bisexual YouTuber, Alayna Fender (MissFenderr)",,bisexual
Bisexuals in a gay relationship:,"How does that work for you? Did you partner know that you were bisexual before hand? I’m a bisexual man and married to a gay man, and only cane out about my attraction to women about four years into our relationship. He knew I dated girls before him and it’s been a little bit of a rocky road for us to get to a good comfortable place but am curious to hear how others in a similar situation has dealt with it. 

My husband and I have always been open to playing to others and he’s been supportive of me exploring that aspect of my sexuality as long as it’s together and he’s included. There was a fear he had that I would one day realize I’d want to leave him for a woman, and that’s just not plausible because I love him more than anything and I am purely homo-romantic. ",bisexual
Room decorating: part 2. Now less wrinkles 🏳️‍🌈,,bisexual
"The Bisexual. Trailer for a new series on Channel 4 in the UK and Hulu in the US. The show is co-written and directed by Desiree Akhavan (she also stars as Leila, the bisexual of the show’s title).",,bisexual
UPDATE on accidentally coming out over Snapchat,"This is the [original ](https://www.reddit.com/r/bisexual/comments/9nkzs6/came_out_on_snapchat_but_never_realized_i_had/?st=JN954DRL&amp;sh=81f08e03) post.

Thanks for all the feedback and support, it really is amazing knowing that people out there have gone through and are going through similar stuff. After i originally posted what happened my mom sent me a rather insensitive text about how could i not tell my parents first. This was followed by a call from my dad who was blatantly angry about “the lack of respect” for not coming out to them first. After a day of awkward phone calls, we’ve made some progress. They are excepting of whatever I am, but a little confused on someone being attracted to both sexes. Throughout all of this my uncle Ben has been constantly assuring me of his love and support. I’m lucky to have a great family and thanks for being along for the ride! ",bisexual
Help! I have my first big crush and no idea how to deal with it...,"Hi friends! So I (23F) came out to my mom (unexpectedly, but it went great) about a month ago. Ever since I have wanted to come out to a few more people (my brother, best friends) but I literally left the country a day later for work (it was planned, I didn't just jet off after telling her lol) and I won't be back until Thanksgiving. Fingers crossed I can work up the courage to tell my brother and a friend or two then! 

Anyways, all of that is to say that since I came out to my mom I have developed my first actual crush on another female and I have no idea how to proceed or if I should because we don't actually know each other. We did go to the same medium sized university (6,000 or so students, graduated last year) so we have tons of mutual friends. She seems amazing, is beautiful, and I think that we have a lot in common. I know who she is because she is very out and proud and even made a video about it that friends shared online. There is a slight chance she would know who I am but I'm not counting on it. Although, I did request to follow her on Instagram the other day (my heart was pounding through my chest) and she followed me back, so that's I guess a good sign? I know I sound like a pre-teen but, to be fair, I have never had a crush, like, ever.

Basically, I really just have no idea how to proceed or if I even should. I see a few different options here and maybe you guys can see something I'm not. 1. I wait until Thanksgiving when I come out to a friend from school and see if she has mutual friends who could see if she might be interested. I'm not okay with going directly to mutual friends because, well, I'm not out. Or my friend could at least help me figure out what to say or if I'm even being rational. 2. I send her a message on Insta. I am fully aware that this would, technically, be the easiest option, but it feels so scary and I have no idea what to say. The positive to this one is that she posted on National Coming Out Day that anyone could message her if they wan't to talk, but I don't want to be too forward or for it to be weird. 3. I stop acting like a child and get over it. I would love for this to be a valid option but at the same time I really feel like I need to do something.

My biggest concern is that it would seem creepy to message her out of the blue. Also, I don't know how she would feel about my being mostly in the closet (for now). I just wish there were someone to help me feel out this entire situation but it would definitely be out of my comfort zone to talk to my mom about. I've been way too stressed about this and just want to at least have a plan of action. I really do apologize for sounding like a child but I'm just really lost - thanks for your help, friends!",bisexual
An essay about my late discovery of my sexuality because I don't really like anyone,"I was never much of a ""feeler"". I don't really get sad, I don't really get happy and that's fine, it saves me from a lot of trouble. So, I don't usually have crushes, besides very especific fictional characters.

When I was younger, my friends would always pester me about who I liked and when I said nobody their argument was ""you just don't want to tell us"" and keep bothering me. So my 8yo brain just came to the conclusion: I will pick someone cute and just say I like him when they bother me. And did this. Picked a random guy from my school every year from until my 2rd year in highschool. Until one of them liked me back. And then I started dating him, cuz that's why you're supposed to do when you like each other, right? 

Anyway, we will me right back to the timeline: I never had a problem finding guys and girls hot. But that's the thing: I don't really liked anyone besides this guys I arbitrarily choosed (because of the compulsory heterosexuality), so I don't really could love girls, could I? And most of all, I love sex, but I'm not a chaser. If it comes to me that's awesome but I don't have a time that I think ""oh I would really fuck that"" or ""I need sex"". And no girl had even tried to kiss me at that point (I might have a very straight face, besides having the traditional bissexual haircut) so I didn't even consider. 

Oh. Now that I think about it, I just have been with people that already liked me. I don't usually consider kissing a mouth if the person hadn't shown any interest.

Back to the timeline: after a looong time, I broke up with the boy, because, well, I had never loved him. I told him that I did, but it was because he was very sad that I didn't and I didn't know what else to do. He was very nice and I didn't want to break his heart, but that's what I ended up doing anyway. Some time later, after rejecting some ""dating seriously"" proposals of guys that I was already kinda going out with, I realised that I might not be a romantic person. Maybe I was incapable of love. And that brought me back from a old thought I had: that I couldn't be bissexual because I didn't LIKED girls. Oh man, I had never even liked boys. I never had felt represented because people say ""love is love"" and ""the right to love who you love"" to represent the LGBTQ+ community but no one talked about aromatic being a thing. 

I still am kinda bummed because I end up breaking hearts because people what something more, even though I always make it clear that I don't do that, that I can't like anyone. But somehow they always think I'm joking, nobody takes me seriously. Well, I could be in a relationship, I'm quite a monogamous person, but they want some emotional connection that I can't give. 

BTW, the first time I kissed a girl, I had already realised those things and she was almost screaming at my face about the bissexual people at the party. And in the middle of it I thought ""yep yep, BI, very much that thing""",bisexual
"do I want her, or do I want to be her?","I've been trying to figure out if I'm bi or not. I'm defo attracted to dudes, but I dunno about girls. 

More masculine girls usually catch my eye, but I can't tell if it's because they're ~butchspiration~ for me as a butch lady, or if I actually am into them.

Anybody got any tips for making sense of the ""admiration v.s. attraction"" confusion?",bisexual
Which fictional characters made you question your sexuality?,,bisexual
I am bisexual I suppose.,"Is this necessary for me to do? Do I need to tell me single mother who already has too much going on right now? I feel like who I am romantically involved with is my business and shouldn't concern anyone else.

Just kind of venting here ;)",bisexual
Confused about being bi and asexual,So I used to identify as bisexual before realizing I'm actually asexual. When I first identified as ace I split my attraction and thought that my romantic identity was bi and my sexual identity was asexual. Recently though I've been having some confusion about that. Is it possible that instead of splitting my identity between romantic and sexual I could identify as both of them together? Also if I can would it be a kind of appropriation if I were to do things like use the bi flag alongside the asexual flag and be part of the bi community too or should I stay as just asexual? Basically instead of being a biromantic asexual can I be both bi and asexual with them being the same thing instead of one being used to describe the other?,bisexual
What do you do on dating websites where they give you a choice of male female interest?,I'm faced with this often. I'm bisexual I want to be shown both men and women I might be interested in not just men. I've had little luck with guys so what to do?,bisexual
Everyday bi mood,,bisexual
I'm only slightly attracted to guys' physical looks. I am so much more turned on by the thought of dominating another man.,"Yeah, guys aren't that cute to me. But, the thought of manhandling and suppressing and, yknow, ******* another man. What a rush.

Gotta try it sometime.",bisexual
I really enjoy women but don't think i should try to date them anymore,"At a time in my life when i really can and must accept my sexuality, it just makes more sense to date men now that i can see myself being in a relationship with them. the truth is women don't have what i crave anatomically and i don't think it's fair to be wishing my gf's had a penis like i have in the past. 

For the past 7 years i have been ""technically"" gay and leaning much more that way since coming out to myself around 6 yrs ago, when no matter how much i tried and she wanted it, i couldn't have sex with a woman i was dating because I really wanted to be with a guy. I was lying to myself and her when I started dating her because at the time I was regularly using a dildo and my sexual fantasies where 100% gay",bisexual
Julie d'Aubigny - A Bisexual Badass,,bisexual
I think there should be a stickied FAQ for newcomers to the sub.,"Stuff like. ""I'm more attracted to one gender than another, am I bi"" the difference between pansexuality and bisexuality and stuff like that.",bisexual
I came out to my parents,"So since I came out to my friends and brothers I've been contemplating when I should come out to my parents. I honestly had no idea how they would react. I woke up at 7 in the morning and my parents were up so I decided I'd just do it then because there was no point in postponing it. They told me to go back to bed and that we'd talk about it later. I listened to music for a while and was nervous as fuck. I got up later and went to talk to them. I expected them to launch into full question mode but my dad just wanted to know what this meant for me going forward, so I told them that I finally felt comfortable with my face and body since I figured it out. They weren't really mad or anything so I asked them if they were fine with it because I couldn't tell and they said they were mostly worried about how much harder life was going to be and what I'd have to deal with so I told them I was ready and then my mom changed the subject (not in avoidance, just so I wouldn't fixate on it) and we talked about the concert my brothers and I went to last night (Hippo Campus, which was lit). And then we just went about our day and I'm super happy.",bisexual
"Realized I (F) am bi in a relationship with accepting straight bf, what do I do/don’t?","Hi all,

As the title states: I recently realized (a.k.a. after multiple crushes, kisses and past threesomes with other girls it finally sparks in my head that I’m not so straight after all...) that I am bi. I came out to my boyfriend and my best friend, who both pretty much responded with “??? Yeah, I know...?” so that’s as good as it could have gone. However, I don’t really want to officially come out to other people too, unless they’d ask, I don’t feel very compelled to discuss my sexuality all that much and rather not state it publicly somewhere, because I’m afraid to be fetishized or treated awkwardly.

But! And this is what I’d really appreciate your advice on: my boyfriend is totally fine with me further exploring my attraction to ladies, which is also something I’m becoming more and more interested in. My perfect scenario would be to continue my LTR with my boyfriend while casually dating/having FWBs with girls. But I have some reservations on how to go about this, because I absolutely want to avoid hurting anyone:

- For myself personally, I do not see a life-long future in a relationship with a woman. It may be long term next to a relationship with a man, but I don’t see myself prioritizing it. So I don’t want to give false impressions.

- I’d rather not be too public about being bi or use dating sites for hook-ups, partly because I don’t want to accidentally string anyone along, partly because people know I’m in a committed relationship and I don’t want anyone to think I’m cheating.

Is what I want a good idea to do at all? Do any of you have experience/an opinion about this kind of thing? I feel like if I’m just upfront about my situation it should be fine, but I also think it’s going to be difficult getting my interest across to other girls without being “in your face” about it when I just stated I have a boyfriend and I don’t yet know it they’d be interested at all. How do you think I could go about this?
 
Sorry if this is a bit rambly, and I really hope I’m not offending anyone, I’m not sure yet what I want and should do, so any advice, tips, perspectives are welcome!",bisexual
"Hello, not a bisexual, but in desperate need of advice about bisexuals","Hello, just the other day my sister wh o I’ve been very close with my whole life came out to me as a bisexual, and not just me, our entire family. From what I hear I know it can be a very hard time in you peoples life and I’ve tried to be a supportive sister but it’s just very weird and new to me. That’s not even the big problem, my father, is a very very very catholic man and he is very very very not ok with my sister being a gay. And he has raised us all to be very anti gay people so he freaked out when she told him and told her it’s just a phase (which I hear is not what you should do) and she’ll marry a man like she’s supposed to, and then after my sister left the room he told the rest of us that if we were to support her life style he’d kick us out as well, and I am in no position to be kicked out, I’m pregnant with my daughters and still trying to finish high school, but worst of all I don’t know if deep down I am ok with it, I know I should be, and maybe it’s just how I was raised but I she’s not the same person to me anymore and I don’t know what to do because I love my sister with all my heart but if she lives the bisexual life style she’s going to be banished from the house! I don’t know if this is where this should get posted but uh, help???",bisexual
Why do you think there are more bi girls than lesbians?,"While there are more gay guys than bi guys.

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
Concerned about intimacy with another man,"I’m a bisexual guy in my early twenties who is just now beginning to talk with and date men. I’ve never been physical with a guy and it has me pretty nervous. I was in a long term relationship with a woman and I’m worried I won’t have the same romantic intimacy as I did with her with a man. For example, I’m worried I won’t enjoy something like post sex cuddling with a man or I’ll find myself feeling uncomfortable. The idea of it excites me and I’m looking forward to it but I can’t help but worry there won’t be that... spark? Has anyone else experienced this? Is there a difference in the way you feel about either gender?",bisexual
Just saw this,,bisexual
Falling for a friend?,"18 F here! I think I may be falling for a friend of mine. She and I have very similar personalities and, when we do not have something in common, we tend to be opposites of each other (but in a way which complements the other: for example, I'm short and she's tall). She and I are both very affectionate people; we kiss each other on the forehead and cheek quite often and tell each other how much we adore each other, but she and I are both this affectionate with others, too. I don't want to ruin our friendship. I don't even really know for sure if what I feel is love because the one time someone said they were in love with me and I was in love with them, they were grooming me. They groomed me for over two years and completely decimated my ability to understand how relationships work. I feel so confused. What should I do?",bisexual
Found Some Interesting Bi Stuff on Amazon,,bisexual
"I really wanna come out to my dad, because we 're best friends, but this is the one thing he would disagree with right next to crack.","""please don't be gay dude"". LOL WHAT THE FUCK DOES THAT EVEN ENTAIL

",bisexual
Coming to terms with myself. How should i tell my fiancee?,"I've been going back and forth with myself and feelings with my sexuality for years (since 12. I'm 24 now) and i think I'm ready to say that I'm bisexual. I've always been the kind of person who is attracted to people based off of a number of things but it has to be the right combination otherwise there is nothing there. (To make a long explaination short, they need to be my type physically and mentally otherwise it's a complete mental block for me. They are strictly on a platonic level with me.) Ive felt this way about both men and women but have only recently come to terms that the way I've felt about women is the same as men. 

I don't want to go further into that right now though because this would be a novel lol. Either way, I'm bi and I want to tell my future husband about it. He is my best friend and i feel strongly that he is who i am meant to be with and raise a family with but biologically I'm still attracted to women (and men). How do i go about doing this?? He is the most understanding and supportive person i know but I'm a very anxious person so i guess I'm really just looking for words of encouragement. 

Thanks! This is a throwaway because I can lol",bisexual
Todays sunset,,bisexual
Steak sauce label at Texas Roadhouse,,bisexual
Do you feel like your parents would accept you more if you were gay,"I guess I just wanted to know if anybody feels this way about their parents, or any important people in their life. My mother is married to a woman, shortly after she informed us that she was with a woman she sat us down and told us that none of us should ever feel afraid to come out to her. At some point in high school I realized I was bi-curious and then in College I developed feelings for another woman at which point I realized I was bi. I came out to my mom in passing because I didn’t really feel like it was important as I was not in a same sex relationship, she didn’t really acknowledge it. I’ve spoken to her about same sex crushes I have had. A part of me felt like she thought I was just trying to be different, or seeking attention and that she didn’t really believe me. Because I have never been in a same sex relationship.

About 2 years ago my younger sister came out to our mom as bisexual, my sister told me that her response was “I knew that if one of my kids would be LGBT it would be you” which my sister found odd as she knew I was bi. But somehow to me this affirms that my mother doesn’t fully believe me. My sister is in a same sex relationship now but my mom accepted her before that was the case. 

My mom still loves me, she still supports me I am super grateful for her, but I just feel like she still sees me as some dramatic teenager trying to get attention and be different for the sake of being different, which does upset me a bit. 

I’m not so much seeking advice, I just want to know if anybody else feels like their parents don’t fully accept their sexuality and might even accept it more if they were gay?",bisexual
honestly am I bi or just really into butt stuff,"So my question is sort of ""am I bi"" but also not

Like, when I'm sober, 9x/10 I'm really only about girls in yoga pants but then that 1x/10 I'll just be walking around downtown checking out all the cute boys. 

And then when I'm drunk (y'know like I am now) I really REALLY want to make out with all of my straight guy friends

 but my thing is that there's this gap between ""oh fuck all my friends are super hot"" and ""ah fuck I really want a dick in my ass"" where I really don't find naked guy body that attractive

like, do I want to get fucked in the ass? abso-fucking-lutely. Any day of the week. Do I want to be tied up? hell yeah! But do I like gay and BDSM porn? no, ew. Seeing other people in those situations is a total turnoff, even tho I really am kind of up for being choked by strong hands

So like I'm pretty sure I'm bi and kinky now that I've wrote all this but AS I SAID I was doing shots until like 4 so this is well within the sphere of ""drunk /u/firedrake242 on his porn alt really wants to kiss boys"" so when I wake up at noon tomorrow I'm pretty sure I might not feel this way

also unrelated super into bbw porn and I don't know how that slots into any of this like I will definitely bang traditionally hot girls irl but also I'll check out fat girls and also guys lots of guys

so like I'm really asking in a really meandering way: how do I describe my sexuality?

cuz like guys out on the street? 😍😍😍 girls out on the street? 😍😍😍 naked girls? 😍😍😍 but naked guys unless their dicks are already in my ass nah not super interested except for like maybe two or three times a month

real quick just now I was using the kensly or whatever his name was test and I feel like I'm more or less a 1-2 when I'm sober and like a 3-4 when I'm drunk and also super super super kinky like I can't jerk off without being aphyxiated almost to the point of blackout levels of kink

also I'm an drunk 18yo Male college student and it's been a long ass night so goodnight and happy knowing everything about my sexuality",bisexual
Selfie Sunday!,"[Probably an oldie but hey!](https://i.imgur.com/F0wUIfH.jpg)

&amp;#x200B;

I hope the week had some joy to it :D

&amp;#x200B;

For information on how to help with the border, check out this [page](https://www.ajc.com/news/national/trump-and-immigration-how-help-immigrant-children/LoIKme5lhXLI1d9KqkkPRK/) and this one right [here!](https://www.ajc.com/news/national/trump-and-immigration-how-help-immigrant-children/LoIKme5lhXLI1d9KqkkPRK/)

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",bisexual
Can anyone recommend​ a dating site that lets you select men &amp; women?,"I'm finding with a lot of them you have to select either men or women. I want to see both! I'm over Tinder &amp; Bumble.   


Context: Sydney, Australia, 28, female. Thanks in advance.",bisexual
This days yearning for new friends,As of late I have been yearning to build new friendships especially in my local area regardless if they are straight or LGBTQ. But it seems hard this days to even do that .  Any advice ??,bisexual
(24M) Never dated before. Need advice for starting out.,"I'm not sure if this is the right sub to post this at but if you have any suggestions where I could get help please tell me.

I was pretty sheltered when I was a kid (being homeschooled by religious parents); so I never got the chance date anyone. I'm a little socially awkward and have trouble approaching people. (Though I don't have trouble talking once someone breaks the ice) So I haven't really taken much initiative myself. However. I have had a huge self confidence boost since I came out as Bi and I really want to try to learn how to date other people.

I've been living in the SF Bay area since January. But I really don't have any friends irl here. I don't really have any idea where or how to start. I'm kinda clueless. I'm also a virgin, so I have literally 0 experience.

My interests are anime, video games, and furries. If that helps at all. :p",bisexual
"I'm not your gay best friend, I'm trying to have sex with you","Jesus Christ, Diana, I'm not being subtle either!",bisexual
To anybody who’s questioning,"Don’t worry, don’t think that we’re some exclusive club, if you think your bi than your bi, and you’ll be welcome here.",bisexual
"Realising I'm sexually attracted to girls too, after my first boyfriend.","I'm 18 and started my first relationship about six months ago with a boy I like a lot. I've always known I like guys and its whats felt natural for as long as I can remember. I never questionned it. I still like guys a lot, but all of a sudden, girls are really attractive now and I want to kiss them. I notice girls in public but never did before. I'm thinking maybe I'm just horny..but ive always been horny so im not really sure. I don't know if Id want to have a romantic relationship with a girl. Right now its just physical attraction. Can anyone relate to this or give any advice?? ",bisexual
I wonder how many people are in my same position right now,"It’s almost 3 o’clock early Sunday morning where i am and have had an excessive mental breakdown about having to go back to school Monday morning and just life in general and I’m just done being what I once was but it’s hard to move forward so now I’m just like stopped and I’m just digging down instead of moving forward, do you feel me? All the while I’m listening to Dodie radio on Pandora which apparently mostly only plays sad songs. The mental breakdown is over and has been for a while and now I’m just laying on my bed swinging my feet over the edge and eating burnt pizza trying to stay awake. I just kinda needed to rant and tell someone or everyone idk. And for some reason I’m oddly kinda mad because I wanna get a very different style of hair than I already have and like 3 facial piercings and I feel like someones going to stop me that’s why I’m mad but like I’m pretty not? Honestly i don’t want to go to sleep and I want to go for a walk although I’m terrified of going only and the only person I’m friends with close by is asleep. For some reason it made sense to me to put this here because I’m bi and Dodie is bi so I guess it made sense? Idk. Sorry if theres grammar mistakes. Feel free to hmu oh yea 14f",bisexual
I [17M] just came out as bi to my mum,and im very happy about it :),bisexual
"Been Awhile since i posted, My life is totally changed.","So its been a few months since i came out as Bi, My (now ex wife) didn't take it to well and after trying a few more times we decided on going our separate ways. This was hard for both of us as we have a newborn baby, before anyone says anything, i am 100% supporting my daughter. I left my exwife with our life savings, house, everything in it. I packed a 4x9 uhaul and my suv and moved out. 

&amp;#x200B;

The last 2 months has been extremely hard, fighting depression and endless sleepless nights wondering if this was the right decision, it is not all bad! Me and my exwife still ""Love"" each other. I care about her and the baby deeply :). She has found another partner, but promised me the baby will never grow up knowing that is her ""real"" dad. She wants me around as much as possible, for our baby. I have also met someone else and we have a nice relationship going, He's been their for my worst nights depression wise and stuck by me and understands my relationship with my exwife and cannot wait to be part of my daughters life. I also met someone on here who we both call and talk almost everyday!

&amp;#x200B;

So at first it may seem everything has gone to shit and nothing is working out for you, but at the end of the day we are who we are and cannot be changed or should change anything. Stay positive, not everyday will be bad :) If anyone needs someone to talk to can PM me, maybe i can help :)",bisexual
Reconsidering...,"I thought I may be Bi when I was 19 (I'm 29 now), so I sought out a stranger, exchanged some sucking and I lost my hard on, regretting the whole thing after. Looking back I he was too pushy considering he knew I hadn't done anything with a guy before (and could have showered as I'd not smelt another dick before 😂).

So yeah I decided at age 23 I'd have another go with someone I knew. He wasn't as pushy, but did get that way at times. I played about once and lost it and then again which took me to Cumming, which I regretted instantly.

I wanted to get fucked but it didn't happen. I've now got a gf for 6 years who sees to my ass with toys, which for ages I thought would fill the gap (haha). It's great but I'm thinking maybe I just wasn't ready with what to expect from men, or maybe I just found the wrong men, or even I may have had some internalised homphobia towards myself?

Whatever the case I'm now thinking I am bi even if I'm not that attracted to men, the thought of it really gets me going and I live gay porn. So I must be bi, right?

These are my thoughts anyways lol",bisexual
Is there a way to tell whether a guy is bisexual or just gay?,"Hi there. So I’m a girl who’s really into feminine men which most often leads to me crushing on bisexual/gay men. Currently, I have a crush on a guy who I’m 100% sure is attracted to men. However, I always got the feeling that he was attracted to me. I’d always catch him staring at me, checking my reaction after he’s made a joke, and I could tell that he got jealous when I was giving my attention to another guy. He also would find random excuses to come talk to me. I don’t want to jump to conclusions about anyone’s sexuality, but I also don’t feel like we’re close enough where I can straight up ask him. Is there a way to find out without being so straight-forward? Does it sound like he’s attracted to me, or does he just want to be friends? ",bisexual
Annnnd were all whoring around again 🤦‍♂️,,bisexual
"Extra History has done a video on everyone's favourite sword-fighting, opera-singing, 17th-century bisexual, Julie d'Aubigny!",,bisexual
My life,"I’m bi and I’m happy, I’m taken I have a beautiful girlfriend soon to be wife and we been together for almost two years now I’m so fucking lucky to have her, she’s seriously the best thing that’s ever happened to me😍🌏🔐💍💕",bisexual
"I'm confused, could someone help please.","I (17m) am from India, my family is extremely conservative, my mother is very homophobic and overprotective to the point where she wouldn't let me have strawberry ice cream because it was pink, yeah I know it's fucked. 

But for a couple years I have been attracted to other guys. I haven't told anyone at all and when I masturbate to guys I feel so miserable after like I did something horrible, and I just cry for a while. I'm afraid if I tell my parents they'll hate me, even if they don't show it, there will always be some form of shame or disgust towards me. My sister who's probably the most progressive person in my family, said she would freak out if I came out. 

I'm really confused and anxious and afraid. I might come across as irrational, and for that I apologise. I need help with this.

 I'm also sorry if my English is a bit off. ",bisexual
Finally added some bi flair to my dorm room :D 🏳️‍🌈,,bisexual
I'M PANICKING,"Hi everyone um exCUSE ME BUT HOW DO YOU DO THIS?! I switched my Tinder to both men and women about a year ago, shortly after realizing that I was bi. So far it's literally been the only way I've had any contact with women in a romantic capacity because my gaydar is V HORRIBLE and I'm convinced the whole world is straight and none of the girls are actually attracted to me. Aaaaanyhoozle, there have been very few girls who've come across my Tinder who were actually queer - most of them are just straight girls looking for friends. Which is great, but like...I think you're *hot, Taylor*, I don't want to just get coffee and never kiss you. So this girl FINALLY comes across my Tinder and she is stunning. Absolutely stunning, and explicitly says in her bio that she's lesbian. So I sent her a message, and she responded playfully saying that if she loses the bet, she'll buy me a drink. HOW DO I RESPOND AND SAY SOMETHING ABOUT WANTING THE DRINK WHETHER I WIN OR LOSE, AND NOT SOUND LIKE A TOTAL CREEP?! My heart can't handle this pressure. I quit. AND possibly the most terrifying part, if I manage to not scare her off, there's a chance that she'll actually *want* to go get drinks and THEN I HAVE TO GO MEET HER which would be my first real date with a woman anD SERIOUSLY GUYS I'M PANICKING

&amp;#x200B;

\\\*hyperventilates into a paper bag\*",bisexual
Trying to ride the bi-cycle without falling off,"Hey /r/bisexual, I'm a long-time listener, first-time caller. I have been dealing with a problem for awhile, and figured this would be the right community to reach out to, since I've seen many of you deal with similar.

So long story short, I'm a currently hetero-paired bisexual woman. I've been out for about ten years, and my boyfriend is aware and supportive. My current issue is about the cycle of attraction. I go through periods where my ""focus"" of interest switches between genders in intensity. Right now, for interest, I am feeling 100% WLW, undeniably all about the ladies.

I've always felt a certain level of not ""being bi right"" because of my relationships, which I realize is problematic. On top of that, I struggle with acknowledging the validity of my attraction to women while being happily partnered to a man. It feels like dissonance that I  can't help being **so** attracted to women around me, while struggling to feel the same for my boyfriend right now (whom I love and am also really attracted to.) So what do you all do? How do those in long-term relationships balance a shift in attraction (20 guys/80 girls for me right now) while still being a good partner?",bisexual
Am I bisexual?,"This might not be allowed. Sorry.

I think I might be bisexual, I say I am, but I don’t know. I like men and woman and would fuck both, but I’m confused. Am I bisexual? I feel like I am.

Edit : I’m sorry for the stupid question, I’m just unsure about this. It’s the same with friends, even if they are 100% a friend I will still hesitate to call them one ",bisexual
"Not the bisexual hero we deserve, but the one we need",,bisexual
Pretty sure my crush has a crush on my best friend :'D,SOS,bisexual
Why am I so unattractive?,,bisexual
Hard to make friends when ur bi?,"Does anyone else have a hard time making friends? I feel like the way someone can be shy with the opposite sex is the way I am with everyone cuz I'm attracted to both hahaha... I dont know if that makes any sense..

Before I realized I was bi, I was really nervous around guys in general, and then I realized i liked girls too so I became nervous around them too and long story short I have no friends now hahaha

(All my friends from high school I've disconnected with because they moved away for uni)",bisexual
Being rubbish on coming out day,"I definitely missed the actual coming out day, so last night I had one too many and decided it was high time I came out on Facebook!

I should preface I don’t much care for Facebook, it’s primarily for family I rarely see and coworkers to post things that I can’t quite care about. Woke up this morning and had a bit of a panic attack over what I’d done - silly enough I’ve been out to friends for... many years and I’ve know I’m bi since I was a kid. 

Despite my anxiety to see what coworkers and family had to say it was quite positive (with another coworker who set off my gaydar a little asserting bi solidarity) so that’s quite appreciated. 

It was weird to be fairly out about being bi for so long but having an offical “here’s who I am” to coworkers and family was a little scary at first but I’m grateful that the reaction was positive. I know many folks aren’t so fortunate so I’m here with y’all when shit sucks. 

Happy Saturday! Let’s bake some lemon bars. ",bisexual
How do you signal you’re bisexual?,"There’s no stereotypes to play into and short of wearing a flag as a cape everywhere I go, no one knows. When I’m with my girlfriend people assume I’m gay and when I’m alone people assume I’m straight. ",bisexual
I think this fits here,,bisexual
"r/CringeAnarchy: the subreddit that bullied and even made an attempt to kill the people of the LGBT community HAD BEEN QUARANTINED 15 DAYS AGO. Don't get your guard down though, Reddit is still trying to ban the rest of them and some of them are making attempts to evade the quarantine",,bisexual
Is there any bisexual Who played Simulacra ?,How did you Find the game.,bisexual
I’m pretty ambivalent about country but I’m sure lots of people here will like this song.,,bisexual
I think I'm pan or bi?,,bisexual
Epic historical bi woman,,bisexual
Who are some bad people who were also bisexual?,These people can be real or fictional.,bisexual
How does the bicycle work?,"Hey just your regular bi guy here, wondering how I can spend a whole week being attracted to women and the other week only men turn me on.
Any proven reasons for this?",bisexual
"Older, Bi and Figuring it out","I'm a 54 year old male who realized he was bisexual a few months ago.  Just having some random thoughts on the subject this morning.  I don't really overthink it a lot.  Just see where it leads.  I'm currently in an area where I don't know people, don't really fit in, and I didn't plan on being.  This is due to an elderly  relative, which I don't mind.  I stay to myself, work from home and mostly enjoy my solitude.  Haven't really explored same sex yet and am not in a rush.  It will happen if and when it happens.  It was a little chilly this morning for the first time...  When I woke up, I found myself thinking how nice it would have been to have a nice warm male body to cuddle up to!  Not even necessarily for sex, but simply to enjoy some intimate time.  I've never had the experience of sleeping with another guy like this and thought how nice it would feel.  ",bisexual
Crushing on a co-worker. Need advice,"Not a native speaker so bare with me. I’m a 29 year old male with not a lot of experiences when it comes to guys. Dated women but only ever have 2 short termed BF and those were in high school. I don’t usually get physically attracted to guy until I’m somewhat interest in them romantically. 
There is a really nice guy at work that recently caught my attention. Let call him M. M has always been very friendly and caring with me. He’s the first in the office to notice whether I’m upset or off of  my mood and be the first to try to cheer me up. He would always come up from behind and give me hugs and massages. Occasionally he would also grabs my love handles and jokingly tells me I’m getting fitter.  M is straight and started seeing a girl from out of state so I always chalked his behaviors up to a friendly bro type of thing. 
I’m in a relationship with an awesome girl so I never thought of M in a romantic way. But 2 months ago my girlfriend and I called off since she moved out of he country for a job with the army and I couldn’t  really picked up my life and go with her. Since then I been a bit mopey and M noticed so he been trying to cheer me up. Along the way I caught feelings for M ( stupid I know )and therefore starting to find him very attractive. 
I don’t know where to go from here. Even though I think M is straight he occasionally does things that indicate otherwise. Like caressing my face when no one is looking or tell me how adorable he finds me. Showing me pictures of his childhood or asking me for shoulder  rubs. Commenting on how he would go for me if I was a girl. This got me really confused and to make matters worse he been distance,and has not been as affectionate as he been before, for the last week since he found out my girlfriend left. 
How should I handle this? I don’t really want to jeopardize our friendships and hurt the office work flow. Should I check to see if he’s interested or should I just let it be? Am I reading too much into this and is just trying to fill a void that my girl left behind?",bisexual
So My School Does This Thing,"where on Friday night of homecoming week (this week) a bunch of students gather around one of the statues on campus and kiss somebody at midnight: your significant other, or a total stranger if you're single (like me).

Tonight I kissed a boy and then a girl. All things are in perfect balance.

Also, it was my first boy kiss, so I'm kind of reeling from that. Like. This is real. I'm bi. And I just did something to prove it to myself. It was brief and barely more than a peck, but it was so meaningful to me, and my heart's still pounding.",bisexual
"So I had to come out to my boss today. Scariest thing I’ve ever done, went better than expected.","I’m dating my first ever guy, we’ve been going out a week and we work together. I’ve never even kissed a guy before this and the whole things been kind of overwhelming. Which led to the mistake below.

So I broke up with evil ex gf (B) when I told her I was bi, she left me then and there telling me to “call her when I get over this phase”. 

I started very casually dating a gay guy at my work (J). He’d expressed and interest by being flirty before and we’d always had some sexual tension I guess. He asked me for a drink after work one night because I was kinda depressed from the break up and one thing led to another.

It’s been two weeks since that night, dude sex is awesome and I’ve been kind of making up for lost time, it feels odd being in a semi committed relationship this quickly and I guess there’s an element of rebound involved but I’ve discussed this with J and he’s happy with things as they are.

So this morning I was called into my bosses office to address the rumour that I was seeing someone at work and to discuss if it was appropriate, he was clear he both didn’t know who it might be and if the rumour was true and was just asking for clarification. I’ve never felt so scared in my life, palms sweating, lump in my throat, I almost decided to try and lie. Ended up being honest explaining the who, why and where and pretty much waited for a dressing down. Complete opposite, boss, a manly man with a savage temper and no filter was pretty shocked but really supportive. Asked me a bunch of questions, asked if he could do anything to help, made a minor change to the office structure so we weren’t breaking HR rules and sent me on my way.

Sorry for the wall of text, I just wanted to say, sometimes the most unexpected people can be the most decent and understanding.",bisexual
I'm confused if I'm bi or not. Please help!,"Hey guys f (20) over here! Lately I've been confused if I'm bisexual or not. The thought has usually come to mind, but I've usually dismissed it. However this time, I've been really wondering if I am or just curious. I have a boyfriend currently and I don't want to leave him because I really like him-maybe even more, I just hate saying that word. I've told him about this and he says maybe I am bisexual.  I am physically and emotionally attracted him and I do want a future with him. 

So a little more in detail on what I've been thinking about this past couple of weeks. I will admit I find both male and female attractive. However I believe I lean more towards the male side, I think more physically about men than I do about women. I usually find girls pretty but I would rather be friends with them and at most feel like a sister. 

I have went on a valentines date with a girl (last year) but I think it felt a little more platonic than anything. I wanted to try if I felt anything romantic with her but like I said, it felt more platonic. If you would ask me if I would go out on a date with a girl, I probably would say yes, but idk if I seek myself in a long term relationship with one. 

Sorry this was long, I hope you guys can help me out!",bisexual
I gotta rant for just a second...,"I'm at a banquet hosted by my university's lgbt club to celebrate the end of Coming Out Week, and a couple spaces away from me at my table is the bi female president of the club, who is currently dating a woman. The conversation she is in is currently speculating about the sexuality of another person who hangs out at the club, who is working out her sexuality but thinks she is bi.

Here's the thing - the president just asked ""Are you sure she's bi? She's dating a man..."" to which the (also bi) girlfriend gave kind of a disgusted expression.

Y'all. This is not ok. Don't do this, ok? Guys who identify as bi in straight relationships are still bi. Girls who identify as bi in straight relationships are still bi. **Don't discriminate against a bi person because they're currently in a straight relationship.** Ok? Ok.

Rant over.",bisexual
Last night was amazing,"Last night was so amazing for me. I know this isn't the usual type of post here, but it relates to my bisexuality and I kinda just want to talk about it because of how great it was.

The only thing I actually did last night was I went to a high school football game, but what happened before, during, and after was what was so great. The first great thing involved my friend I always drive to the games. We always have the greatest talks during the drives, either making lots of inappropriate jokes or talking about serious things. Well, both to and from the game, we had a very interesting conversation that I had been looking forward to for a while. He asked me a bunch of questions about my bisexuality and we talked about various aspects of it the whole time. He asked me what it was like, so I explained it to him both in general for everyone (teaching him about romantic vs sexual attraction, the bi cycle, and how a lot of people have preferences), then I told him about all of that stuff for me. Then, he figured out which guy I had a crush on, I told him the subtle things I do that kinda give it away if you know what to look for, he asked what I like about each gender, and we talked for a while about the religious side of it (since we're both Christians and everyone we know are too). It was a nerve-wracking conversation, but one I had been looking forward to for a long time, because I've never been able to talk about my bisexuality with anyone in real life before.

The other great thing that happened was at the game itself. It was cold (like 40 degrees Fahrenheit) and rainy at the game, so most of my friends that I expected to show up (four in total) didn't come. One did however, and it just so happened to be the aforementioned guy I have a crush on. And because of the way the bleachers were set up, we were pretty separate from the rest of the student section, so it was just us three in our own little group. And the three of us talked for the whole game. We didn't talk about anything specific, but we always had something. And it was amazing. I love any time I get to spend with this guy, and the fact that we weren't in a big group for once made it even better. I probably would've had a miserable time at the game because of the miserable conditions if he wasn't there, but because he was, I loved it. It was so great getting to be at a football game with just my friend who knows who I like and the guy that I like. My friend even told me that now that he knew what to look for, it was kinda obvious that l liked him. It was just so amazing. There's not much more to say about it other than how great it was. This guy just makes me so happy.

I don't know if this was the right place to post this, sorry if it wasn't. I just had to tell about what happened because it was the best night I've had in quite a while.",bisexual
Thought this was very interesting particularly the homosexuality being something you do not something you are,,bisexual
"Every time someone steps up and says who they are, the world becomes a better, more interesting place",,bisexual
"My girlfriend, idk what to do","This is my first time ever posting in this reddit but I truly believed this was hopefully the place to go I just don't know what to do my girlfriend is just always ripping into me about the clothes I want to wear. Like I have this lovely grey dress jacket but she always says she hates it because it makes me look to ""gay"" and it kinda hurts me she would even say that, and obviously that's not the only piece of clothing she hates but she just says some.Not so pleasent things about what I wear. And it .makes me feel quite uncomfortable,and I didn't know where else to post this. Please I would appreciate some advice thank you xx",bisexual
a subtle “queer + friendly” sticker for my water bottle,,bisexual
Yet another Bi-Cycle Question,"For background, I (37f) have realized only in the last year that i am bi. Of course, looking back, I can see it has been there all along and I just didn't recognize it. Anyways, I have had a deep attraction/crush on a female friend for about a year now and spent several months attracted to primarily females. In the past few weeks I notice that I am no longer finding females as attractive and am back to being attracted to men. I have learned that this is a typical bi-cycle. However- I am still deeply attracted to my friend and while it has lessened a bit, it is still a very strong crush. Is this normal to experience when a bi-cycle ends? I am confused all over again! Thanks for any input.",bisexual
Grindr never ceases to amaze me (this is after I told him I wasn’t interested),,bisexual
What made you finally accept who you are?,"In the last month I’ve[24m] stopped denying that that I’m bisexual. I’m aware that a months worth of acceptance won’t fix a decade of suppression but I was wondering, what made you fully accept who you were? I feel like in the last month I’ve been on a roller coaster. I have moments where I feel so happy that the weight of it is off my shoulders. Moments where I can finally breathe. And then I have other moments where I feel disgusted and ashamed of myself. Like I’m 15 years old again and I want to go back to holding it all in. When do you think you fully accepted yourself and what was your process? I’ve been putting myself out there and talking to guys here and there and I’m actually going on a date with a guy for the first time this week. Half of me is excited but there’s a place in the back of my head where I feel... shame. I don’t know why. Is this permanent? Do you still feel this way? Anyway, any advice would help. ",bisexual
My lesbian non-binary friend said that I’m not really gay since I’m dating a guy,"I was talking to my friend and they sometimes make jokes about how the gays are superior, which I tolerate at best. Anyways they were teasing me for kissing my boyfriend on the head to say goodbye and they jokingly said “Hetero” to tease me and I corrected them telling them I was “bi” also light heartedly. And then they said, “nah you straight.” And I corrected them a little more intensely. And they said to me that “I was straight because I was dating a dude” and then I ended up shouting at them that the whole definition of bisexuality is that it’s a love of both men and women, and I’m part of the lgBt community too. It was a lot too loud and very intense but I genuinely pissed me off that they’d say that.",bisexual
"Kid chose some nail varnish, and painted mine after I’d done hers; bi colours represent ☺️",,bisexual
Always said I was 20% gay,And made out with 4 guys and 1 girl at the drag bar tonight on my birthday. So I guess it checks out. ,bisexual
Interesting Looking Book on Bisexuality,,bisexual
"""I support bisexuals, but..."" Bingo",,bisexual
Are you a complex number?,‘Cause you’re an A+Bi !,bisexual
How did they know🤔,,bisexual
confused and more confused anybody else feel confused?,so I know for a fact that I like guys(I'm a guy) I am so attracted to masculinity and just men in general like even nonmasculine men. but the question I have is attraction to women. I feel like recently one of my friends who is a women and I have started to hit it off and we are going on a date Saturday. I've told everybody I was bi and since I've had some romantic feelings for this girl in the past I made sure she knew that. but I don't know if I have sexual feelings tworda girls that much. I mean mainly it's that I don't like the idea of vagina. just kinda is eh to me every other part of being with a girl is ok but vagina idk. so I'm confused because I do like this girl and I think we would be good together but I don't know if I can go far sexually with her ever. also the fact that there's a guy who's also my friend that I've had on and off feelings for so idk if like I could get in a relationship. the reason I've never been in one is because I'm confused and also kinda just a little bit in love with this one guy. but at the same time I also really like this girl like they are the only two people I've ever really liked a lot and I'm just confused and she knows now so I feel more comfortable but it's just eh. I don't really understand how I feel and if I'm ga y or if I'm bi pretty sure no because I deffinately like boobs and romantic relationships with girls but I feel like if much rather be with guys I've only kissed guys too never kissed a girl also in high school so I'm confused. the guy I like too is presumably straight so theres not much hope there unless he turns out not straight witch I can totally see but for now I have to put it in my mind that he's straight. does anybody else relate with confusion and liking guys a lot more than girls but still feeling like you could be with a woman I feel like I'm bi curious but the curiosity being women not men cuz I know I like men. at the same time it's probably more than that like idk. I go between being ga y and being bi on a weekly basis imo.,bisexual
"Was into a guy, turns out he was a homophobe.","There was this guy I really liked, just perfect. I gave him private physics lessons because he didn't do well in the subject, during the classes he'd always look at me in a different way and we even kissed (in the cheek) once (bit of an uncommon thing here in my country for men). The other day, I was talking to him about some news I heard about LGBT-related subjects and he told me he ""hated gay (as in LGBT) people because they don't follow natures laws"".  Now I'm pretty devastated because I really liked him and I thought there was something going on, but he is really just a homophobe :(",bisexual
Lost and trying to find myself,"I'm a 45 year old that has always led a straight existence even though I've identified as Bi for about 20 years. I've never been in a same-sex/gender relationship, but did try once. It was a horrible mess each time I tried to get with this guy, and I don't know if that discouraged me or if I just didn't find a good match after that. I've been with my partner for about 10 years and she is the mother of my son, and knows how I identify. Things are complicated right now, and I've been dealing with a healthy dose of depression. I'm not looking to get into any relationships or hookups but I do think it's time I really explored what it means to be bisexual, and stop denying it to myself, even passively. I want to know if there are any chat rooms online that are just for talk. Not flirting or hooking up. If that were to happen organically, then whatever, but that's not what I'm after. I just want to talk about stuff. ",bisexual
Does anyone feel like you could never come out to you family?,"My family is very conservative and religious, which makes me afraid of coming out to them ever. I live in south america, but because of my degree and my future goals, I plan on moving to north america someday, so that means that because I'll be very far away from my home I could be out to the new people I meet, and if by that moment I'm not with my boyfriend anymore I could even have encounters with women! (I kinda hope it doesn't happens, I love my boyfriend a lot) but yeah, the idea of me ever telling them about my true self seems impossible. I've learned to accept it, but it makes me sad sometimes. So I wanted to know if someone feels this way too.

Thank you for reading :)

Sorry if this messy btw, I just started thinking about it and inmediatly wrote what I was thinking ",bisexual
My first girlfriend and it feels so good!,"Hi all!

I guess the title says it all. I recently started dating my first girlfriend and I had to come out to my parents... I've identified as bi for a few years but  I didn't feel the need to tell my parents about my sex life but when I started dating my girlfriend I figured they should know. That went pretty well-- they told me they support me but they think it's a little weird. Other than that luke warm reception I'm entirely over the moon with my girlfriend.  It's so much easier to communicate with her and learn her body than I thought it would be!",bisexual
I think I’m bi ?,"I’m 18 yo and afab and have always just kind of identified as straight. I’ve always been attracted to guys and never really thought about women in the same way. But over the past couple years I’ve kind of realized that I’m more so attracted to masculinity (and dominance) in general no matter the gender. I was first attracted to someone of the same gender my sophomore year of high school (I’m graduated now), who looked like a girl (had feminine features) but was very masculine (short hair masculine clothing style) and lesbian. It was my first time liking a girl so I kind of just brushed it off as some sort of exception because she was so masculine. But as the next couple of years past I’ve been attracted to many more sort of “butch” females so I thought maybe I didn’t identify as heterosexual necessarily just attracted to masculinity/dominance. But idk if that’s the case because recently I’ve been attracted to a couple of more feminine girls. One that I know and I’m pretty sure identifies as heterosexual but has a really similar style to me. I would call my style unconventional and mostly skater, but it fluctuates between many styles and from masculine to feminine. I would call her style mostly skatergirl. Anyways, the point is that it was her style that first made me interested and at first I thought maybe that attraction was just me relating to her or something but then when I found out she had a boyfriend I got jealous so idk. The other more feminine girl I’ve been attracted to is lesbian icon/YouTuber Stevie. 

NSFW side note: the reason I even found Stevie on youtube was because recently I have been interested in lesbian sex. And by interested I mean that I really want to try it. Like lately I’ve really wanted to just eat some one out. Now don’t get me wrong I’m really into sex with guys (probably more than girls) but the idea of performing oral on a girl interests me more than on a guy and that’s a fairly recent thing, like probably within the past 2-ish months (Idk if any of that’s appropriate idk how else to phrase it and I feel like that’s relevant) 

Extra side note for anyone who watches oitnb: Daddy is so hot. I had been attracted to females before her but shes the one who really made me stop and think about my sexuality (which just shows how new the idea of being bi/queer is to me lol)

Anyways I have just been sitting on this lately and since my friend who identifies as queer and is also attracted to both genders is also more lenient towards one gender than the other i’ve just been questioning my sexuality and thinking I might be bi/queer. Also I think the reason it’s taken me so long to just now start questioning my orientation is because I’ve always just been so, idk how to put it? Pro lgbtq+ even when most of my family weren’t, and also because my immediate family (mom and siblings) have always been accepting of each other no matter our sexuality, identity, personality, mental health, or goals, so it’s never really been something that would be impactful on my life in a negative way, or something that I would have to really worry about. It’s also never really been a thing that I would have to come out about, it was something that I could talk about casually, like oh yeah mom by the way I’ve been attracted to females before. But then that also confuses me as to why I haven’t thought about it sooner because I’ve admitted out loud to multiple people that I feel attraction towards some woman and what? It just never registered that hey. If you like girls you’re clearly not straight? That doesn’t make any sense. Sorry for going off on so many minitangents I just feel like it’s all sort of relevant. 

And if you read this far, thank you for taking the time :)",bisexual
I’m definitely bi (18M),"I’ve been questioning for ages. I’ve always really liked girls the most. I’m attracted to so many girls all the time. I find them so pretty and nice and I love the idea of relationships with girls - I have only ever date girls. Currently, I have an amazing girlfriend who I love so much and our relationship is great. 

I’ve always also thought of experimenting with guys, and the idea of sex with men has turned me on for quite a while - although only if I’m the bottom, and I hardly find real life men attractive. I have never thought that I’d ever be in a relationship with a man.

It’s just hit me that I think I have been limited by thinking about the stereotypical male personality: hard, stoic, doesn’t talk about feelings, etc. (This is what I’m like tbh to people who don’t know me well).

I realized that if a guy was cute, and also super caring and flirty and sweet and emotional open with me similar to how girls are, then I absolutely could definitely see myself having a relationship with them and would love it. I think it would also have to be romantic from the onset. I can’t do friends and then lovers like I can with girls. When I’m friends with a guy it immediately turns me off. Obviously I don’t want a relationship because I love my girlfriend to death, but its just made me realize that I probably am bi to be honest, even though I keep coming to the conclusion that I’m making it up.

SO WORLD I GUESS I AM BISEXUAL!!!! (At least for now lmao I’ll probably change my mind by morning 😂)
",bisexual
I'm assuming this joke has been made before.,,bisexual
Daytona beach on National Coming out Day,,bisexual
Came out on Snapchat but never realized I had work people on there 😬,,bisexual
Love how the purple tones ripple between the pink &amp; blue instead of being a simple gradient,,bisexual
"Loved one made an incredibly hurtful comment, I could really use some support","Hey folks. I’m on that part of my journey where I’m still coming to terms with my own sexuality, and in a sense I’m still working on “coming out to myself.” That means I’m not really ready to tell the people closest to me what the deal is. National Coming Out Day had me thinking about it, but I’m honestly just not there yet and it’s terrible timing anyways considering how much shit everyone around me is going through. 

Anyways, my mom was just talking to me about how so-and-so just came out as bisexual on Facebook, and she said something to the effect of, “I don’t understand why they have to throw it in everyone’s face like that, why can’t they just keep it to themselves?” 

I wanted to cry right then and there, folks. But instead I just froze and didn’t respond and tried not to react. My dad finally said, “Well, she was among friends.” I’m so glad he said SOMETHING. 

Part of why I’ve been hesitant is because I still live with my parents, and I’m not sure how they would ultimately take it. While I think they’d ultimately come around, I think my mom in particular might freak out initially and kind of “mourn” who she thought I was. 

This was a couple hours ago and I’m still very much upset about it and I can’t talk to anyone about it because the only people I’m out to are casual acquaintances and coworkers. So I figured I’d do some shouting into the void on the internet. I don’t know where to go from here, I’m trying to process it so that I can at least get to a point where I can let it go. ",bisexual
"My boyfriend surprised me with flowers today, said he got the bi-est ones he could find 💜",,bisexual
What does attraction feel like?,"I'm pretty new to reddit, but I've been ghost following this thread for awhile now. Something I've been struggling with is identifying what attraction feels like and differentiating it from other feelings such as awe or anxiety. So, what does attraction, especially romantic attraction, feel like to you? Also, does the feeling of attraction differ for different genders?",bisexual
May I present the lovely ladies that made me realize I’m bi,,bisexual
Do you think it's becoming trendy to be Bi?,"I'm seeing this stupid trend more and more these days, people claiming to be bisexual when they clearly aren't or just so they can feel part of the culture, It's making things more awkward for the people who are the real thing, I would really prefer it if people stop faking it and actual Bi people should not accept it",bisexual
Going out to bars,"Yeah it’s fun to go out for a drink and flirt but it’s so hard. When you tell people you’re bi,  it’s either I get this oh I don’t want to talk to you anymore or people start asking too personal of questions. Then there are times when people throw out mixed signals and say hey I’m not like that. Kinda embarrassing. Anyone else run across this issue?",bisexual
Do I have internalized biphobia?,"Hi guys, so a couple months ago I came out as queer/non-straight to my friends, and recently as bisexual with a strong female leaning to my parents (I’m also female). Many of my friends have referred to me as “gay” or “a lesbian”, and I never bother to correct them because I’m so rarely attracted to men/other genders. I’ve definitely had some fantasies about male actors, but I don’t feel like I’ve met a man in real life that I can picture myself being intimate with, and I feel like it’s really likely I’ll end up with another woman. However, I’m definitely open to the idea of dating a man or NB person, etc. I’m wondering if it’s still fair for me to call myself bisexual if I have SUCH a strong leaning to women though (I’d say probably like 90-10), or if it’s biphobic of me to not bother correcting my friends when they call me gay/lesbian.

Sorry if everyone’s sick of these kinds of questions, but I’ve been really down lately and I’d appreciate any kind of input.",bisexual
Kinda came out to my mom by accident,"I was explaining something that happened at my uni and said “yeah cuz we’re all gay” and immediately realized I included me there. She didn’t react at all. Pretty sure my entire family knows tho and I don’t even try to hide it. Does it count as coming out if I’m quite open about it?

I do believe she will be shocked when I actually tell her I’m bi cuz she doesn’t think it’s real but hey, baby steps, I’m happy just with people knowing I’m not straight.",bisexual
What happened when I came out to one of my friends yesterday,,bisexual
Crazy as bad as desire the experience... I don't see it happening :(,,bisexual
How do you all feel about Netflix’s “Insatiable”?,"I’ve heard a lot of opinions and just want to hear some more! Some people feel like it’s enforcing bi erasure but I think that there are some good themes dealing with the conflicting feelings that we sometimes feel. Sometimes you have to show the negative side of an issue to actually get people talking about it. 

Let me hear all the opinions!",bisexual
For When I doubt my Bisexuality,"Bi cycles can be confusing and more recently been more attracted to the opposite sex. But in the past year I’ve been more actively working out, lifting and eating properly. And while coming out of the shower one day, I saw myself in the mirror and thought “damn... I’d fuck me”. So it has served as more positive reminder of my sexuality and my hard work in the gym and kitchen! ",bisexual
"""Came out"" to a friend and now treats me like her gay BFF.","Disclaimer: When I use the term ""gay"", I mean the culture and not the actual orientation. I'm also don't in any way mean any hatred or animosity towards being gay or gay culture. 

So, I'm a male in his mid twenties. In the pass few years I have come to accept that my sexuality is ""fluid."" I hate labels. And the idea of being gay when I was younger used to scare the sh*t out of me. I finally came to conclusion that I liked both girls and guys. Ironically, it wasn't until I accepted this about myself that I became better with being with girls. I don't consider myself bisexual. Not that I'm not, but it has all of this connotations that I just don't like. Also it's far more complicated than that, if anything I'm more biromantic heteroflexible, which just seems annoying to have to explain to people. 

I have a female friend who is bisexual. I ""came out"" to her a few months ago. She's very similar to me int he sense of how free spirited she is and her personality. But now that she knows that I've officially accepted myself, she keeps trying to make me ""gay"". When I say that, I mean she keeps inviting me to gay events/clubs. I feel like she wants me to be her gay bff. I don't consider myself gay. Sure I'm open minded and find both genders attractive, but that doesn't change who I am. And I just don't relate to ""gay culture"" not that there's anything wrong with it. It's just not me, the same as why very straight people don't relate to it. Unless I want people to, they don't know that I like guys because I don't act ""gay"". 

It just make me feel uncomfortable when she keeps trying to turn me into someone that I'm not. And when I tell her that I'm not in to such and such  or that's not my scene, she acts like I'm being closeted and lying to myself. I'm not. I'm just like this. The only thing possibly ""gay"" about me is the actual same sex attraction. Idk, she just invited me out to go dancing at a gay club and I got triggered. I don't know what to do. I like her alot and told her because I thought she would understand out of all people. But it just makes me feel weird when she treats me like I'm gay.
",bisexual
For all my coming out bi-bies today,,bisexual
My mom about my girlfriend: You’ve been hanging out with this girl a lot lately; she must be happy to have such a good friend!,"My mom about my girlfriend: You’ve been hanging out with this girl a lot lately; she must be happy to have such a good friend!       

Me [20F]: ........ Yep. ",bisexual
I missed my first national coming out day since iv been out to my friends and stuff,Im kinda sad i didnt even know it was yesterday,bisexual
bi_irl,,bisexual
I'm a lesbian but i'm attracted to queer boys,"Yep. That's it. I don't know how to explain it, but i LOVE girls and i'm a super lesbian, but sometimes i feel attracted to boys, but only if they're queer. Bisexuals, Pansexuals, Amab nonbinary, afab transmasc, anything but cishet boys. 
Is that normal? Am i bisexual? I'm confuseeeddd",bisexual
Literally took this pic from a gig I went to recently ( to see a British band called Editors) to share it in this group! Hands up who reckons the lighting guy is bi? 🙋🏻‍♀️,,bisexual
Venting: bi-phobia on a date,"This is about to be super rambly but I just wanted to vent a bit

     Last night my date (lesbian) told me she feels like most “truly bisexual women” will end up picking men over women every time because it’s easier. She also told me that “bisexual” has become a red flag for her on dating sites. I tried to explain that we all have differing levels of attraction to various genders and that not all bisexual women will default to men. 
     However, she acknowledged it isn’t all bisexuals then followed up with a story of how the last 4 out of 6 bisexual women she’d been on a date with had ghosted her for men. I didn’t bother trying to explain that the issue should be that someone ghosted for someone else, not the gender of the person they ghosted you for. 

It was just super frustrating and I wanted to vent to people who would get it ",bisexual
"Are ""exceptions"" bi erasure?","The othe day, I was talking to some friends, and one was describing a work of fiction that she had recently read where the main character was gay but had an ""exception"" for a woman.

""That's bi"", I said. 

""Well, he *calls* himself gay, so he's gay. People can have exceptions"", she and another friend argued.

I let it drop, but it made me feel weird. The whole concept of ""gay/straight but with exceptions"" seems like bi erasure to me. We know that you don't have to be ""50/50"" attracted to men and women to be bisexual ([this image](https://i.redd.it/k5r5q1s0wvl11.jpg) comes to mind), and one huge aspect that prevents people from realizing they are bi or being able to claim the label, is that they have some preference. I myself thought I was straight with ""exceptions"" for years.  Of course, I wouldn't tell a real person their chosen sexual identity was *wrong* ([This blog post](https://bisexual.org/good-bi-love-why-i-told-my-best-friend-its-okay-to-call-herself-a-lesbian/) has some interesting thoughts on that), but I think a fictional character's identity is fine to question and often a good proxy for these sorts of issues.

What do you all think?",bisexual
I’m having one of those “being bi feels so goddam lonely” weeks.,"
Does anyone else feel like this often? 

Sometimes feels like being a lone wolf separated from its pack... looking for it’s pack.. not finding it’s pack.. 

So incredibly grateful for this sub and this *amazing* community, but IRL feels like there’s nothing out there that reflects who i am as bi a person, bi culture etc etc 

Do you guys feel lonely in this way at times as a bi person? ",bisexual
Feeling Greedy with Labels,"This probably isn't the best place to post but i need to get some things off my chest here.
I identify as an asexual biromantic, and am very comfortable with my sexuality. However lately, i've been feeling more non binary (i guess?) than the cis female i've always identified with.
Problem is i feel like i have too many labels so i'm just making up feeling less female for attention. the thing is, i actually could be though. Gender thoughts are so much harder to deal with than romantic thoughts for me because i could prove to myself i liked guys and girls with my crushes, but i can't prove my gender to myself. 
Plz reassuring feedback i feel really lost",bisexual
new to all this?,"I'm 23F, and I always just assumed I was straight, but also never really got into guys in that way until my current boyfriend. But, the more I think about it, the more I'm certain I'm queer, and but I don't think me and my boyfriend will break up anytime soon- we're very happy and serious. but if we did, i'd want to date a girl. But I feel so *new* to all this queer stuff, and behind- it feels like there's a whole culture out there I should be apart of, but it's overwhelming to try and break into that. I attended a LGBT professional affiliation conference and felt out of the loop! does anyone have any recommendations for me to get more into queer culture?",bisexual
My story,"Hello bi peeps!

When I started year 10 (UK education system!) I had a ""sexual awakening"" of sorts. I was seeing girls in a kind of new way. However I was not pervy like the other guys, I did not lust over girls too much. I felt like an odd one out. 

When I was in my late 15's my life changed, a guy I was friends with looked different to me. I focused on his 6-pack, his stubble and (a bit lewd I know) his lower body. A strange arousal flowed through my veins. I was confused and scared, I CAN'T LIKE BOTH GIRLS AND BOYS!? 

I was a late bloomer (hit puberty near my mid 15s) so my body was crazy with hormones. I started to love the boy. I researched online and found out that I am part of a beautiful group of people named bisexuals!

Skip a few months later (ok half a year) I never got into a relationship but it was time to come out as bi... I came out to everyone on my facebook and everyone accepted me.

And now in my late mid 16s I embrace my sexuality

TL;DR: I am bi and proud to be part if a lovely group

Sorry for my bad writing lol

",bisexual
Im so Happy,"So I'm 15M, and as of recently I finally have my first boyfriend, and my first real relationship. He's very nice, and sweet, and fun to talk too. 

He's trans, and as of the 9th, he is now on blockers and will be on testosterone in about a month! I'm so happy and excited for him, I'm going to make him a cake in the colors of the trans flag.

I'm really happy that I finally have something so positive in my live, things have been rough for a while for a lot of reasons, and while they're still rough I'm happy that I have someone to help me through it!",bisexual
